Table of Contents
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
ANNUAL  REPORT PURSUANT T O SECTION 13 OR 15 (d) OF THE
SECURITIES  EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2021
SIMON PROPERTY GROUP, INC.
SIMON PROPERTY GROUP, L.P.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware
(Simon Property Group, Inc.)
Delaware
(Simon Property Group, L.P.)
(State of incorporation
or organization)001-14469
(Simon Property Group, Inc.)
001-36110
(Simon Property Group, L.P.)
(Commission File No.)04-6268599
(Simon Property Group, Inc.)
34-1755769
(Simon Property Group, L.P.)
(I.R.S. Employer
Identification No.)
225 West Washington Street
Indianapolis, Indiana 46204
(Address of principal executive offices) (ZIP Code)
(317) 636-1600
(Registrant’s telephone number, including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class     Trading Symbols     Name of each exchange on which
registered
Simon Property Group, Inc. Common stock, $0.0001 par value SPG New York Stock Exchange
Simon Property Group, Inc.83/8% Series J Cumulative Redeemable
Preferred Stock, $0.0001 par valueSPGJ New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the Registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer (as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act). 
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ☒    No ◻ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ⌧    No ◻
Indicate by check mark if the Registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act.
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ◻    No ☒ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ◻    No ⌧
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding
12 months (or for such shorter period that the Registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days.
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ☒    No ◻ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ⌧    No ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T
(§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the Registrant was required to submit such files). 
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ☒    No ◻ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ⌧    No ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth
company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act (check
one):
Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Large accelerated filer ☒ Accelerated filer ◻ Non-accelerated filer ◻ Smaller reporting company ◻
Emerging growth company ◻
Simon Property Group, L.P.:
Large accelerated filer ◻ Accelerated filer ◻ Non-accelerated filer ☒ Smaller reporting company ◻
Emerging growth company ◻
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the Registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised financial
accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.  
Simon Property Group, Inc.    ◻ Simon Property Group, L.P.    ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the effectiveness of its internal control over financial
reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report. 
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ☒    No ◻ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ⌧    No ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant is a shell company (as defined in rule 12-b of the Act).
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ◻    No ⌧ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ◻    No ⌧
The aggregate market value of shares of common stock held by non-affiliates of Simon Property Group, Inc. was approximately $42,527 million based on the closing sale
price on the New York Stock Exchange for such stock on June 30, 2021.
As of January 31, 2022, Simon Property Group, Inc. had 328,588,111 and 8,000 shares of common stock and Class B common stock outstanding, respectively.
Simon Property Group, L.P. had no publicly-traded voting equity as of June 30, 2021.  Simon Property Group, L.P. has no common stock outstanding.
Documents Incorporated By Reference
Portions of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Proxy Statement in connection with its 2021 Annual Meeting of Stockholders are incorporated by reference in Part III.
Table of Contents
2EXPLANATORY NOTE
This report combines the annual reports on Form 10-K for the annual period ended December 31, 2021 of
Simon Property Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation, and Simon Property Group, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership.
Unless stated otherwise or the context otherwise requires, references to “Simon” mean Simon Property Group, Inc.
and references to the “Operating Partnership” mean Simon Property Group, L.P. References to “we,” “us” and “our”
mean collectively Simon, the Operating Partnership and those entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by Simon
and/or the Operating Partnership.
Simon is a real estate investment trust, or REIT, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or
the Internal Revenue Code. We are structured as an umbrella partnership REIT under which substantially all of our
business is conducted through the Operating Partnership, Simon’s majority-owned partnership subsidiary, for which
Simon is the general partner. As of December 31, 2021, Simon owned an approximate 87.4% ownership interest in
the Operating Partnership, with the remaining 12.6% ownership interest owned by limited partners. As the sole
general partner of the Operating Partnership, Simon has exclusive control of the Operating Partnership’s day-to-day
management.
We operate Simon and the Operating Partnership as one business. The management of Simon consists of the
same members as the management of the Operating Partnership. As general partner with control of the Operating
Partnership, Simon consolidates the Operating Partnership for financial reporting purposes, and Simon has no
material assets or liabilities other than its investment in the Operating Partnership. Therefore, the assets and liabilities
of Simon and the Operating Partnership are the same on their respective financial statements.
We believe that combining the annual reports on Form 10-K of Simon and the Operating Partnership into this
single report provides the following benefits:
●enhances investors’ understanding of Simon and the Operating Partnership by enabling investors to view
the business as a whole in the same manner as management views and operates the business;
●eliminates duplicative disclosure and provides a more streamlined presentation since substantially all of the
disclosure in this report applies to both Simon and the Operating Partnership; and
●creates time and cost efficiencies through the preparation of one combined report instead of two separate
reports.
We believe it is important for investors to understand the few differences between Simon and the Operating
Partnership in the context of how we operate as a consolidated company. The primary difference is that Simon itself
does not conduct business, other than acting as the general partner of the Operating Partnership and issuing equity
or equity-related instruments from time to time. In addition, Simon itself does not incur any indebtedness, as all debt is
incurred by the Operating Partnership or entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by the Operating Partnership.
The Operating Partnership holds, directly or indirectly, substantially all of our assets, including our ownership
interests in our joint ventures. The Operating Partnership conducts substantially all of our business and is structured
as a partnership with no publicly traded equity. Except for the net proceeds from equity issuances by Simon, which
are contributed to the capital of the Operating Partnership in exchange for, in the case of common stock issuances by
Simon, common units of partnership interest in the Operating Partnership, or units, or, in the case of preferred stock
issuances by Simon, preferred units of partnership interest in the Operating Partnership, or preferred units, the
Operating Partnership, directly or indirectly, generates the capital required by our business through its operations, the
incurrence of indebtedness, proceeds received from the disposition of certain properties and joint ventures and the
issuance of units or preferred units to third parties.
The presentation of stockholders’ equity, partners’ equity and noncontrolling interests are the main areas of
difference between the consolidated financial statements of Simon and those of the Operating Partnership. The
differences between stockholders’ equity and partners’ equity result from differences in the equity issued at the Simon
and Operating Partnership levels. The units held by limited partners in the Operating Partnership are accounted for as
partners’ equity in the Operating Partnership’s financial statements and as noncontrolling interests in Simon’s financial
statements. The noncontrolling interests in the Operating Partnership’s financial statements include the interests of
unaffiliated partners in various consolidated partnerships. The noncontrolling interests in Simon’s financial statements
include the same noncontrolling interests at the Operating Partnership level and, as previously stated, the units held
by limited partners of the Operating Partnership. Although classified differently, total equity of Simon and the
Operating Partnership is the same.
To help investors understand the differences between Simon and the Operating Partnership, this report
provides:
●separate consolidated financial statements for Simon and the Operating Partnership;
Table of Contents
3●a single set of notes to such consolidated financial statements that includes separate discussions of
noncontrolling interests and stockholders’ equity or partners’ equity, accumulated other comprehensive
income (loss) and per share and per unit data, as applicable;
●a combined Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
section that also includes discrete information related to each entity; and
●separate Part II, Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer
Purchases of Equity Securities sections related to each entity.
This report also includes separate Part II, Item 9A. Controls and Procedures sections and separate Exhibits 31
and 32 certifications for each of Simon and the Operating Partnership in order to establish that the requisite
certifications have been made and that Simon and the Operating Partnership are each compliant with Rule 13a-14(a)
or Rule 15d-14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and 18 U.S.C. §1350. The separate discussions of Simon
and the Operating Partnership in this report should be read in conjunction with each other to understand our results
on a consolidated basis and how management operates our business.
In order to highlight the differences between Simon and the Operating Partnership, the separate sections in
this report for Simon and the Operating Partnership specifically refer to Simon and the Operating Partnership. In the
sections that combine disclosure of Simon and the Operating Partnership, this report refers to actions or holdings of
Simon and the Operating Partnership as being “our” actions or holdings. Although the Operating Partnership is
generally the entity that directly or indirectly enters into contracts and joint ventures, holds assets and incurs debt, we
believe that references to “we,” “us” or “our” in this context is appropriate because the business is one enterprise and
we operate substantially all of our business through the Operating Partnership.
Table of Contents
4Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Annual Report on Form 10-K
December 31, 2021
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Item No.   Page No.
Part I
1. Business 5
1A.Risk Factors 11
1B. Unresolved Staf f Comments 25
2. Properties 26
3. Legal Proceedings 54
4. Mine Safety Disclosures 54
Part II
5. Market for the Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters, and Issuer
Purchases of Equity Securities 55
6. Reserved 56
7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 57
7A. Qualitative and Quantitative Disclosure About Market Risk 77
8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 78
9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 135
9A. Controls and Procedures 135
9B. Other Information 137
9C. Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections 137
Part III
10. Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance 137
11. Executive Compensation 137
12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters 137
13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence 137
14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services 137
Part IV
15. Exhibits, and Financial Statement Schedules 139
16. Form 10-K Summary 139
Signatures 145
Table of Contents
5Part I
Item 1.Business
Simon Property Group, Inc. is a Delaware corporation that operates as a self-administered and self-managed
real estate investment trust, or REIT, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or the Internal Revenue
Code. REITs will generally not be liable for U.S. federal corporate income taxes as long as they distribute not less
than 100% of their REIT taxable income. Simon Property Group, L.P. is our majority-owned Delaware partnership
subsidiary that owns all of our real estate properties and other assets. Unless stated otherwise or the context
otherwise requires, references to "Simon" mean Simon Property Group, Inc. and references to the "Operating
Partnership" mean Simon Property Group, L.P.  References to "we," "us" and "our" mean collectively Simon, the
Operating Partnership and those entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by Simon and/or the Operating Partnership.
According to the Operating Partnership's partnership agreement, the Operating Partnership is required to pay all
expenses of Simon.
We own, develop and manage premier shopping, dining, entertainment and mixed-use destinations, which
consist primarily of malls, Premium Outlets®, and The Mills®. As of December 31, 2021, we owned or held an interest
in 199 income-producing properties in the United States, which consisted of 95 malls, 69 Premium Outlets, 14 Mills,
six lifestyle centers, and 15 other retail properties in 37 states and Puerto Rico. We also own an 80% noncontrolling
interest in The Taubman Realty Group, LLC, or TRG, which has an interest in 24 regional, super-regional, and outlet
malls in the U.S. and Asia. Internationally, as of December 31, 2021, we had ownership interests in 33 Premium
Outlets and Designer Outlet properties primarily located in Asia, Europe and Canada. As of December 31, 2021, we
also owned a 22.4% equity stake in Klépierre SA, or Klépierre, a publicly traded, Paris-based real estate company,
which owns, or has an interest in, shopping centers located in 14 countries in Europe.
For a description of our operational strategies and developments in our business during 2021, see Item 7,
“Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” of this Form 10-K.
Other Policies
The following is a discussion of our investment policies, financing policies, conflict of interest policies and
policies with respect to certain other activities. One or more of these policies may be amended or rescinded from time
to time without a stockholder vote.
Investment Policies
While we emphasize equity real estate investments, we may also provide secured financing to or invest in
equity or debt securities of other entities engaged in real estate activities or securities of other issuers consistent with
Simon’s qualification as a REIT. However, any of these investments would be subject to the percentage ownership
limitations and gross income tests necessary for REIT qualification. These REIT limitations mean that Simon cannot
make an investment that would cause its real estate assets to be less than 75% of its total assets. Simon must also
derive at least 75% of its gross income directly or indirectly from investments relating to real property or mortgages on
real property, including “rents from real property,” dividends from other REITs and, in certain circumstances, interest
from certain types of temporary investments. In addition, Simon must also derive at least 95% of its gross income
from such real property investments, and from dividends, interest and gains from the sale or dispositions of stock or
securities or from other combinations of the foregoing.
Subject to Simon’s REIT limitations, we may invest in the securities of other issuers in connection with
acquisitions of indirect interests in real estate. Such an investment would normally be in the form of general or limited
partnership or membership interests in special purpose partnerships and limited liability companies that own one or
more properties. We may, in the future, acquire all or substantially all of the securities or assets of other REITs,
management companies or similar entities where such investments would be consistent with our investment policies.
 Additionally we have and may in the future make investments in entities engaged in non-real estate activities,
primarily through a taxable REIT subsidiary, similar to the investments we currently hold in certain retail operations.
Financing Policies
Because Simon’s REIT qualification requires us to distribute at least 90% of its REIT taxable income, we
regularly access the debt markets to raise the funds necessary to finance acquisitions, develop and redevelop
properties, and refinance maturing debt. We must comply with the covenants contained in our financing agreements
that limit our ratio of debt to total assets or market value, as defined. For example, the Operating Partnership’s lines of
credit and the indentures
Table of Contents
6for the Operating Partnership’s debt securities contain covenants that restrict the total amount of debt of the
Operating Partnership to 65%, or 60% in relation to certain debt, of total assets, as defined under the related
agreements, and secured debt to 50% of total assets. In addition, these agreements contain other covenants
requiring compliance with financial ratios. Furthermore, the amount of debt that we may incur is limited as a practical
matter by our desire to maintain acceptable ratings for the debt securities of the Operating Partnership. We strive to
maintain investment grade ratings at all times for various business reasons, including their effect on our ability to
access attractive capital, but we cannot assure you that we will be able to do so in the future.
If Simon’s Board of Directors determines to seek additional capital, we may raise such capital by offering
equity or incurring debt, creating joint ventures with existing ownership interests in properties, entering into joint
venture arrangements for new development projects, retaining cash flows or a combination of these methods. If
Simon’s Board of Directors determines to raise equity capital, it may, without stockholder approval, issue additional
shares of common stock or other capital stock. Simon’s Board of Directors may issue a number of shares up to the
amount of our authorized capital or may issue units in any manner and on such terms and for such consideration as it
deems appropriate. We may also raise additional capital by issuing common units of partnership interest in the
Operating Partnership, or units. Such securities also may include additional classes of Simon’s preferred stock or
preferred units of partnership interest in the Operating Partnership, or preferred units, which may be convertible into
common stock or units, as the case may be. Existing stockholders and unitholders have no preemptive right to
purchase shares or units in any subsequent issuances of securities by us. Any issuance of equity could dilute a
stockholder’s investment in Simon or a limited partner’s investment in the Operating Partnership.
We expect most future borrowings will be made through the Operating Partnership or its subsidiaries. We
might, however, incur borrowings through other entities that would be reloaned to the Operating Partnership.
Borrowings may be in the form of bank borrowings, publicly and privately placed debt instruments, or purchase
money obligations to the sellers of properties. Any such indebtedness may be secured or unsecured. Any such
indebtedness may also have full or limited recourse to the borrower or be cross-collateralized with other debt, or may
be fully or partially guaranteed by the Operating Partnership. We issue unsecured debt securities through the
Operating Partnership, but we may issue other debt securities which may be convertible into common or preferred
stock or be accompanied by warrants to purchase common or preferred stock. We also may sell or securitize our
lease receivables. Although we may borrow to fund the payment of dividends, we currently have no expectation that
we will regularly do so.
The Operating Partnership has a $4.0 billion unsecured revolving credit facility, or the Credit Facility and a $3.5
billion supplemental unsecured revolving credit facility, or Supplemental Facility, or together, the Credit Facilities. The
Credit Facility can be increased in the form of additional commitments in an aggregate amount not to exceed $1.0
billion, for a total aggregate size of $5.0 billion, subject to obtaining additional lender commitments and satisfying
certain customary conditions precedent. The initial maturity date of the Credit Facility is June 30, 2024. The Credit
Facility can be extended for two additional six-month periods to June 30, 2025, at our sole option, subject to satisfying
certain customary conditions precedent.
Borrowings under the Credit Facility bear interest, at our election, at either (i) (x) for Term Benchmark Loans,
the Adjusted Term SOFR Rate, the applicable Local Rate, the Adjusted EURIBOR Rate, or the Adjusted TIBOR Rate,
(y) for RFR Loans, if denominated in Sterling, SONIA plus a benchmark adjustment and if denominated in Dollars,
Daily Simple SOFR plus a benchmark adjustment, or (z) for Daily SOFR Loans, the Adjusted Floating Overnight Daily
SOFR Rate, in each case of clauses (x) through (z) above, plus a margin determined by our corporate credit rating of
between 0.650% and 1.400% or (ii) for loans denominated in U.S. Dollars only, the base rate (which rate is equal to
the greatest of the prime rate, the federal funds effective rate plus 0.500% or Adjusted Term SOFR Rate for one
month plus 1.000%) (the “Base Rate”), plus a margin determined by our corporate credit rating of between 0.000%
and 0.400%. The Credit Facility includes a facility fee determined by our corporate credit rating of between 0.100%
and 0.300% on the aggregate revolving commitments under the Credit Facility.  Based upon our current credit ratings,
the interest rate on the Credit Facility is SOFR plus 72.5 basis points, plus a spread adjustment to account for the
transition from LIBOR to SOFR.
The Supplemental Facility’s initial borrowing capacity of $3.5 billion may be increased to $4.5 billion during its
term. The initial maturity date of the Supplemental Facility is January 31, 2026 and can be extended for an additional
year to January 31, 2027 at our sole option, subject to our continued compliance with the terms thereof.
Borrowings under the Supplemental Facility bear interest, at our election, at either (i) (x) for Term Benchmark
Loans, the Adjusted Term SOFR Rate, the applicable Local Rate, the Adjusted EURIBOR Rate, or the Adjusted
TIBOR Rate, (y) for RFR Loans, if denominated in Sterling, SONIA plus a benchmark adjustment and if denominated
in Dollars, Daily Simple SOFR plus a benchmark adjustment, or (z) for Daily SOFR Loans, the Adjusted Floating
Overnight Daily SOFR Rate, in each case of clauses (x) through (z) above, plus a margin determined by our
corporate credit rating of between 0.650%
Table of Contents
7and 1.400% or (ii) for loans denominated in U.S. Dollars only, the base rate (which rate is equal to the greatest of the
prime rate, the federal funds effective rate plus 0.500% or Adjusted Term SOFR Rate for one month plus 1.000%) (the
“Base Rate”), plus a margin determined by our corporate credit rating of between 0.000% and 0.400%. The
Supplemental Facility includes a facility fee determined by our corporate credit rating of between 0.100% and 0.300%
on the aggregate revolving commitments under the Supplemental Facility.  Based upon our current credit ratings, the
interest rate on the Supplemental Facility is SOFR plus 72.5 basis points, plus a spread adjustment to account for the
transition from LIBOR to SOFR.
The Operating Partnership also has available a global unsecured commercial paper note program, or
Commercial Paper program, of $2.0 billion, or the non-U.S. dollar equivalent thereof. The Operating Partnership may
issue unsecured commercial paper notes, denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro and other currencies. Notes issued in
non-U.S. currencies may be issued by one or more subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership and are guaranteed by
the Operating Partnership. Notes are sold under customary terms in the U.S. and Euro commercial paper note
markets and rank (either by themselves or as a result of the guarantee described above) pari passu with the
Operating Partnership’s other unsecured senior indebtedness. The Commercial Paper program is supported by the
Credit Facilities and, if necessary or appropriate, we may make one or more draws under the Credit Facilities to pay
amounts outstanding from time to time on the Commercial Paper program.
We may also finance our business through the following:
●issuance of shares of common stock or preferred stock or warrants to purchase the same;
●issuance of additional units;
●issuance of preferred units;
●issuance of other securities, including unsecured notes and mortgage debt;
●draws on our Credit Facilities;
●borrowings under the Commercial Paper program; or
●sale or exchange of ownership interests in properties.
The Operating Partnership may also issue units to contributors of properties or other partnership interests
which may permit the contributor to defer tax gain recognition under the Internal Revenue Code.
We do not have a policy limiting the number or amount of mortgages that may be placed on any particular
property.
Mortgage financing instruments, however, typically limit additional indebtedness on such properties.
Additionally, the Credit Facilities, our unsecured note indentures and other contracts may limit our ability to borrow
and contain limits on mortgage indebtedness we may incur as well as certain financial covenants we must maintain.
Typically, we invest in or form special purpose entities to assist us in obtaining secured permanent financing at
attractive terms. Permanent financing may be structured as a mortgage loan on a single property, or on a group of
properties, and generally requires us to provide a mortgage lien on the property or properties in favor of an
institutional third party, as a joint venture with a third party, or as a securitized financing. For securitized financings, we
create special purpose entities to own the properties. These special purpose entities, which are common in the real
estate industry, are structured so that they would not be consolidated in a bankruptcy proceeding involving a parent
company. We decide upon the structure of the financing based upon the best terms then available to us and whether
the proposed financing is consistent with our other business objectives. For accounting purposes, we include the
outstanding securitized debt of special purpose entities owning consolidated properties as part of our consolidated
indebtedness.
Conflict of Interest Policies
We maintain policies and have entered into agreements designed to reduce or eliminate potential conflicts of
interest. Simon has adopted governance principles governing the function, conduct, selection, orientation and duties
of its subsidiaries and Simon’s Board of Directors and the Company, as well as written charters for each of the
standing Committees of Simon’s Board of Directors. In addition, Simon’s Board of Directors has a Code of Business
Conduct and Ethics, which applies to all of its officers, directors, and employees and those of its subsidiaries. At least
a majority of the members of Simon’s Board of Directors must qualify, and do qualify, as independent under the listing
standards of the New York Stock Exchange, or NYSE, and cannot be affiliated with the Simon family, who are
significant stockholders in Simon and/or unitholders in the Operating Partnership. In addition, the Audit and
Compensation and Human Capital Committees of Simon’s Board of Directors are comprised entirely of independent
members who meet the additional independence and financial expert requirements of the NYSE as required.
Table of Contents
8The sale by the Operating Partnership of any property that it owns may have an adverse tax impact on the
Simon family or other limited partners of the Operating Partnership. Any transaction between us and the Simon family,
including property acquisitions, service and property management agreements and retail space leases, must be
approved by the Company’s Audit Committee.
In order to avoid any conflict of interest, the Simon charter requires that at least three-fourths of Simon’s
independent directors must authorize and require the Operating Partnership to sell any property it owns. Any such
sale is subject to applicable agreements with third parties. A noncompetition agreement executed by Herbert Simon,
Simon’s Chairman Emeritus, and a noncompetition agreement executed by David Simon, Simon’s Chairman, Chief
Executive Officer and President, which remains in effect notwithstanding the expiration of David Simon’s employment
agreement in 2019, contain covenants limiting their ability to participate in certain shopping center activities.
Policies With Respect To Certain Other Activities
We intend to make investments which are consistent with Simon’s qualification as a REIT, unless Simon’s
Board of Directors determines that it is no longer in Simon’s best interests to so qualify as a REIT. Simon’s Board of
Directors may make such a determination because of changing circumstances or changes in the REIT requirements.
Simon has authority to issue shares of its capital stock or other securities in exchange for property. We previously had
authority to repurchase or otherwise reacquire Simon’s shares, the Operating Partnership’s units, or any other
securities. On February 13, 2017, Simon’s Board of Directors authorized a two-year extension of the previously
authorized $2.0 billion common stock repurchase plan, or the Repurchase Program, through March 31, 2019 and on
February 11, 2019, Simon's Board of Directors authorized a new common stock repurchase plan.  Under the
program, the Company could purchase up to $2.0 billion of its common stock during the two-year period ending
February 11, 2021.  The Repurchase Program was not extended. Simon may also issue shares of its common stock,
or pay cash at its option, to holders of units in future periods upon exercise of such holders’ rights under the
partnership agreement of the Operating Partnership. Our policy prohibits us from making any loans to the directors or
executive officers of Simon for any purpose. We may make loans to the joint ventures in which we participate.
Additionally, we may make or buy interests in loans secured by real estate properties owned by others or make
investments in companies that own real estate assets.
Competition
The retail real estate industry is dynamic and competitive. We compete with numerous merchandise
distribution channels, including malls, outlet centers, community/lifestyle centers, and other shopping centers in the
United States and abroad. We also compete with internet retailing sites and catalogs, including our tenants, which
provide retailers with distribution options beyond existing brick and mortar retail properties. The existence of
competitive alternatives, accelerated by the impact of COVID-19, could have a material adverse effect on our ability to
lease space and on the level of rents we can obtain. This results in competition for both the tenants to occupy the
properties that we develop and manage as well as for the acquisition of prime sites (including land for development
and operating properties). We believe that there are numerous factors that make our properties highly desirable to
retailers, including:
●the quality, location and diversity of our properties;
●our management and operational expertise;
●our extensive experience and relationships with retailers, lenders and suppliers;
●our marketing initiatives and consumer focused strategic corporate alliances; and
●the sustainability of physical retail.
Certain Activities
During the past three years, we have:
●issued 375,775 shares of Simon common stock upon the exchange of units in the Operating Partnership;
●issued 633,881 restricted shares of Simon common stock and 36,252 long-term incentive performance
units, or LTIP units, net of forfeitures, under The Simon Property Group 1998 Stock Incentive Plan, as
amended, or the 1998 Plan, and the Simon Property Group, L.P. 2019 Stock Incentive Plan, or the 2019
Plan;
●purchased 3,492,728 shares of Simon common stock in the open market for $512.4 million pursuant to our
Repurchase Programs;
Table of Contents
9●issued 22,137,500 shares of common stock in a public offering at a public offering price of $72.50 per
share, before underwriting discounts and commissions;
●issued 955,705 units in the Operating Partnership as part of the consideration for the acquisition of an 80%
interest in TRG;
●redeemed 175,618 units in the Operating Partnership at an average price of $143.34 per unit in cash;
●amended and replaced in its entirety the Operating Partnership’s existing Credit Facility in March 2020, by
entering into an unsecured credit facility compromised of (i) an amendment and extension of the Credit
Facility and (ii) a $2.0 billion delayed-draw term loan facility, or Term Facility;
●amended the Credit Facility to transition the borrowing rates from LIBOR to successor benchmark indexes
in November 2021;
●amended, restated, and extended the Supplemental Facility in October 2021;
●borrowed a maximum amount of $3.9 billion under the Credit Facilities; the outstanding amount of
borrowings under the Credit Facility and Supplemental Facility as of December 31, 2021 were
$125.0 million and $1.05 billion, respectively;
●borrowed a maximum amount of $2.0 billion under the Term Facility; there were no outstanding borrowings
as of December 31, 2021;
●the outstanding amount of Commercial Paper notes as of December 31, 2021 was $500.0 million; and
●provided annual reports containing financial statements audited by our independent registered public
accounting firm and quarterly reports containing unaudited financial statements to our security holders.
Human Capital
At December 31, 2021, we and our affiliates employed approximately 3,300 persons at various properties and
offices throughout the United States, of which approximately 900 were part-time. Approximately 1,000 of these
employees were located at our corporate headquarters in Indianapolis, Indiana.
We believe our employees are the driving force behind our success.  To ensure we continue to attract, develop
and retain the best talent across the organization, we invest in our employees and provide equal opportunities. We
offer a variety of ongoing talent programs that foster continual development, high performance and overall
organizational effectiveness, including a series of leadership development programs. We conduct an annual talent-
assessment process for selected business functions within our corporate and field organizations that includes plans
for individual employee career development and long-term leadership succession, and also conduct an annual
performance appraisal process for all regular employees.
We are focused on providing a work environment that is free from any form of discrimination or harassment for
any protected class and also embraces principles of inclusiveness. We have implemented a sustainable diversity and
inclusion strategy, including an internal policy, targeted solutions for employees and an annual process of
assessment, action and evaluation led by our human resources department.
Our compensation program is designed to, among other things, attract, retain and motivate talented and
experienced individuals using a mix of competitive salaries, bonuses, equity based awards and other benefits.
Government Regulations Affecting Our Properties
We are subject to federal, state and local environmental regulations that apply generally to the ownership of
real property and the operations conducted on real property.  As of December 31, 2021, we are not aware of any
environmental conditions or material costs of complying with environmental or other regulations that would have a
material adverse effect on our overall business, financial condition, or results of operations.  However, it is possible
that we are not aware of, or may become subject to, potential environmental liabilities or material costs of complying
with governmental regulations that could be material.  See further discussion in Item 1A. Risk Factors.
Corporate Headquarters
Our corporate headquarters are located at 225 West Washington Street, Indianapolis, Indiana 46204, and our
telephone number is (317) 636-1600.
Table of Contents
10Available Information
Simon is a large accelerated filer (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended, or the Exchange Act) and is required, pursuant to Item 101 of Regulation S-K, to provide certain
information regarding our website and the availability of certain documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and
Exchange Commission, or the SEC. Our Internet website address is www.simon.com. Our annual reports on
Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, current reports on Form 8-K and amendments to those reports filed or
furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Exchange Act are available or may be accessed free of charge
through the “About Simon/Investor Relations” section of our Internet website as soon as reasonably practicable after
we electronically file such material with, or furnish it to, the SEC. Our Internet website and the information contained
therein or connected thereto are not, and are not intended to be, incorporated into this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
The following corporate governance documents are also available through the “About Simon/Investor
Relations/ Governance” section of our Internet website or may be obtained in print form by request of our Investor
Relations Department: Governance Principles, Code of Business Conduct and Ethics, Audit Committee Charter,
Compensation and Human Capital Committees Charter, and Governance and Nominating Committee Charter.
In addition, we intend to disclose on our Internet website any amendments to, or waivers from, our Code of
Business Conduct and Ethics that are required to be publicly disclosed pursuant to rules of the SEC and the NYSE.
Information about our Executive Officers
The following table sets forth certain information with respect to Simon’s executive officers as of February 25,
2021.
Name Age Position
David Simon 60Chairman of the Board, Chief Executive Of ficer and
President
John Rulli 65 Chief Administrative Of ficer
Steven E. Fivel 61 General Counsel and Secretary
Brian J. McDade 42Executive V ice President, Chief Financial Of ficer and
Treasurer
Alexander L. W . Snyder 52 Assistant General Counsel and Assistant Secretary
Adam J. Reuille 47 Senior V ice President and Chief Accounting Of ficer
The executive officers of Simon serve at the pleasure of Simon’s Board of Directors.
Mr. Simon has served as the Chairman of Simon’s Board of Directors since 2007, Chief Executive Officer of
Simon or its predecessor since 1995 and assumed the position of President in 2019. Mr. Simon has also been a
director of Simon or its predecessor since its incorporation in 1993. Mr. Simon was the President of Simon’s
predecessor from 1993 to 1996. He is the nephew of Herbert Simon.
Mr. Rulli serves as Simon’s Chief Administrative Officer. Mr. Rulli joined Melvin Simon & Associates, Inc., or
MSA, in 1988 and held various positions with MSA and Simon thereafter. Mr. Rulli became Chief Administrative
Officer in 2007 and was promoted to Senior Executive Vice President in 2011.
Mr. Fivel serves as Simon’s General Counsel and Secretary. Prior to rejoining Simon in 2011 as Assistant
General Counsel and Assistant Secretary, Mr. Fivel served as Executive Vice President, General Counsel and
Secretary of Brightpoint, Inc. Mr. Fivel was previously employed by MSA from 1988 until 1993 and then by Simon
from 1993 to 1996.  Mr. Fivel was promoted to General Counsel and Secretary in 2017.
Mr. McDade serves as Simon’s Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer. Mr. McDade
joined Simon in 2007 as the Director of Capital Markets and was promoted to Senior Vice President of Capital
Markets in 2013. Mr. McDade became Treasurer in 2014 and was promoted to Executive Vice President and Chief
Financial Officer in 2018.
Mr. Snyder serves as Simon’s Assistant General Counsel and Assistant Secretary. Mr. Snyder joined Simon in
2016 as Senior Deputy General Counsel. Immediately prior to joining Simon, Mr. Snyder was Managing Partner of the
Crimson Fulcrum Strategic Institute. Mr. Snyder previously served as Executive Vice President, General Counsel and
Corporate Secretary for Beechcraft Corporation as well as Chief Counsel Mergers & Acquisitions for Koch Industries,
Inc.  Mr. Snyder was promoted to Assistant General Counsel and Assistant Secretary in 2017.  
Mr. Reuille serves as Simon’s Senior Vice President and Chief Accounting Officer and prior to that as Simon’s
Vice President and Corporate Controller. Mr. Reuille joined Simon in 2009 and was promoted to Senior Vice President
and Chief Accounting Officer in 2018.
Table of Contents
11Item 1A.  Risk Factors
The following factors, among others, could cause our actual results to differ materially from those expressed or
implied in forward-looking statements made in this Annual Report on Form 10-K and presented elsewhere by our
management from time to time. These factors may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial
condition, liquidity, results of operations, funds from operations, or FFO, and prospects, which we refer to herein as a
material adverse effect on us or as materially and adversely affecting us, and you should carefully consider them.
Additional risks and uncertainties not presently known to us or which are currently not believed to be material may
also affect our actual results. We may update these factors in our future periodic reports.
Summary of Risk Factors
The following summarizes our material risk factors.  However, this summary is not intended to be a
comprehensive and complete list of all risk factors identified by the Company.  Refer to the following pages of this
section for additional details regarding these summarized risk factors and other additional risk factors identified by the
Company.
●The ongoing novel coronavirus (COVID-19) pandemic and governmental restrictions intended to prevent its
spread, as well as other future epidemics, pandemics or public health crises, could have a significant
negative impact on our business, financial condition, results of operations, cash flow and liquidity and our
ability to access the capital markets, satisfy our debt service obligations and make distributions to our
shareholders.
●Conditions that adversely affect the general retail environment could materially and adversely affect us.
●Some of our properties depend on anchor stores or other large nationally recognized tenants to attract
shoppers and we could be materially and adversely affected by the loss of one or more of these anchors or
tenants.
●We face potential adverse effects from tenant bankruptcies.
●We face a wide range of competition that could affect our ability to operate profitably, including e-
commerce.
●Vacant space at our properties could materially and adversely affect us.
●We may not be able to lease newly developed properties to or renew leases and relet space at existing
properties with an appropriate mix of tenants, if at all.
●Our international activities may subject us to risks that are different from or greater than those associated
with our domestic operations.
●We face risks associated with the acquisition, development, redevelopment and expansion of properties.
●We have a substantial debt burden that could affect our future operations.
●The agreements that govern our indebtedness contain various covenants that impose restrictions on us that
might affect our ability to operate freely.
●Disruption in the capital and credit markets may adversely affect our ability to access external financings for
our growth and ongoing debt service requirements.
●Adverse changes in our credit ratings could affect our borrowing capacity and borrowing terms.
●Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership have elected to be taxed as REITs in the
United States. The failure to maintain Simon’s or the Subsidiary REITs’ qualifications as REITs or changes
in applicable tax laws or regulations could result in adverse tax consequences.
●If the Operating Partnership fails to qualify as a partnership for federal income tax purposes, we would
cease to qualify as a REIT and suffer other adverse consequences.
●Our ownership of TRSs is subject to certain restrictions, and we will be required to pay a 100% penalty tax
on certain income or deductions if our transactions with our TRSs are not conducted on arm’s-length terms.
●We have limited control with respect to some properties that are partially owned or managed by third
parties, which may adversely affect our ability to sell or refinance them.
●The Operating Partnership guarantees debt or otherwise provides support for a number of joint venture
properties.
Table of Contents
12●Some of our properties are subject to potential natural or other disasters.
Risks Relating to Retail Operations
The ongoing novel coronavirus (COVID-19) pandemic and governmental restrictions intended to
prevent its spread, as well as other future epidemics, pandemics or public health crises, could have a
significant negative impact on our business, financial condition, results of operations, cash flow and liquidity
and our ability to access the capital markets, satisfy our debt service obligations and make distributions to
our shareholders.
The COVID-19 pandemic has had a material negative impact on economic and market conditions around the
world, and, notwithstanding the fact that vaccines are being administered in the United States and elsewhere, the
pandemic continues to adversely impact economic activity in retail real estate. The impact of the COVID-19 pandemic
continues to evolve and governments and other authorities, including where we own or hold interests in properties,
have imposed measures intended to control its spread, including restrictions on freedom of movement, group
gatherings and business operations such as travel bans, border closings, business closures, quarantines, stay-at-
home, shelter-in-place orders, density limitations and social distancing measures. Governments and other authorities
are in varying stages of lifting or modifying some of these measures. However, governments and other authorities
have already been forced to, and others may in the future, reinstitute these measures or impose new, more restrictive
measures, if the risks, or the tenants’ and consumers' perception of the risks, related to the COVID-19 pandemic
worsen at any time. Although tenants and consumers have been adapting to the COVID-19 pandemic, with tenants
adding services like curbside pickup, and while consumer risk-tolerance is evolving, such adaptations and evolution
may take time, and there is no guarantee that retail will return to pre-pandemic levels even once the pandemic
subsides.
As of December 31, 2021, we owned or held an interest in 199 income-producing properties in the United
States located in 37 states and Puerto Rico. We also own an 80% noncontrolling interest in TRG, which has an
interest in 24 regional, super-regional, and outlet malls in the U.S. and Asia. Internationally, as of December 31, 2021,
we had ownership interests in 33 properties primarily located in Asia, Europe and Canada and have two international
outlet properties under development. We have an interest in a European investee that has interests in 11 Designer
Outlet properties, as more fully described elsewhere in this Annual Report. As of December 31, 2021, we also owned
a 22.4% equity stake in Klépierre SA, or Klépierre, a publicly traded, Paris-based real estate company, which owns, or
has an interest in, shopping centers located in 14 countries in Europe.
Demand for retail space and the profitability of our properties depends, in part, on the ability and willingness of
tenants to enter into and perform obligations under leases. Although the harshest restrictions to prevent the spread of
COVID-19 have generally been lifted or reduced, and vaccines are being administered in the United States and
elsewhere, the willingness of customers to visit our properties may be reduced and our tenants’ businesses adversely
affected, based upon many factors, including local transmission rates, the emergence of new variants, the
development, availability, distribution, effectiveness and acceptance of existing and new vaccines, and the
effectiveness and availability of cures or treatments.  Further, demand could remain reduced due to heightened
sensitivity to risks associated with the transmission of COVID-19 or other associated diseases.  In addition, some of
our properties are located at or within a close proximity to tourist destinations, and these properties and our tenants’
businesses have been, and may be in the future, heavily and adversely impacted by reductions in travel and tourism
resulting from travel bans or restrictions and general concern regarding the risk of travel.
The continuing impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on our business, financial condition, results of operations,
cash flows, liquidity and ability to satisfy our debt service obligations and make distributions to our shareholders could
depend on additional factors, including:
●the financial condition and viability of our tenants, and their ability or willingness to pay rent in full;
●state, local, federal and industry-initiated tenant relief efforts that may adversely affect landlords, including
us, and their ability to collect rent and/or enforce remedies for the failure to pay rent;
●the increased popularity and utilization of e-commerce;
●our ability to renew leases or re-lease available space in our properties on favorable terms or at all,
including as a result of a deterioration in the economic and market conditions in the markets in which we
own properties or due to restrictions intended to prevent the spread of COVID-19, including any additional
government mandated closures of businesses that frustrate our leasing activities;
Table of Contents
13●a severe and prolonged disruption and instability in the global financial markets, including the debt and
equity capital markets, all of which have already been experienced and which may continue to affect our or
our tenants' ability to access capital necessary to fund our or their respective business operations or repay,
refinance or renew maturing liabilities on a timely basis, on attractive terms, or at all and may adversely
affect the valuation of financial assets and liabilities, any of which could affect our and our tenants' ability to
meet liquidity and capital expenditure requirements;
●a refusal or failure of one or more lenders under our credit facility to fund their respective financing
commitment to us may affect our ability to access capital necessary to fund our business operations and to
meet our liquidity and capital expenditure requirements;
●a reduction in the cash flows generated by our properties and the values of our properties that could result
in impairments or limit our ability to dispose of them at attractive prices or obtain debt financing secured by
our properties;
●the complete or partial closure of one or more of our tenants' manufacturing facilities or distribution centers,
temporary or long-term disruption in our tenants' supply chains from local and international suppliers and/or
delays in the delivery of our tenants' inventory, any of which could reduce or eliminate our tenants' sales,
cause the temporary closure of our tenants' businesses, and/or result in their bankruptcy or insolvency;
●a negative impact on consumer discretionary spending caused by high unemployment levels, reduced
economic activity or a severe or prolonged recession;
●our and our tenants' ability to manage our respective businesses to the extent our and their management or
personnel (including on-site employees) are impacted in significant numbers by the COVID-19 pandemic or
are otherwise not willing, available or allowed to conduct work, including any impact on our tenants' ability
to deliver timely information to us that is necessary for us to make effective decisions; and
●our and our tenants' ability to ensure business continuity in the event our or our tenants' continuity of
operations plan is (i) not effective or improperly implemented or deployed or (ii) compromised due to
increased cyber and remote access activity during the COVID-19 pandemic.
To the extent any of these risks and uncertainties adversely impact us in the ways described above or
otherwise, they may also have the effect of heightening many of the other risks described herein.
Conditions that adversely affect the general retail environment could materially and adversely affect
us.
Our concentration in the retail real estate market – our primary source of revenue is retail tenants – means that
we could be materially and adversely affected by conditions that materially and adversely affect the retail environment
generally, including, without limitation:
●levels of consumer spending, changes in consumer confidence, income levels, and fluctuations in seasonal
spending in the United States and internationally;
●consumers avoiding traveling for shopping due to a heightened level of concern for safety in public places
in light of the COVID-19 pandemic as well as the potential for civil unrest, including random acts of violence
and riots;
●significant reductions in international travel and tourism, resulting in fewer international retail consumers;
●consumer perceptions of the convenience and attractiveness of our properties;
●the impact on our retail tenants and demand for retail space at our properties from the increasing use of the
Internet by retailers and consumers, which has accelerated during the COVID-19 pandemic;
●the creditworthiness of our retail tenants and the availability of new creditworthy tenants and the related
impact on our occupancy levels and lease income;
●local real estate conditions, such as an oversupply of, or reduction in demand for, retail space or retail
goods, decreases in rental rates and declines in real estate values;
●the willingness of retailers to lease space in our properties at attractive rents, or at all;
●actual or perceived changes in national and international economic conditions, which can result from global
events such as international trade disputes, a foreign debt crisis, foreign currency volatility, natural
disasters, war,
Table of Contents
14epidemics and pandemics, the fear of spread of contagious diseases, civil unrest and terrorism, as well as
from domestic issues, such as government policies and regulations, tariffs, energy prices, market dynamics,
rising interest rates, inflation and limited growth in consumer income;
●changes in regional and local economies, which may be affected by increased rates of unemployment,
increased foreclosures, higher taxes, decreased tourism, industry slowdowns, adverse weather conditions,
and other factors;
●increased operating costs and capital expenditures, whether from redevelopments, replacing tenants or
otherwise;
●changes in applicable laws and regulations, including tax, environmental, safety and zoning; and
●the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic, and restrictions intended to prevent its spread, which were
implemented through a combination of state, local and federal orders and regulations that were put in place
with unprecedented speed and with no opportunity for citizens to challenge their legality.
Additionally, a portion of our lease income is derived from overage rents based on sales over a stated base
amount that directly depend on the sales volume of our retail tenants. Accordingly, declines in our tenants’ sales
performance could reduce the income produced by our properties.
Some of our properties depend on anchor stores or other large nationally recognized tenants to attract
shoppers and we could be materially and adversely affected by the loss of one or more of these
anchors or tenants.
Our properties are typically anchored by department stores and other large nationally recognized tenants.
Certain of our anchors and other tenants have ceased their operations, downsized their brick-and-mortar presence or
failed to comply with their contractual obligations to us and others, and such actions have become more prevalent
during the COVID-19 pandemic.
Sustained adverse pressure on the results of department stores and other national retailers may have a
similarly sustained adverse impact upon our own results. Certain department stores and other national retailers have
experienced, and may continue to experience for the foreseeable future (given uncertainty with respect to current and
future macroeconomic conditions and consumer confidence levels), considerable decreases in customer traffic in
their retail stores, increased competition from alternative retail options such as those accessible via the Internet and
other forms of pressure on their business models. As pressure on these department stores and other national retailers
increases, especially due to the COVID-19 pandemic, their ability to maintain their stores, meet their obligations both
to us and to their external lenders and suppliers, withstand takeover attempts or avoid bankruptcy and/or liquidation
may be impaired and result in closures of their stores or their seeking of a lease modification with us. Any lease
modification could be unfavorable to us as the lessor and could decrease current or future effective rents or expense
recovery charges. Certain other tenants are entitled to modify the economic or other terms of, or terminate, their
existing leases with us in the event of such closures.  Additionally, corporate merger or consolidation activity among
department stores and other national retailers typically results in the closure of duplicate or geographically
overlapping store locations.
If a department store or large nationally recognized tenant were to close its stores at our properties, we may
experience difficulty and delay and incur significant expense in re-tenanting the space, as well as in leasing spaces in
areas adjacent to the vacant store, at attractive rates, or at all. Additionally, department store or tenant closures may
result in decreased customer traffic, which could lead to decreased sales at our properties. If the sales of stores
operating in our properties were to decline significantly due to the closing of anchor stores or other national retailers,
adverse economic conditions or other reasons, tenants may be unable to pay their minimum rents or expense
recovery charges. In the event of any default by a tenant, we may not be able to fully recover, and/or may experience
delays and costs in enforcing our rights as landlord to recover, amounts due to us under the terms of our leases with
such parties.
We face potential adverse effects from tenant bankruptcies.
Bankruptcy filings by retailers can occur regularly in the course of our operations.  Although we did not see an
increase in tenant bankruptcies in 2021, in previous years a number of companies in the retail industry, including
certain of our tenants, have declared bankruptcy, and these numbers have increased due to the COVID-19 pandemic.
If a tenant files for bankruptcy, the tenant may have the right to reject and terminate one or more of its leases with us,
and we cannot be sure that it will affirm one or more of its leases and continue to make rental payments to us in a
timely manner. A
Table of Contents
15bankruptcy filing by, or relating to, one of our tenants would generally prohibit us from evicting this tenant, and bar all
efforts by us to collect pre-bankruptcy debts from that tenant, or from their property, unless we receive an order
permitting us to do so from the bankruptcy court. In addition, we cannot evict a tenant solely because of its
bankruptcy. If a lease is assumed by the tenant in bankruptcy, all pre-bankruptcy balances due under the lease must
be paid to us in full. If a lease is rejected, the unsecured claim we hold against a bankrupt tenant might be paid only to
the extent that funds are available and only in the same percentage as is paid to all other holders of unsecured
claims, and there are restrictions under bankruptcy laws that limit the amount of the claim we can make if a lease is
rejected. As a result, it is likely that we would recover substantially less than the full value of any unsecured claims we
hold. In addition, we may make lease modifications either pre- or post-bankruptcy for certain tenants undergoing
significant financial distress in order for them to continue as a going concern. Furthermore, we may be required to
incur significant expense in re-tenanting the space formerly leased to the bankrupt tenant. We continually seek to re-
lease vacant spaces resulting from tenant terminations. The bankruptcy of a tenant, particularly an anchor tenant or a
national tenant with multiple locations, may require a substantial redevelopment of its space, the success of which
cannot be assured, and may make the re-tenanting of its space difficult and costly. Any such bankruptcies also make
it more difficult to lease the remainder of the space at the affected property or properties. Future tenant bankruptcies
may strain our resources and impact our ability to successfully execute our re-leasing strategy and could materially
and adversely affect us.
We face a wide range of competition that could affect our ability to operate profitably, including e-
commerce.
Our properties compete with other forms of retailing such as pure online retail websites as well as other retail
properties such as single user freestanding discounters (Costco, Walmart and Target). In addition, many of our
tenants are omni-channel retailers who also distribute their products through online sales. Our business currently is
predominantly reliant on consumer demand for shopping at physical stores, and we could be materially and adversely
affected if we are unsuccessful in adapting our business to evolving consumer purchasing habits. The increased
popularity of digital and mobile technologies has accelerated the transition of a percentage of market share from
shopping at physical stores to web-based shopping, and the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic and restrictions intended
to prevent its spread have significantly increased the utilization of e-commerce and may, particularly in certain market
segments, accelerate the long-term penetration of pure online retail which has been able to sell non-essential goods
during the COVID-19 pandemic. Not only has the temporary closure of our retail properties and the restrictions put in
place by state, local and federal officials caused consumers who otherwise would have purchased from retailers at
our properties to increase their utilization of pure online retail websites, but consumers whose previous use of online
retail was low or non-existent have recently turned to pure online retail as a necessity due to the inability to access
our properties and the ability to purchase non-essential goods from these pure online retailers. Although a brick-and-
mortar presence may have a positive impact on retailers’ online sales, the increased utilization of pure online
shopping may lead to the closure of underperforming stores by retailers, which could impact our occupancy levels
and the rates that tenants are willing to pay to lease our space.
Vacant space at our properties could materially and adversely affect us.
Certain of our properties have had vacant space available for prospective tenants, and those properties may
continue to experience, and other properties may commence experiencing, such oversupply in the future. Among
other causes, (1) there has been an increased number of bankruptcies of anchor stores and other national retailers,
as well as store closures, and (2) there has been lower demand from retail tenants for space, due to certain retailers
increasing their use of e-commerce websites to distribute their merchandise, with each of (1) and (2) accelerating as
a result of the COVID-19 pandemic. As a result of the increased bargaining power of creditworthy retail tenants, there
is downward pressure on our rental rates and occupancy levels, and this increased bargaining power may also result
in us having to increase our spend on tenant improvements and potentially make other lease modifications in order to
attract or retain tenants, any of which, in the aggregate, could materially and adversely affect us.
We may not be able to lease newly developed properties to or renew leases and relet space at existing
properties with an appropriate mix of tenants, if at all.
We may not be able to lease new properties to an appropriate mix of tenants that generates optimal customer
traffic. Also, when leases for our existing properties expire, the premises may not be relet or the terms of reletting,
including the cost of allowances and concessions to tenants may be less favorable than the current lease terms. If we
fail to identify and secure the right blend of tenants at our newly developed and existing properties, our properties
may not appeal to the communities they serve. If we elect to pursue a “mixed use” redevelopment we expose
ourselves to risks associated with each non-retail use (e.g. office, residential, hotel and entertainment), and the
performance of our retail tenants in such
Table of Contents
16properties may be negatively impacted by delays in opening and/or the performance of such non-retail uses. To the
extent that our leasing goals are not achieved, we could be materially and adversely affected.
Risks Relating to Real Estate Investments and Operations
Our international activities may subject us to risks that are different from or greater than those
associated with our domestic operations.
As of December 31, 2021, we held interests in consolidated and joint venture properties that operate in
Austria, Canada, France, Italy, Germany, Japan, Malaysia, Mexico, the Netherlands, South Korea, Spain, Thailand,
and the United Kingdom. We also have an equity stake in Klépierre, a publicly traded European real estate company,
which operates in 14 countries in Europe. Accordingly, our operating results and the value of our international
operations may be impacted by any unhedged movements in the foreign currencies in which those operations
transact and in which our net investment in those international operations is held. While we occasionally enter into
hedging agreements to manage our exposure to changes in foreign exchange rates, these agreements may not
eliminate foreign currency risk entirely.
We may pursue additional investment, ownership, development and redevelopment/expansion opportunities
outside the United States. Such international activities carry risks that are different from those we face with our
domestic properties and operations. These risks include, but are not limited to:
●adverse effects of changes in exchange rates for foreign currencies;
●changes in foreign political and economic environments, regionally, nationally, and locally;
●impact from international trade disputes and the associated impact on our tenants’ supply chain and
consumer spending levels;
●challenges of complying with a wide variety of foreign laws, including corporate governance, operations,
taxes and litigation;
●the risk that we, our employees and/or agents could violate anti-bribery, anti-corruption and international
trade laws in the U.S., such as the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, and certain foreign countries, such
as the U.K. Bribery Act, which could result in criminal or civil sanctions and/or fines, negatively impact our
reputation, or require us to incur significant expenses to investigate;
●differing lending practices;
●differences in cultures and consumer retail behavior;
●changes in applicable laws and regulations in the United States that affect international operations;
●changes in applicable laws and regulations in these foreign jurisdictions;
●difficulties in managing international operations;
●obstacles to the repatriation of earnings and cash; and
●labor discord, political or civil unrest, acts of terrorism, epidemics and pandemics, including COVID-19, the
fear of spread of contagious diseases, or the threat of international boycotts.
Our international activities represented approximately 7.1% of consolidated net income and 8.5% of our net
operating income, or NOI, for the year ended December 31, 2021. To the extent that we expand our international
activities, the above risks could increase in significance, which in turn could have a material adverse effect on us.
We face risks associated with the acquisition, development, redevelopment and expansion of
properties.
We regularly acquire and develop new properties and redevelop and expand existing properties, and these
activities are subject to various risks. We may not be successful in pursuing acquisition, development or
redevelopment/expansion opportunities. In addition, newly acquired, developed or redeveloped/expanded properties
may not perform as well as expected, impacting our anticipated return on investment. We are subject to other risks in
connection with any acquisition, development and redevelopment/expansion activities, including the following:
●acquisition or construction costs of a project may be higher than projected, potentially making the project
unfeasible or unprofitable;
Table of Contents
17●development, redevelopment or expansions may take considerably longer than expected, delaying the
commencement and amount of income from the property;
●we may not be able to obtain financing or to refinance loans on favorable terms, or at all;
●we may be unable to obtain zoning, occupancy or other governmental approvals;
●occupancy rates and rents may not meet our projections and the project may not be accretive; and
●we may need the consent of third parties such as department stores, anchor tenants, mortgage lenders and
joint venture partners, and those consents may be withheld.
If a development or redevelopment/expansion project is unsuccessful, either because it is not meeting our
expectations when operational or was not completed according to the project planning, we could lose our investment
in the project. Further, if we guarantee the property’s financing, our loss could exceed our investment in the project.
In the event that these risks were realized at the same time at multiple properties, we could be materially and
adversely affected.
Real estate investments are relatively illiquid.
Our properties represent a substantial portion of our total consolidated assets. These investments are
relatively illiquid. As a result, our ability to sell one or more of our properties or investments in real estate in response
to any changes in economic, industry, or other conditions may be limited. The real estate market is affected by many
factors, such as general economic conditions, availability and terms of financing, interest rates and other factors,
including supply and demand for space, that are beyond our control. If we want to sell a property, we cannot assure
you that we will be able to dispose of it in the desired time period, or at all, or that the sales price of a property will be
attractive at the relevant time or exceed the carrying value of our investment. Moreover, if a property is mortgaged, we
may not be able to obtain a release of the lien on that property without the payment of the associated debt and/or a
substantial prepayment penalty, which could restrict our ability to dispose of the property, even though the sale might
otherwise be desirable.
Risks Relating to Debt and the Financial Markets
We have a substantial debt burden that could affect our future operations.
As of December 31, 2021, our consolidated mortgages and unsecured indebtedness, excluding related
premium, discount and debt issuance costs, totaled $25.4 billion. As a result of this indebtedness, we are required to
use a substantial portion of our cash flows for debt service, including selected repayment at scheduled maturities,
which limits our ability to use those cash flows to fund the growth of our business. We are also subject to the risks
normally associated with debt financing, including the risk that our cash flows from operations will be insufficient to
meet required debt service or that we will be able to refinance such indebtedness on acceptable terms, or at all. Our
debt service costs generally will not be reduced if developments at the applicable property, such as the entry of new
competitors or the loss of major tenants, cause a reduction in the income from the property. Our indebtedness could
also have other adverse consequences on us, including reducing our access to capital or increasing our vulnerability
to general adverse economic, industry and market conditions. In addition, if a property is mortgaged to secure
payment of indebtedness and income from such property is insufficient to pay that indebtedness, the property could
be foreclosed upon by the mortgagee resulting in a loss of income and a decline in our total asset value. If any of the
foregoing occurs, we could be materially and adversely affected.
The agreements that govern our indebtedness contain various covenants that impose restrictions on
us that might affect our ability to operate freely.
We have a variety of unsecured debt, including the Credit Facilities, senior unsecured notes and commercial
paper, and secured property level debt. Certain of the agreements that govern our indebtedness contain covenants,
including, among other things, limitations on our ability to incur secured and unsecured indebtedness, sell all or
substantially all of our assets and engage in mergers and certain acquisitions. In addition, certain of the agreements
that govern our indebtedness contain financial covenants that require us to maintain certain financial ratios, including
certain coverage ratios. These covenants may restrict our ability to pursue certain business initiatives or certain
transactions that might otherwise be advantageous to us. In addition, our ability to comply with these provisions might
be affected by events beyond our control. Failure to comply with any of our financing covenants could result in an
event of default, which, if not cured or waived, could accelerate the related indebtedness as well as other of our
indebtedness, which could have a material adverse effect on us.
Table of Contents
18Disruption in the capital and credit markets may adversely affect our ability to access external
financings for our growth and ongoing debt service requirements.
We depend on external financings, principally debt financings, to fund the growth of our business and to
ensure that we can meet ongoing maturities of our outstanding debt. Our access to financing depends on our credit
ratings, the willingness of lending institutions and other debt investors to grant credit to us and conditions in the
capital markets in general. An economic recession may cause extreme volatility and disruption in the capital and
credit markets. We rely upon the Credit Facilities as sources of funding for numerous transactions. Our access to
these funds is dependent upon the ability of each of the participants to the Credit Facilities to meet their funding
commitments to us. When markets are volatile, access to capital and credit markets could be disrupted over an
extended period of time and one or more financial institutions may not have the available capital to meet their
previous commitments to us. The failure of one or more participants to the Credit Facilities to meet their funding
commitments to us could have a material adverse effect on us, including as a result of making it difficult to obtain the
financing we may need for future growth and/or meeting our debt service requirements. We cannot assure you that
we will be able to obtain the financing we need for the future growth of our business or to meet our debt service
requirements, or that a sufficient amount of financing will be available to us on favorable terms, or at all.
Adverse changes in our credit ratings could affect our borrowing capacity and borrowing terms.
The Operating Partnership’s outstanding senior unsecured notes, the Credit Facilities, the Commercial Paper
program, and Simon’s preferred stock are periodically rated by nationally recognized credit rating agencies. The credit
ratings are based on our operating performance, liquidity and leverage ratios, financial condition and prospects, and
other factors viewed by the credit rating agencies as relevant to us and our industry and the economic outlook in
general. Our credit ratings can affect the amount of capital we can access, as well as the terms of any financing we
obtain. Since we depend primarily on debt financing to fund the growth of our business, an adverse change in our
credit ratings, including actual changes and changes in outlook, or even the initiation of a review of our credit ratings
that could result in an adverse change, could have a material adverse effect on us.
An increase in interest rates would increase our interest costs on variable rate debt and could
adversely impact our ability to refinance existing debt on attractive terms, or at all; our hedging
interest rate protection arrangements may not effectively limit our interest rate risk.
As of December 31, 2021, we had approximately $2.0 billion of outstanding consolidated indebtedness that
bears interest at variable rates, and we may incur more variable rate indebtedness in the future. If interest rates
increase, then so would the interest costs on our unhedged variable rate debt, which could adversely affect our cash
flows and our ability to pay principal and interest on our debt and our ability to make distributions to our stockholders.
Further, rising interest rates could limit our ability to refinance existing debt when it matures or significantly increase
our future interest expense.
We selectively manage our exposure to interest rate risk by a combination of interest rate protection
agreements to effectively fix or cap all or a portion of our variable rate debt. In addition, we refinance fixed rate debt at
times when we believe rates and other terms are appropriate. Our efforts to manage these exposures may not be
successful.
Our use of interest rate hedging arrangements to manage risk associated with interest rate volatility may
expose us to additional risks, including a risk that a counterparty to a hedging arrangement may fail to honor its
obligations or that we could be required to fund our contractual payment obligations under such arrangements in
relatively large amounts or on short notice. Developing an effective interest rate risk strategy is complex and no
strategy can completely insulate us from risks associated with interest rate fluctuations. There can be no assurance
that our hedging activities will have the desired beneficial impact on our results of operations, liquidity and financial
condition. Termination of these hedging agreements typically involves costs, such as transaction fees or breakage
costs.
We may be adversely affected by developments in the London Inter-bank Offered Rate (LIBOR) market,
changes in the methods by which LIBOR is determined or the use of alternative reference rates.
As of December 31, 2021, approximately 2.0% or $501.4 million of our debt outstanding was indexed to
LIBOR.  In 2021 we amended the Credit Facility and the Supplemental Facility to transition the borrowing rates from
LIBOR to successor benchmark indexes.  In 2017, the U.K. Financial Conduct Authority (the “FCA”) announced that it
intends to phase out LIBOR, and in 2021, it announced that all LIBOR settings will either cease to be provided by any
administrator or no longer be representative immediately after December 31, 2021, in the case of 1 week and 2
month USD setting, and immediately after June 30, 2023, in the case of the remaining USD settings.  The U.S.
Federal Reserve (the “Federal Reserve”) has also advised banks to cease entering into new contracts that use USD
LIBOR as a reference rate.  The Alternative Refinance Rate Committee, a committee convened by the Federal
Reserve that includes major market
Table of Contents
19participants, has identified the Secured Overnight Financing Rate (“SOFR”), a new index calculated by short-term
repurchase agreements, backed by U.S. Treasury securities, as its preferred alternative rate for LIBOR in the U.S.
 Working groups formed by financial regulators in other jurisdictions, including the U.K., the European Union, Japan
and Switzerland, have also recommended alternatives to LIBOR denominated in their local currencies.  Although
SOFR appears to be the preferred replacement rate for USD LIBOR, it is unclear if other benchmarks may emerge or
if other rates will be adopted outside of the United States.  At this time, it is not possible to predict how markets will
respond to SOFR or other alternative reference rates as the transition away from the LIBOR benchmark is anticipated
in coming years.  Accordingly, the outcome of these reforms is uncertain and any changes in the methods by which
LIBOR is determined or regulatory activity related to LIBOR’s phaseout could cause LIBOR to perform differently than
in the past or cease to exist.  The consequences of these developments cannot be entirely predicted, and there can
be no assurance that they will not result in financial market disruptions, significant increases in benchmark interest
rates, substantially higher financing costs or a shortage of available debt financing, any of which could have an
adverse effect on us, which currently would be limited by our relatively low exposure to variable rate LIBOR-based
debt.
Risks Relating to Income Taxes
Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership have elected to be taxed as REITs in the
United States. The failure to maintain Simon’s or the Subsidiary REITs’ qualifications as REITs or
changes in applicable tax laws or regulations could result in adverse tax consequences.
In the United States, Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership have elected to be taxed as
REITs under Sections 856 through 860 of the Internal Revenue Code. We believe that Simon and these subsidiaries,
or the Subsidiary REITs, have been organized and have operated in a manner which allows them to qualify for
taxation as REITs under the Internal Revenue Code. We intend to continue to operate in this manner. However,
qualification and taxation as REITs depend upon the ability of Simon and the Subsidiary REITs to satisfy several
requirements (some of which are outside our control), including tests related to our annual operating results, asset
diversification, distribution levels and diversity of stock ownership. The various REIT qualification tests required by the
Internal Revenue Code are highly technical and complex. Accordingly, there can be no assurance that Simon or any
of the Subsidiary REITs has operated in accordance with these requirements or will continue to operate in a manner
so as to qualify or remain qualified as a REIT.
If Simon or any of the Subsidiary REITs fail to comply with those provisions, Simon or any such Subsidiary
REIT may be subject to monetary penalties or ultimately to possible disqualification as REITs. If such events occur,
and if available relief provisions do not apply:
●Simon or any such subsidiary will not be allowed a deduction for distributions to stockholders in computing
taxable income;
●Simon or any such subsidiary will be subject to corporate-level income tax on taxable income at the
corporate rate;
●Simon or any such Subsidiary REIT could be subject to the federal alternative minimum tax for taxable
years prior to 2018; and
●unless entitled to relief under relevant statutory provisions, Simon or any such subsidiary will also be
disqualified from treatment as a REIT for the four taxable years following the year during which qualification
was lost.  
Any such corporate tax liability could be substantial and would reduce the amount of cash available for, among
other things, our operations and distributions to stockholders. In addition, if Simon fails to qualify as a REIT, it will not
be required to make distributions to our stockholders. Moreover, a failure by any subsidiary of the Operating
Partnership that has elected to be taxed as a REIT to qualify as a REIT would also cause Simon to fail to qualify as a
REIT, and the same adverse consequences would apply to it and its stockholders. Failure by Simon or any of the
Subsidiary REITs to qualify as a REIT also could impair our ability to expand our business and raise capital, which
could materially and adversely affect us.
Additionally, we are subject to certain income-based taxes, both domestically and internationally, and other
taxes, including state and local taxes, franchise taxes, and withholding taxes on dividends from certain of our
international
Table of Contents
20investments. We currently follow local tax laws and regulations in various domestic and international jurisdictions.
Should these laws or regulations change, the amount of taxes we pay may increase accordingly.
If the Operating Partnership fails to qualify as a partnership for federal income tax purposes, we would
cease to qualify as a REIT and suffer other adverse consequences.
We believe that the Operating Partnership is treated as a partnership for federal income tax purposes. As a
partnership, the Operating Partnership is not subject to federal income tax on its income. Instead, each of its partners,
including us, is allocated, and may be required to pay tax with respect to, such partner’s share of its income. We
cannot assure you that the Internal Revenue Service, or the IRS, will not challenge the status of the Operating
Partnership or any other subsidiary partnership or limited liability company in which we own an interest as a
disregarded entity or partnership for federal income tax purposes, or that a court would not sustain such a challenge.
If the IRS were successful in treating the Operating Partnership or any such other subsidiary as an entity taxable as a
corporation for federal income tax purposes, we would fail to meet the gross income tests and certain of the asset
tests applicable to REITs and, accordingly, we would likely cease to qualify as a REIT. Also, the failure of the
Operating Partnership or any subsidiary partnerships or limited liability company to qualify as a disregarded entity or
partnership for applicable income tax purposes could cause it to become subject to federal and state corporate
income tax, which would reduce significantly the amount of cash available for debt service and for distribution to its
partners or members, including us.
Our ownership of TRSs is subject to certain restrictions, and we will be required to pay a 100% penalty
tax on certain income or deductions if our transactions with our TRSs are not conducted on arm’s-
length terms.
We own securities in taxable REIT subsidiaries, or TRSs, and may acquire securities in additional TRSs in the
future. A TRS is a corporation other than a REIT in which a REIT directly or indirectly holds stock, and that has made
a joint election with such REIT to be treated as a taxable REIT subsidiary. If a TRS owns more than 35% of the total
voting power or value of the outstanding securities of another corporation, such other corporation will also be treated
as a TRS. Other than some activities relating to lodging and health care facilities, a TRS may generally engage in any
business, including the provision of customary or non-customary services to tenants of its parent REIT. A TRS is
subject to federal income tax as a regular C corporation. In addition, a 100% excise tax will be imposed on certain
transactions between a TRS and its parent REIT that are not conducted on an arm’s length basis.
A REIT’s ownership of securities of a TRS is not subject to the 5% or 10% asset tests applicable to REITs. Not
more than 25% of the value of Simon’s or any Subsidiary REIT’s total assets may be represented by securities
(including securities of TRSs), other than those securities includable in the 75% asset test, and not more than 20% of
the value of our total assets or the assets of any Subsidiary REIT may be represented by securities of TRSs. We
anticipate that the aggregate value of the stock and securities of any TRS and other nonqualifying assets that Simon
or each such Subsidiary REIT owns will be less than 25% (or 20%, as applicable) of the value of Simon’s or such
subsidiary’s total assets, and we will monitor the value of these investments to ensure compliance with applicable
ownership limitations. In addition, we intend to structure transactions with any TRSs that we own to ensure that they
are entered into on arm’s length terms to avoid incurring the 100% excise tax described above. There can be no
assurance, however, that we will be able to comply with the above limitations or to avoid application of the 100%
excise tax discussed above.
Dividends payable by REITs generally do not qualify for the reduced tax rates available for some
dividends, which may negatively affect the value of our shares.
Income from “qualified dividends” payable to U.S. stockholders that are individuals, trusts and estates are
generally subject to tax at preferential rates, currently at a maximum federal rate of 20%. Dividends payable by REITs,
however, generally are not eligible for the preferential tax rates applicable to qualified dividend income. Under the Tax
Cuts and Jobs Act, or the TCJA, however, U.S. stockholders that are individuals, trusts and estates generally may
deduct up to 20% of the ordinary dividends (e.g., dividends not designated as capital gain dividends or qualified
dividend income) received from a REIT for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017 and before January 1,
2026. Although this deduction reduces the effective tax rate applicable to certain dividends paid by REITs (generally
to 29.6% assuming the shareholder is subject to the 37% maximum rate), such tax rate is still higher than the tax rate
applicable to corporate dividends that constitute qualified dividend income. Accordingly, investors who are individuals,
trusts and estates may perceive investments in REITs to be relatively less attractive than investments in the stocks of
non-REIT corporations that pay dividends, which could materially and adversely affect the value of the shares of
REITs, including the per share trading price of our common stock.
The tax imposed on REITs engaging in “prohibited transactions” may limit our ability to engage in
transactions which would be treated as sales for U.S. federal income tax purposes.
A REIT’s net income from prohibited transactions is subject to a 100% penalty tax. In general, prohibited
transactions
Table of Contents
21are sales or other dispositions of property, other than foreclosure property, held primarily for sale to customers in the
ordinary course of business. Although we do not intend to hold any properties that would be characterized as held for
sale to customers in the ordinary course of our business, unless a sale or disposition qualifies under certain statutory
safe harbors, such characterization is a factual determination and no guarantee can be given that the IRS, would
agree with our characterization of our properties or that we will always be able to make use of the available safe
harbors.
REIT distribution requirements could adversely affect our liquidity and our ability to execute our
business plan.
In order for Simon and the Subsidiary REITs to qualify to be taxed as REITs, and assuming that certain other
requirements are also satisfied, Simon and each such Subsidiary REIT generally must distribute at least 90% of their
respective REIT taxable income, determined without regard to the dividends paid deduction and excluding any net
capital gains, to their respective equity holders each year. To this point, Simon and each such Subsidiary REIT have
historically distributed at least 100% of its taxable income and thereby avoided income tax altogether. To the extent
that Simon or any such Subsidiary REIT satisfies this distribution requirement and qualifies for taxation as a REIT, but
distributes less than 100% of its REIT taxable income, Simon or such subsidiary will be subject to U.S. federal
corporate income tax on its undistributed net taxable income and could be subject to a 4% nondeductible excise tax if
the actual amount that is distributed to equity holders in a calendar year is less than the minimum required distribution
amount. We intend to make distributions to the equity holders of Simon and the Subsidiary REITs to comply with the
REIT requirements of the Internal Revenue Code.
From time to time, Simon and the Subsidiary REITs might generate taxable income greater than their
respective cash flow as a result of differences in timing between the recognition of taxable income and the actual
receipt of cash or the effect of nondeductible capital expenditures, the creation of reserves, or required debt or
amortization payments. If Simon or the Subsidiary REITs do not have other funds available in these situations, Simon
or such subsidiaries could be required to access capital on unfavorable terms (the receipt of which cannot be
assured), sell assets at disadvantageous prices, distribute amounts that would otherwise be invested in future
acquisitions, capital expenditures or repayment of debt, or make taxable distributions of capital stock or debt
securities to make distributions sufficient to enable them to pay out enough of their respective REIT taxable income to
satisfy the REIT distribution requirement and avoid corporate income tax and the 4% excise tax in a particular year.
These alternatives could increase costs or reduce our equity. Further, amounts distributed will not be available to fund
the growth of our business. Thus, compliance with the REIT requirements may adversely affect our liquidity and our
ability to execute our business plan.
Complying with REIT requirements might cause us to forgo otherwise attractive acquisition
opportunities or liquidate otherwise attractive investments.
To qualify to be taxed as REITs for U.S. federal income tax purposes, Simon and the Subsidiary REITs must
ensure that, at the end of each calendar quarter, at least 75% of the value of their respective assets consist of cash,
cash items, government securities and “real estate assets” (as defined in the Internal Revenue Code), including
certain mortgage loans and securities. The remainder of their respective investments (other than government
securities, qualified real estate assets and securities issued by a TRS) generally cannot include more than 10% of the
outstanding voting securities of any one issuer or more than 10% of the total value of the outstanding securities of any
one issuer.
Additionally, in general, no more than 5% of the value of Simon’s and the Subsidiary REITs’ total assets (other
than government securities, qualified real estate assets and securities issued by a TRS) can consist of the securities
of any one issuer, and no more than 20% of the value of their respective total assets can be represented by securities
of one or more TRSs. If Simon or any of the Subsidiary REITs fails to comply with these requirements at the end of
any calendar quarter, Simon or any such Subsidiary REIT must correct the failure within 30 days after the end of the
calendar quarter or qualify for certain statutory relief provisions to avoid losing its REIT qualification and suffering
adverse tax consequences. As a result, we might be required to liquidate or forgo otherwise attractive investments.
These actions could have the effect of reducing our income and amounts available for distribution to equity holders.
Moreover, if Simon or the Subsidiary REITs are compelled to liquidate their investments to meet any of the asset,
income or distribution tests, or to repay obligations to lenders, Simon or such subsidiaries may be unable to comply
with one or more of the requirements applicable to REITs or may be subject to a 100% tax on any resulting gain if
such sales constitute prohibited transactions.
In addition to the asset tests set forth above, to qualify to be taxed as REITs, Simon and the Subsidiary REITs
must continually satisfy tests concerning, among other things, the sources of their respective income, the amounts
they distribute to equity holders and the ownership of their respective shares. We might be unable to pursue
investments that would be otherwise advantageous to us in order to satisfy the source-of-income or asset-
diversification requirements for qualifying as REITs. Thus, compliance with the REIT requirements may hinder our
ability to make certain attractive investments.
Table of Contents
22Partnership tax audit rules could have a material adverse effect on us.
The Bipartisan Budget Act of 2015 changed the rules applicable to U.S. federal income tax audits of
partnerships. Under the rules, among other changes and subject to certain exceptions, any audit adjustment to items
of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit of a partnership (and any partner’s distributive share thereof) is determined,
and taxes, interest, or penalties attributable thereto could be assessed and collected, at the partnership level. Absent
available elections, it is possible that a partnership in which we directly or indirectly invest, could be required to pay
additional taxes, interest and penalties as a result of an audit adjustment, and we, as a direct or indirect partner of
these partnerships, could be required to bear the economic burden of those taxes, interest, and penalties even
though Simon and the Subsidiary REITs, as REITs, may not otherwise have been required to pay additional
corporate-level taxes had they owned the assets of the partnership directly. The partnership tax audit rules apply to
the Operating Partnership and its subsidiaries that are classified as partnerships for U.S. federal income tax
purposes. The changes created by these rules are sweeping and, accordingly, there can be no assurance that these
rules will not have a material adverse effect on us.
Legislative, administrative, regulatory or other actions affecting REITs, including positions taken by
the IRS, could have a material adverse effect on us and our investors.
The rules dealing with U.S. federal income taxation are constantly under review by persons involved in the
legislative process, and by the IRS and the U.S. Department of the Treasury, or the Treasury. Changes to the tax laws
or interpretations thereof by the IRS and the Treasury, with or without retroactive application, could materially and
adversely affect us and our investors. New legislation (including the TCJA, and any technical corrections legislation),
Treasury regulations, administrative interpretations or court decisions could significantly and negatively affect the
ability of Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership to qualify to be taxed as REITs and/or the U.S.
federal income tax consequences to us and our investors of such qualification.
The TCJA has significantly changed the U.S. federal income taxation of U.S. businesses and their owners,
including REITs and their stockholders. A change made by the TCJA that could affect us and our stockholders is that it
generally limits the deduction for net business interest expense in excess of 30% of a business’s adjusted taxable
income except for taxpayers that engage in certain real estate businesses and elect out of this rule (provided that
such electing taxpayers must use an alternative depreciation system for certain property).
Risks Relating to Joint Ventures
We have limited control with respect to some properties that are partially owned or managed by third
parties, which may adversely affect our ability to sell or refinance them.
As of December 31, 2021, we owned interests in 101 income-producing properties with other parties. Of those,
17 properties are included in our consolidated financial statements. We apply the equity method of accounting to the
other 84 properties (the joint venture properties) and our investments in Klépierre (a publicly traded, Paris-based real
estate company) and The Taubman Realty Group, LLC, or TRG, as well as our investments in certain entities involved
in retail operations, such as J.C. Penney and SPARC Group; intellectual property and licensing ventures, such as
Authentic Brands Group, LLC, or ABG, and Eddie Bauer Ipco; and an e-commerce venture Rue Gilt Groupe, or RGG,
(collectively, our other platform investments).  We serve as general partner or property manager for 53 of these 84
joint venture properties; however, certain major decisions, such as approving the operating budget and selling,
refinancing, and redeveloping the properties, require the consent of the other owners. Of the joint venture properties
for which we do not serve as general partner or property manager, 23 are in our international joint ventures. These
international properties are managed locally by joint ventures in which we share control of the properties with our
partner. The other owners have participating rights that we consider substantive for purposes of determining control
over the joint venture properties’ assets. The remaining joint venture properties, Klépierre, TRG, and our joint
ventures with ABG, J.C. Penney, RGG, and SPARC Group are managed by third parties.
These investments, and other future similar investments, could involve risks that would not be present were a
third party not involved, including the possibility that partners or other owners might become bankrupt, suffer a
deterioration in their creditworthiness, or fail to fund their share of required capital contributions. If one of our partners
or other owners in these investments were to become bankrupt, we may be precluded from taking certain actions
regarding our investments without prior court approval, which at a minimum may delay the actions we would or might
want to take. Additionally, partners or other owners could have economic or other business interests or goals that are
inconsistent with our own business interests or goals, and could be in a position to take actions contrary to our
policies or objectives.
These investments, and other future similar investments, also have the potential risk of creating impasses on
Table of Contents
23decisions, such as a sale, financing or development, because neither we nor our partner or other owner has full
control over the partnership or joint venture. Disputes between us and partners or other owners might result in
litigation or arbitration that could increase our expenses and prevent Simon’s officers and/or directors from focusing
their time and efforts on our business. Consequently, actions by, or disputes with, partners or other owners might
result in subjecting properties owned by the partnership or joint venture to additional risk. In addition, we risk the
possibility of being liable for the actions of our partners or other owners.  
The Operating Partnership guarantees debt or otherwise provides support for a number of joint
venture properties.
Joint venture debt is the liability of the joint venture and is typically secured by a mortgage on the joint venture
property, which is non-recourse to us. Nevertheless, the joint venture’s failure to satisfy its debt obligations could
result in the loss of our investment therein. As of December 31, 2021, the Operating Partnership guaranteed joint
venture-related mortgage indebtedness of $209.9 million. A default by a joint venture under its debt obligations would
expose us to liability under a guaranty. We may elect to fund cash needs of a joint venture through equity
contributions (generally on a basis proportionate to our ownership interests), advances or partner loans, although
such fundings are not typically required contractually or otherwise.  
Risks Relating to Environmental Matters
As owners of real estate, we can face liabilities for environmental contamination, and our efforts to
identify environmental liabilities may not be successful.
Many of our properties contain, or at one time contained, asbestos containing materials or underground
storage tanks (primarily related to auto service center establishments or emergency electrical generation equipment),
and as a result we may be subject to regulatory action in connection with U.S. federal, state and local laws and
regulations relating to hazardous or toxic substances. We may also be held liable to third parties for personal injury or
property damage incurred by the parties in connection with any such substances. The costs of investigation, removal
or remediation of hazardous or toxic substances, and related liabilities, may be substantial and could materially and
adversely affect us. The presence of hazardous or toxic substances, or the failure to remediate the related
contamination, may also adversely affect our ability to sell, lease or redevelop a property or to borrow money using a
property as collateral.
Although we believe that our portfolio is in substantial compliance with U.S. federal, state and local
environmental laws and regulations regarding hazardous or toxic substances, this belief is based on limited testing.
Nearly all of our properties have been subjected to Phase I or similar environmental audits. These environmental
audits have not revealed, nor are we aware of, any environmental liability that we believe is reasonably likely to have
a material adverse effect on us. However, we cannot assure you that:
●previous environmental studies with respect to the portfolio reveal all potential environmental liabilities;
●any previous owner, occupant or tenant of a property did not create any material environmental condition
not known to us;
●the current environmental condition of the portfolio will not be affected by tenants and occupants, by the
condition of nearby properties, or by other unrelated third parties; or
●future uses or conditions (including, without limitation, changes in applicable environmental laws and
regulations or the interpretation thereof) will not result in environmental liabilities.
We face risks associated with climate change.
Due to changes in weather patterns caused by climate change, our properties in certain markets could
experience increases in storm intensity and rising sea levels. Over time, climate change could result in volatile or
decreased demand for retail space at certain of our properties or, in extreme cases, our inability to operate the
properties at all. Climate change may also have indirect effects on our business by increasing the cost of (or making
unavailable) insurance on favorable terms, or at all, increasing the cost of energy at our properties or requiring us to
spend funds to repair and protect our properties against such risks. Moreover, compliance with new laws or
regulations related to climate change, including compliance with “green” building codes, may require us to make
improvements to our existing properties or increase taxes and fees assessed on us or our properties.
Table of Contents
24Some of our properties are subject to potential natural or other disasters.
A number of our properties are located in areas subject to a higher risk of natural disasters such as
earthquakes, fires, hurricanes, floods, tornados, hail or tsunamis. The occurrence of natural disasters, which could
become more intense and more volatile in light of climate change, can adversely impact operations and
development/redevelopment projects at our properties, increase investment costs to repair or replace damaged
properties, increase future property insurance costs and negatively impact the tenant demand for lease space. If
insurance is unavailable to us or is unavailable on acceptable terms, or our insurance is not adequate to cover losses
from these events, we could be materially and adversely affected.
Other Factors Affecting Our Business
Some of our potential losses may not be covered by insurance.
We maintain insurance coverage with third-party carriers who provide a portion of the coverage for specific
layers of potential losses, including commercial general liability, fire, flood, extended coverage and rental loss
insurance on all of our properties in the United States as well as cyber coverage. The initial portion of coverage,
excess of policy deductibles, not provided by third-party carriers is either insured through our wholly-owned captive
insurance company or other financial arrangements controlled by us. A third party carrier has, in turn, agreed to
provide, if required, evidence of coverage for this layer of losses under the terms and conditions of the carrier’s policy.
A similar policy either written through our captive insurance company or other financial arrangements controlled by us
also provides initial coverage for property insurance and certain windstorm risks at the properties located in coastal
windstorm locations.
There are some types of losses, including lease and other contract claims, which generally are not insured or
are subject to large deductibles. If an uninsured loss or a loss in excess of insured limits occurs, we could lose all or a
portion of the capital we have invested in a property, as well as the anticipated future revenue it could generate but
may remain obligated for any mortgage debt or other financial obligation related to the property.
We currently maintain insurance coverage against acts of terrorism on all of our properties in the United States
on an “all risk” basis in the amount of up to $1 billion. Despite the existence of this insurance coverage, any
threatened or actual terrorist attacks where we operate could materially and adversely affect our property values,
revenues, consumer traffic and tenant sales.
We face risks associated with security breaches through cyber ‑attacks, cyber intrusions or otherwise,
as well as other significant disruptions of our information technology (IT) networks and related
systems.
Our IT networks and related systems are essential to the operation of our business and our ability to perform
day-to-day operations and, in some cases, may be critical to the operations of certain of our tenants. We face risks
associated with security breaches, whether through cyber-attacks or cyber intrusions over the Internet, malware,
computer viruses, hardware or software corruption or failure or poor product or vendor/developer selection (including
a failure of security controls incorporated into or applied to such hardware or software), service provider error or
failure, intentional or unintentional actions by employees (including the failure to follow our security protocols) and
other significant disruptions of our IT networks and related systems. Although we make efforts to maintain the security
and integrity of these types of IT networks and related systems, and we have implemented various measures to
manage the risk of a security breach or disruption, there can be no assurance that our security efforts and measures
will be effective or that attempted security breaches or disruptions would not be successful or damaging. Even the
most well protected information, networks, systems and facilities remain potentially vulnerable because the
techniques used in such attempted security breaches evolve and generally are not recognized until launched against
a target, and in some cases are designed not to be detected and, in fact, may not be detected. Accordingly, we may
be unable to anticipate these techniques or to implement adequate security barriers or other preventative measures,
and thus it is impossible for us to entirely mitigate this risk.
The risk of a security breach or significant disruption has generally increased due to our increased reliance on
technology, a rise in the number, intensity, and sophistication of attempted attacks globally, and the remote working
environment throughout the COVID-19 pandemic. A breach or significant and extended disruption in the functioning of
our systems, including our primary website, could damage our reputation and cause us to lose customers, tenants
and revenues, generate third party claims, cause operational disruption, result in the unintended and/or unauthorized
public disclosure or the misappropriation of proprietary, personal identifying and confidential information, and require
us to incur significant expenses to address and remediate or otherwise resolve these kinds of issues. We may not be
able to recover these expenses in whole or in any part from our service providers or responsible parties, or their or
our insurers. Additionally, cyber-attacks perpetrated against our tenants, including unauthorized access to customers’
credit card data and other confidential information, could diminish consumer confidence and spending and materially
and adversely affect us.
Table of Contents
25Our success depends, in part, on our ability to attract and retain talented employees, and the loss of
any one of our key personnel could adversely impact our business.
The success of our business depends, in part, on the leadership and performance of our executive
management team and key employees, including our CEO, who operate without the existence of employment
agreements.  Many of our senior executives have extensive experience and strong reputations in the real estate
industry, which aid us in identifying opportunities and negotiating with tenants. Our ability to attract, retain and
motivate talented employees could significantly impact our future performance. Competition for these individuals is
intense, and we cannot assure you that we will retain our executive management team and other key employees or
that we will be able to attract and retain other highly qualified individuals for these positions in the future. Losing any
one or more of these persons could adversely affect our business, diminish our opportunities and weaken our
relationships with lenders, business partners, existing and prospective tenants and others, which could have a
material adverse effect on us.
Provisions in Simon’s charter and by ‑laws and in the Operating Partnership’s partnership agreement
could prevent a change of control.
Simon’s charter contains a general restriction on the accumulation of shares in excess of 8% of its capital
stock. The charter permits the members of the Simon family and related persons to own up to 18% of Simon’s capital
stock. Ownership is determined by the lower of the number of outstanding shares, voting power or value controlled.
Simon’s Board of Directors may, by majority vote, permit exceptions to those levels in circumstances where Simon’s
Board of Directors determines that Simon’s ability to qualify as a REIT will not be jeopardized. These restrictions on
ownership may have the effect of delaying, deferring or preventing a transaction or a change in control that might
otherwise be in the best interest of Simon’s stockholders or the Operating Partnership’s unitholders or preferred
unitholders. Other provisions of Simon’s charter and by-laws could have the effect of delaying or preventing a change
of control even if some of Simon’s stockholders or the Operating Partnership’s unitholders or preferred unitholders
deem such a change to be in their best interests. These include provisions preventing holders of Simon’s common
stock from acting by written consent and requiring that up to four directors in the aggregate may be elected by holders
of Class B common stock. In addition, certain provisions of the Operating Partnership’s partnership agreement could
have the effect of delaying or preventing a change of control. These include a provision requiring the consent of a
majority in interest of units in order for Simon, as general partner of the Operating Partnership, to, among other
matters, engage in a merger transaction or sell all or substantially all of its assets.    
Item 1B.  Unresolved Staff Comments
None.
Table of Contents
26Item 2.  Properties
United States Properties
Our U.S. properties primarily consist of malls, Premium Outlets, The Mills, lifestyle centers and other retail
properties. These properties contain an aggregate of approximately 175.3 million square feet of gross leasable area,
or GLA.
Malls typically contain at least one department store anchor or a combination of anchors and big box retailers
with a wide variety of smaller stores connecting the anchors. Additional stores are usually located along the perimeter
of the parking area. Our 95 malls are generally enclosed centers and range in size from approximately 260,000 to
2.7 million square feet of GLA.
Premium Outlets generally contain a wide variety of designer and manufacturer stores located in open-air
centers. Our 69 Premium Outlets range in size from approximately 150,000 to 900,000 square feet of GLA. The
Premium Outlets are generally located within a close proximity to major metropolitan areas and/or tourist destinations.
The 14 properties in The Mills generally range in size from 1.2 million to 2.3 million square feet of GLA and are
located in major metropolitan areas. They have a combination of traditional mall, outlet center, big box retailers and
entertainment uses.
We also have interests in six lifestyle centers and 15 other retail properties. The lifestyle centers range in size
from 170,000 to 950,000 square feet of GLA. The other retail properties range in size from approximately 200,000 to
1.6 million square feet of GLA and are considered non-core to our business model.
As of December 31, 2021, approximately 93.4% of the owned GLA in malls and Premium Outlets was leased
and approximately 97.6% of the owned GLA for The Mills was leased.
We wholly own 131 of our properties, effectively control 10 properties in which we have a joint venture interest,
and hold the remaining 58 properties through unconsolidated joint venture interests. We are the managing or co-
managing general partner or member of 190 properties in the United States. Certain of our joint venture properties
are subject to various rights of first refusal, buy-sell provisions, put and call rights, or other sale or marketing rights for
partners which are customary in real estate partnership agreements and the industry. We and our partners in these
joint ventures may initiate these provisions (subject to any applicable lock up or similar restrictions) which may result
in either the sale of our interest or the use of available cash or borrowings, or the use of Operating Partnership units,
to acquire the joint venture interest from our partner.
We own an 80% noncontrolling interest in TRG, which has an interest in 20 regional, super-regional, and outlet
malls in the U.S. Our effective ownership in these properties, through our investment in TRG, ranges from 38.8% to
80%.
  
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
27The following property table summarizes certain data for our malls, Premium Outlets, The Mills, lifestyle centers and other retail
properties located in the United States, including Puerto Rico, as of December 31, 2021.
Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected Larger Retailers and Uses
Malls
1.Apple Blossom Mall  VA Winchester  Fee   49.1 % (4) Acquired
1999  81.8 %  473,672  Belk, JCPenney , AMC Cinemas
2.Auburn Mall  MA  Auburn  Fee   56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999  88.5 %  499,467  Macy's, Reliant Medical (15)
3.Aventura Mall (1)  FL Miami Beach
(Miami) Fee   33.3 % (4) Built 1983   95.5 %  2,125,689  Bloomingdale's, Macy's (8), JCPenney ,
Nordstrom, Equinox Fitness Clubs, AMC
Theatres
4.Barton Creek Square  TX Austin  Fee   100.0 % Built 1981   97.9 %  1,452,087  Nordstrom, Macy's , Dillard's (8), JCPenney , AMC
Theatres
5.Battlefield Mall  MO  Springfield  Fee and Ground Lease
(2056)  100.0 % Built 1970   93.1 %  1,207,129  Macy's, Dillard's (8), JCPenney
6.Bay Park Square  WI Green Bay  Fee   100.0 % Built 1980   97.0 %  691,143  Kohl's, Marcus Cinema 16, Dave & Buster's,
Steinhafel Furniture (6)
7.Brea Mall  CA  Brea (Los
Angeles) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  94.1 %  1,281,795  Nordstrom, Macy's (8), JCPenney
8.Briarwood Mall  MI Ann Arbor  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007  83.1 %  978,053  Macy's, JCPenney , Von Maur , Hilton Garden Inn
(15), Towne Place Suites by Marriott (15)
9.Brickell City Centre  FL Miami  Fee   25.0 % (4) Built 2016   93.4 %  475,606  Saks Fifth Avenue , Cinemex, EAST  Miami Hotel
(15), Luna Park
10.Broadway Square  TX Tyler  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1994  100.0 %  608,739  Dillard's, JCPenney , Dick's Sporting Goods,
HomeGoods, Party City
11.Burlington Mall  MA  Burlington
(Boston) Fee and Ground Lease
(2026) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1998  94.6 %  1,209,347  Macy's, Nordstrom, Crate & Barrel, Primark,
Arhaus Furniture
12.Cape Cod Mall  MA  Hyannis  Fee and Ground Leases
(2029-2073) (7)  56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999  87.1 %  712,338  Macy's (8), Best Buy, Marshalls, Barnes & Noble,
Regal Cinema, Target, Dick's Sporting Goods,
Planet Fitness
13.Castleton Square  IN Indianapolis  Fee   100.0 % Built 1972   93.7 %  1,384,395  Macy's, Von Maur , JCPenney , Dick's Sporting
Goods, AMC Theatres
14.Cielo V ista Mall  TX El Paso  Fee and Ground Lease
(2027) (7)  100.0 % Built 1974   99.8 %  1,244,987  Macy's, Dillard's (8), JCPenney , Sears, Cinemark
Theatres
15.Coconut Point  FL Estero  Fee   50.0 % (4) Built 2006   85.9 %  1,197,444  Dillard's, Barnes & Noble, Best Buy, DSW , Office
Max, PetSmart, Ross, T.J. Maxx, Hollywood
Theatres, Super Target, Michael's, Total Wine &
More, JoAnn Fabrics, Christmas Tree Shops (6),
Home Centric (6), Hyatt Place Coconut Point
(15), TownePlace Suites by Marriott (15)
16.College Mall  IN Bloomington  Fee and Ground Lease
(2048) (7)  100.0 % Built 1965   79.2 %  609,768  Target, Dick's Sporting Goods, Bed Bath &
Beyond, Fresh Thyme
17.Columbia Center  WA Kennewick  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1987  92.5 %  733,755  Macy's (8), JCPe nney , Barnes & Noble, DSW ,
Home Goods, Dick's Sporting Goods
18.Copley Place  MA  Boston  Fee   94.4 %
(11)Acquired
2002  90.1 %  1,263,627  Neiman Marcus, Saks Fifth Avenue Men's,
Boston Marriott Copley Place (15), The Westin
Copley Place (15)
19.Coral Square  FL Coral Springs
(Miami) Fee   97.2 % Built 1984   91.4 %  944,159  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Kohl's
20.Cordova Mall  FL Pensacola  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  95.7 %  925,518  Dillard's, Belk, Best Buy, Bed Bath & Beyond,
Cost Plus World Market, Ross, Dick's Sporting
Goods
21.Dadeland Mall  FL Miami  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
1997  96.7 %  1,514,626  Saks Fifth Avenue, Macy's (8), JCPenney , AC
Hotel by Marriott
22.Del Amo Fashion Center  CA  Torrance
(Los
Angeles) Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007  93.9 %  2,519,601  Nordstrom, Macy's (8), JCPenney , Marshalls,
Barnes & Noble, JoAnn Fabrics, AMC Theatres,
Dick's Sporting Goods, Dave & Buster's, Mitsuwa
Marketplace
23.Domain, The  TX Austin  Fee   100.0 % Built 2006   94.0 %  1,234,766  Neiman Marcus, Macy's, Dillard's, Dick's
Sporting Goods, iPic Theaters, Arhaus Furniture,
Punch Bowl Social, Westin Austin at The
Domain, Lone Star Court (15), (16)
24.Empire Mall  SD  Sioux Falls  Fee and Ground Lease
(2033) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1998  87.3 %  1,027,280  Macy's, JCPenney , Hy-V ee, Dick's Sporting
Goods
25.Falls, The  FL Miami  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007  98.2 %  709,540  Macy's, Regal Cinema, The Fresh Market,
LifeT ime Athletic (6)
26.Fashion Centre at Pentagon
City, The VA Arlington
(Washington,
DC) Fee   42.5 % (4) Built 1989   95.7 %  1,037,175  Nordstrom, Macy's, The Ritz-Carlton (15)
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
28Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected Larger Retailers and Uses
27.Fashion Mall at Keystone,
The IN Indianapolis  Fee and Ground Lease
(2067) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1997  93.6 %  716,744  Saks Fifth Avenue, Crate & Barrel, Nordstrom,
Keystone Art Cinema, Sheraton (15)
28.Fashion V alley  CA  San Diego  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2001 98.0 %  1,728,009  Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom,
Macy's, JCPenney , AMC Theatres, Forever 21,
The Container Store
29.Firewheel Town Center  TX Garland
(Dallas) Fee   100.0 % Built 2005   89.4 %  996,245  Dillard's, Macy's, Barnes & Noble, DSW , AMC
Theatres, Dick's Sporting Goods, Kids
Empire/Hapik, Fairfield Inn by Marriott (14), (16)
30.Florida Mall, The  FL Orlando  Fee   50.0 % (4) Built 1986   96.8 %  1,724,998  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Sears, H&M,
Forever 21, Zara, American Girl, Dick's Sporting
Goods, Crayola Experience, The Florida Hotel
and Conference Center (15)
31.Forum Shops at Caesars
Palace, The NV  Las V egas  Ground Lease (2050)   100.0 % Built 1992   96.2 %  659,765  Caesars Palace Las Vegas Hotel and Casino
(15)
32.Galleria, The  TX Houston  Fee   50.4 % (4) Acquired
2002  96.0 %  2,012,383  Saks Fifth Avenue, Neiman Marcus, Nordstrom,
Macy's, The Westin Galleria (15), The Westin
Oaks (15), Life Time Tennis
33.Greenwood Park Mall  IN Greenwood
(Indianapolis) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1979  97.7 %  1,286,654  Macy's, Von Maur , JCPenney , Dick's Sporting
Goods, Barnes & Noble, Regal Cinema, Dave &
Buster's
34.Haywood Mall  SC  Greenville  Fee and Ground Lease
(2067) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1998  98.0 %  1,237,364  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Belk
35.King of Prussia  PA King of
Prussia
(Philadelphia) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2003  96.9 %  2,670,696  Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom,
Macy's, Arhaus Furniture, Dick's Sporting Goods,
Primark
36.La Plaza Mall  TX McAllen  Fee and Ground Lease
(2040) (7)  100.0 % Built 1976   98.1 %  1,314,285  Macy's (8), Dillard's, JCPenney , Wingate by
Wyndham (15)
37.Lakeline Mall  TX Cedar Park
(Austin) Fee   100.0 % Built 1995   97.3 %  1,098,856  Dillard's (8), Macy's, JCPenney , AMC Theatres
38.Lehigh V alley Mall  PA Whitehall  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2003  94.4 %  1,196,373  Macy's, JCPenney , Boscov's, Barnes & Noble,
Michael's, Dave & Buster's
39.Lenox Square  GA  Atlanta  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  96.6 %  1,553,502  Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's, Macy's, JW
Marriott (15), Hyatt Centric (14)
40.Livingston Mall  NJ Livingston
(New York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  94.7 %  968,748  Macy's, Barnes & Noble
41.Mall at Rockingham Park,
The NH  Salem
(Boston) Fee   28.2 % (4) Acquired
1999  92.3 %  1,064,794  JCPenney , Macy's, Dick's Sporting Goods,
Cinemark Theatre
42.Mall of Georgia  GA  Buford
(Atlanta) Fee   100.0 % Built 1999   94.8 %  1,840,342  Dillard's, Macy's, JCPenney , Belk, Dick's
Sporting Goods, Barnes & Noble, Havertys
Furniture, Regal Cinema, V on Maur
43.Mall of New Hampshire, The NH  Manchester  Fee and Ground Lease
(2024-2027) (7)  56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999  92.7 %  803,883  Macy's, JCPenney , Best Buy, Dick's Sporting
Goods, Dave & Buster's
44.McCain Mall  AR  N. Little Rock  Fee   100.0 % Built 1973   95.0 %  793,852  Dillard's, JCPenney , Regal Cinema
45.Meadowood Mall  NV  Reno  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007  99.2 %  928,920  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Dick's Sporting Goods,
Crunch Fitness, Round 1
46.Menlo Park Mall  NJ Edison (New
York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1997  90.4 %  1,331,605  Nordstrom, Macy's , Barnes & Noble , AMC Dine-
In Theatre
47.Miami International Mall  FL Miami  Fee   47.8 % (4) Built 1982   92.8 %  1,082,365  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Kohl's
48.Midland Park Mall  TX Midland  Fee   100.0 % Built 1980   100.0 %  644,281  Dillard's (8), JCPenney , Ross, Dick's Sporting
Goods
49.Miller Hill Mall  MN  Duluth  Fee   100.0 % Built 1973   94.9 %  829,535  JCPenney , Barnes & Noble, DSW , Dick's
Sporting Goods, Essentia Health West, Essentia
Health East
50.North East Mall  TX Hurst (Dallas)  Fee   100.0 % Built 1971   97.3 %  1,646,409  Dillard's, Macy's, JCPenney , Dick's Sporting
Goods, Cinemark Theatres
51.Northshore Mall  MA  Peabody
(Boston) Fee   56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999  92.1 %  1,509,844  JCPenney , Nordstrom, Macy's (8), Barnes &
Noble, Shaw's Grocery , The Container Store,
Tesla Sales and Service, Life Time Athletic
52.Ocean County Mall  NJ Toms River
(New York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  86.4 %  886,603  Macy's, Boscov's, JCPenney , LA Fitness,
HomeSense, Ulta
53.Orland Square  IL Orland Park
(Chicago) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1997  99.4 %  1,229,884 Macy's, JCPenney , Dave & Buster's, V on Maur
54.Oxford V alley Mall  PA Langhorne
(Philadelphia) Fee   85.5 % Acquired
2003  79.0 %  1,340,258  Macy's, JCPenney , United Artists Theatre
55.Penn Square Mall  OK  Oklahoma
City Ground Lease (2060)   94.5 % Acquired
2002  94.5 %  1,083,693  Macy's, Dillard's (8), JCPenney , AMC Theatres,
The Container Store
56.Pheasant Lane Mall  NH  Nashua  -   —%
(12)Acquired
2002  94.4 %  979,595  JCPenney , Target, Macy's, Dick's Sporting
Goods
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
29Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected Larger Retailers and Uses
57.Phipps Plaza  GA  Atlanta  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  93.2 %  785,367 Saks Fifth Avenue, Nordstrom, AMC Theatres,
Arhaus Furniture, Legoland Discovery Center ,
AC Hotel by Marriott, Life Time Athletic (6), Life
Time Work (6), Nobu Hotel and Restaurant (6),
(16)
58.Plaza Carolina  PR  Carolina (San
Juan) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  85.7 %  1,157,596  JCPenney , Tiendas Capri, Econo,  T.J. Maxx,
Caribbean Cinemas, Burlington
59.Prien Lake Mall  LA Lake Charles  Fee and Ground Lease
(2040) (7)  100.0 % Built 1972   88.3 %  719,189  Dillard's, JCPenney , Cinemark Theatres, Kohl's,
Dick's Sporting Goods, T.J. Maxx/HomeGoods
60.Quaker Bridge Mall  NJ Lawrenceville  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2003  95.1 %  1,081,297  Macy's, JCPenney
61.Rockaway Townsquare  NJ Rockaway
(New York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  81.8 %  1,245,980  Macy's, JCPenney , Raymour & Flanigan
62.Roosevelt Field  NY  Garden City
(New York) Fee and Ground Lease
(2090) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1998  97.5 %  2,344,758  Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom, Macy's,  JCPenney ,
Dick's Sporting Goods, AMC Entertainment,
XSport Fitness, Neiman Marcus, Primark (6),
Residence Inn by Marriott
63.Ross Park Mall  PA Pittsburgh  Fee   100.0 % Built 1986   96.0 %  1,234,239  JCPenney , Nordstrom, L.L. Bean, Macy's (8),
Crate & Barrel
64.Santa Rosa Plaza  CA  Santa Rosa  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  93.1 %  693,075  Macy's, Forever 21
65.Shops at Chestnut Hill, The  MA  Chestnut Hill
(Boston) Fee   94.4 % Acquired
2002  97.9 %  470,062  Bloomingdale's (8)
66.Shops at Clearfork, The  TX Fort W orth  Fee   45.0 % (4) Built 2017   86.2 %  550,748  Neiman Marcus, Arhaus Furniture, AMC
Theatres, Pinstripes, (16)
67.Shops at Crystals, The  NV  Las V egas  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2016  87.0 %  272,248  Aria Resort and Casino (15)
68.Shops at Nanuet, The  NY  Nanuet  Fee   100.0 % Redeveloped
2013  79.6 %  757,952  Regal Cinema, 24 Hour Fitness, At Home, Stop
& Shop
69.Shops at Mission V iejo, The CA  Mission V iejo
(Los Angeles) Fee   51.0 % (4) Built 1979   89.7 %  1,235,413  Nordstrom, Macy's (8), Dick's Sporting Goods
70.Shops at Riverside, The  NJ Hackensack
(New York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007  91.4 %  723,506  Bloomingdale's, Barnes & Noble, Arhaus
Furniture, AMC Theatres, Life Time Studio
71.Smith Haven Mall  NY  Lake Grove
(New York) Fee   25.0 % (4)
(2)Acquired
1995  91.7 %  1,204,769  Macy's (8), Dick's Sporting Goods, Barnes &
Noble, L.L. Bean
72.South Hills V illage  PA Pittsburgh  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1997  90.6 %  1,128,994  Macy's (8), Barnes & Noble, AMC Cinemas,
Dick's Sporting Goods, Target, DSW , Ulta
73.South Shore Plaza  MA  Braintree
(Boston) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  95.4 %  1,590,717  Macy's, Sears, Nordstrom, Target, Primark
74.Southdale Center  MN  Edina
(Minneapolis) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007  88.0 %  1,246,152  Macy's, AMC Theatres, Dave & Buster's, RH
Minneapolis, Life Time Athletic, Life Time
Work/Sport, Homewood Suites by Hilton, (16)
75.SouthPark  NC  Charlotte  Fee and Ground Lease
(2040) (9)  100.0 % Acquired
2002  99.0 %  1,688,480  Neiman Marcus, Nordstrom, Macy's, Dillard's,
Belk, Dick's Sporting Goods, Crate & Barrel, The
Container Store, (16)
76.Springfield Mall (1)  PA Springfield
(Philadelphia) Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2005  88.4 %  610,134  Macy's, Target
77.St. Charles Towne Center  MD  Waldorf
(Washington,
DC) Fee   100.0 % Built 1990   89.8 %  980,450  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Kohl's, Dick Sporting
Goods, AMC Theatres
78.St. Johns Town Center  FL Jacksonville  Fee   50.0 % (4) Built 2005   95.2 %  1,454,187  Nordstrom, Dillard's, Arhaus Furniture, Dick's
Sporting Goods,  Barnes & Noble, RH
Jacksonville, Homewood Suites by Hilton (15)
 Target, Ashley Furniture Home Store, Ross,
DSW , JoAnn Fabrics, PetsMart
79.Stanford Shopping Center  CA  Palo Alto
(San Jose) Ground Lease (2064)   94.4 %
(11)Acquired
2003  91.9 %  1,287,980  Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom,
Macy's, Crate and Barrel, The Container Store,
RH Palo Alto (6)
80.Stoneridge Shopping Center  CA  Pleasanton
(San
Francisco) Fee   49.9 % (4) Acquired
2007  95.8 %  1,299,562  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Arhaus Furniture (6)
81.Summit Mall  OH  Akron  Fee   100.0 % Built 1965   91.6 %  774,483  Dillard's (8), Macy's, Arhaus Furniture
82.Tacoma Mall  WA Tacoma
(Seattle) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1987  91.8 %  1,240,292  Nordstrom, Macy's, JCPenney , Dick's Sporting
Goods, Nordstrom Rack, Total Wine and More,
Ulta, Kohl's (6)
83.Tippecanoe Mall  IN Lafayette  Fee   100.0 % Built 1973   81.5 %  864,844  Macy's, JCPenney , Kohl's, Dick's Sporting
Goods
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
30Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected Larger Retailers and Uses
84.Town Center at Boca Raton  FL Boca Raton
(Miami) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  98.0 %  1,778,770  Saks Fifth Avenue, Neiman Marcus,
Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom, Macy's, Crate &
Barrel, The Container Store, Joseph's Classic
Market, Arhaus Furniture
85.Towne East Square  KS  Wichita  Fee   100.0 % Built 1975   99.3 %  1,157,209  Dillard's, Von Maur , JCPenney , Round 1,
Scheels (6)
86.Treasure Coast Square  FL Jensen
Beach Fee   100.0 % Built 1987   88.6 %  874,998  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Regal Cinema
87.Tyrone Square  FL St.
Petersburg
(Tampa) Fee   100.0 % Built 1972   90.0 %  960,554  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , DSW , Cobb 10
Luxury Theatres, Dick's Sporting Goods,
Hitchcock's Green Market, PetSmart
88.University Park Mall  IN Mishawaka  Fee   100.0 % Built 1979   91.8 %  918,673  Macy's, JCPenney , Barnes & Noble
89.Walt Whitman Shops  NY  Huntington
Station (New
York) Fee and Ground Lease
(2032) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1998  99.1 %  1,084,648  Saks Fifth Avenue, Bloomingdale’ s, Macy’ s
90.West Town Mall  TN  Knoxville  Fee and Ground Lease
(2042)  50.0 % (4) Acquired
1991  93.9 %  1,282,015  Belk (8), Dillard’ s, JCPenney , Regal Cinebarre
Theatre, Dick's House of Sport, Tesla Sales and
Service
91.Westchester , The  NY  White Plains
(New York) Fee   40.0 % (4) Acquired
1997  91.0 %  805,135  Neiman Marcus, Nordstrom, Crate  and Barrel,
Arhaus Furniture (6)
92.White Oaks Mall  IL Springfield  Fee   80.7 % Built 1977   81.5 %  942,837  Macy's, Dick's Sporting Goods, LA Fitness,
Michael's, State of Illinois Departme nt of Central
Management Services (6)
93.Wolfchase Galleria  TN  Memphis  Fee   94.5 % Acquired
2002  96.6 %  1,151,481  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Malco Theatres,
Courtyard by Marriott (14)
94.Woodfield Mall  IL Schaumburg
(Chicago) Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2012  93.0 %  2,154,014  Nordstrom, Macy's, JCPenney , Enterrium, Peppa
Pig W orld of Play
95.Woodland Hills Mall  OK  Tulsa  Fee   94.5 % Acquired
2002  96.1 %  1,095,915  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Holiday  Inn Express
(15), Courtyard by Marriott (15)
Total Mall GLA  108,070,914 (18)
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
31Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal Or
Property Name State City (CBSA) Lease) (3) Ownership AcquiredOccupancy
(5)  Total GLA   Selected T enants
Premium Outlets
1.Albertville Premium Outlets  MN  Albertville
(Minneapolis) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  89.3 %  337,689  Coach, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New York,
Lululemon, Micha el Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
The North Face, Under Armour
2.Allen Premium Outlets  TX Allen (Dallas)  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  100.0 %  548,464  Adidas, Armani Outlet, Calvin Klein, Coach,
Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outle t, J.Crew , Kate
Spade New York, Levi's, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Staybridge Suites (14), The North
Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
3.Aurora Farms Premium
Outlets OH Aurora
(Cleveland) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  83.2 %  271,209  Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, The
North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
4.Birch Run Premium Outlets  MI Birch Run
(Detroit) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  88.7 %  593,931  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, J.Crew , Kate Spade
New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Pottery Barn/Williams-Sonoma Outlet, Tommy
Hilfiger , The North Face, Under Armour
5.Camarillo Premium Outlets  CA Camarillo (Los
Angeles) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  94.3 %  686,106  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
Giorgio Armani, H&M, Kate Spade New York,
Lululemon, Micha el Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, The North Face, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
6.Carlsbad Premium Outlets  CA Carlsbad (San
Diego) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  98.5 %  289,087  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade
New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Tory Burch, Under Armour
7.Carolina Premium Outlets  NC Smithfield
(Raleigh) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  97.6 %  438,728  Adidas, Coach, Columbia Sportsw ear, Gap Outlet,
J.Crew , Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
8.Charlotte Premium Outlets  NC Charlotte  Fee   50.0 %
(4)Built 2014   96.9 %  398,351  Adidas, Coach, Columbia Sportsw ear, Gap Outlet,
Guess, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
9.Chicago Premium Outlets  IL Aurora (Chicago)  Fee   100.0 % Built 2004   92.7 %  687,119  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, RH Outlet, Saks Fifth
Avenue Of f 5th, Under Armour
10.Cincinnati Premium Outlets  OH Monroe
(Cincinnati) Fee   100.0 % Built 2009   89.7 %  398,960  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, J.Crew ,
Kate Spade New York, Marc Jacobs, Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
11.Clarksburg Premium Outlets  MD  Clarksburg
(Washington,
DC) Fee   66.0 %
(4)Built 2016   88.4 % 390,146  Armani Outlet, A/X Armani Exchange, Adidas, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Express, Kate
Spade New York, Lafayette 148 New York, Marc
Jacobs, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore Ferragamo,
Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour , Vince
12.Clinton Premium Outlets  CT Clinton  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  98.9 % 276,225  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, J.Crew ,
Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour
13.Denver Premium Outlets  CO Thornton
(Denver) Fee   100.0 % Built 2018   100.0 % 328,100  Adidas, A/X Arma ni Exchange, Calvin Klein, Coach,
Gap Outlet, H&M, Kate Spade New York, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory
Burch, Under Armour , Vineyard Vines, Staybridge
Suites (15)
14.Desert Hills Premium Outlets  CA Cabazon (Palm
Springs) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  99.4 % 655,235  Alexander McQueen, Armani Outlet, Balenciaga,
Bottega Veneta, Brunello Cucinelli, Burberry , Coach,
Ermenegildo Zegn a, Fendi, Gucci, Jimmy Choo, Loro
Piana, Marc Jacobs, Moncler , Mulberry , Neiman
Marcus Last Call, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada,
Saint Laurent Paris, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Salvatore Ferragamo, Stuart Weitzm an, Tory Burch,
Valentino
15.Ellenton Premium Outlets  FL Ellenton (T ampa)  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  96.1 % 477,137  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
16.Folsom Premium Outlets  CA Folsom
(Sacramento) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  83.9 % 298,038  Adidas, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap
Outlet, Kate Spad e New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
17.Gilroy Premium Outlets  CA Gilroy (San Jose)  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  82.0 % 578,505  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Lululemon, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face,
Tommy Hilfiger
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
32Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal Or
Property Name State City (CBSA) Lease) (3) Ownership AcquiredOccupancy
(5)  Total GLA   Selected T enants
18.Gloucester Premium Outlets  NJ Blackwood
(Philadelphia) Fee   50.0 %
(4)Built 2015   85.8 % 378,470  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet, Guess,
Levi's, J. Crew , Loft Outlet, Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Skechers,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour , Vera Bradley
19.Grand Prairie Premium
Outlets TX Grand Prairie
(Dallas) Fee   100.0 % Built 2012   98.7 % 423,687  Banana Republic,  Bloomingdale's The Outlet Store,
Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Kate Spade New York,
J.Crew , Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks
Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Bahama, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour
20.Grove City Premium Outlets  PA Grove City
(Pittsburgh) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  83.2 % 531,157  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, Guess,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren , The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
21.Gulfport Premium Outlets  MS Gulfport  Ground Lease (2059)   100.0 % Acquired
2010  86.6 % 300,160  Banana Republic, Chico's, Coach, Gap Outlet, H&M,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
22.Hagerstown Premium Outlets  MD  Hagerstown
(Baltimore/
Washington, DC) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  73.1 % 485,592  Adidas, American Eagle Outfitters, Banana Republic,
Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , Gap Outlet, Guess, Kate Spade New
York, Loft Outlet, The North Face, Under Armour
23.Houston Premium Outlets  TX Cypress
(Houston) Fee   100.0 % Built 2008   99.1 % 548,188  Ann Taylor, A/X Armani Exchange, Banana Republic,
Brooks Brothers, Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap
Outlet, Giorgio Armani, Holiday Inn Express (15),
Kate Spade New York, Lululemon , Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, V ictoria's Secret
24.Indiana Premium Outlets  IN Edinburgh
(Indianapolis) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  89.5 % 378,024  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
Gap Outlet, Gues s, J.Crew , Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour
25.Jackson Premium Outlets  NJ Jackson (New
York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  96.0 % 285,603  Adidas, American Eagle Outfitters, Banana Republic,
Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet,
J.Crew , Loft Outlet, Kate Spade New York, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
26.Jersey Shore Premium
Outlets NJ Tinton Falls (New
York) Fee   100.0 % Built 2008   97.6 % 434,456  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Marc  Jacobs, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
27.Johnson Creek Premium
Outlets WI Johnson Creek  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  83.6 % 277,672  Adidas, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein, Gap Outlet,
Loft Outlet, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren , Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
28.Kittery Premium Outlets  ME Kittery  Fee and Ground Lease
(2049) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
2004  83.8 % 259,480  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Express Factory
Outlet, Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Kate Spade New York,
New Balance, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tumi
29.Las Americas Premium
Outlets CA San Diego  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007  96.5 % 554,273  Adidas, Banana Republic, Calvin  Klein, Coach,
Columbia Sportsw ear, Gap Outlet, Giorgio Armani,
Guess, Kate Spade New York, Lacoste, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
30.Las V egas North Premium
Outlets NV Las V egas  Fee   100.0 % Built 2003   95.9 % 676,270  All Saints, Armani Outlet, A/X Armani Exchange,
Banana Republic, Burberry , Canali, CH Carolina
Herrera, Cheesecake Factory , Coach , David Yurman,
Dolce & Gabbana,  Etro, Jimmy Choo, John Varvatos,
Lululemon, Kate Spade New York, Marc Jacobs,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Roberto
Cavalli, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore
Ferragamo, Shake Shack, Tory Burch
31.Las V egas South Premium
Outlets NV Las V egas  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  98.4 %  535,759  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
Gap Outlet, Guess, Kate Spade New York, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
32.Lee Premium Outlets  MA Lee  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  86.9 %  224,731  Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers,
Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Kate Spade
New York, Levi's, Loft Outlet, Michael Kors, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Skechers, Tommy  Hilfiger , Under
Armour
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
33Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal Or
Property Name State City (CBSA) Lease) (3) Ownership AcquiredOccupancy
(5)  Total GLA   Selected T enants
33.Leesburg Premium Outlets  VA Leesburg
(Washington,
DC) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  97.0 %  478,218  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Armani Outlet, A/X Armani
Exchange, Brooks Brothers, Burberry , Coach,
Columbia Sportsw ear, J.Crew ,  Kate Spade New
York, Marc Jacobs, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, RH Outlet, Salvatore Ferragamo, Tory Burch,
Under Armour , Vineyard V ines, Williams-Sonoma
34.Lighthouse Place Premium
Outlets IN Michigan City
(Chicago, IL) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  89.4 %  454,787  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Gap Outlet, Guess, H&M , J.Crew , Kate
Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Under
Armour
35.Merrimack Premium Outlets  NH Merrimack  Fee   100.0 % Built 2012   97.8 %  408,891  Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Barbour ,
Bloomingdale's The Outlet Store, Brooks Brothers,
Calvin Klein, Coach, J.Crew , Kate Spade New York,
Marc Jacobs, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory
Burch, Under Armour , Vineyard V ines
36.Napa Premium Outlets  CA Napa  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  90.5 %  179,427  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger
37.Norfolk Premium Outlets  VA Norfolk  Fee   65.0 %
(4)Built 2017   89.0 %  332,281  A/X Armani Exchange, Banana Republic, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswe ar, Gap Outlet,
H&M, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma, The North Face, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
38.North Bend Premium Outlets  WA North Bend
(Seattle) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  78.1 %  215,272  Banana Republic,  Coach, Gap Outlet, Levi's, Kate
Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Skechers,
Under Armour
39.North Georgia Premium
Outlets GA Dawsonville
(Atlanta) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  93.3 % 540,752  Ann Taylor , Armani Outlet, Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , J.Crew , Kate Spade New York,
Lululemon, Micha el Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Pottery Barn, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory
Burch, W est Elm, Williams-Sonoma
40.Orlando International
Premium Outlets FL Orlando  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  96.2 % 773,527  Adidas, Armani Outlet, Calvin Klein, Carhartt, Coach,
Columbia Sportsw ear, H&M,  J.Crew , Karl Lagerfeld,
Kate Spade New York, Marc Jacob s, Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
St. John, The North Face, Tomm y Hilfiger , Tory
Burch, Under Armour
41.Orlando V ineland Premium
Outlets FL Orlando  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  99.8 % 656,784  Adidas, All Saints, Armani Outlet , Bally , Bottega
Veneta, Brunello Cucinelli, Burber ry, Calvin Klein,
Carolina Herrera, Coach, Ermenegild o Zegna, Jimmy
Choo, Kate Spad e New York, Lacoste, Lululemon,
Michael Kors, Nike, Prada, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks
Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore Ferragamo, TAG
Heuer , The North Face, Tod's, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory
Burch, Under Armour , Versace
42.Petaluma V illage Premium
Outlets CA Petaluma (San
Francisco) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  83.6 % 201,656  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Coach,
Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors,
Nike, Saks Fifth Avenue Of f 5th, Tommy Hilfiger
43.Philadelphia Premium Outlets  PA Limerick
(Philadelphia) Fee   100.0 % Built 2007   93.6 % 549,155  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, Guess,
H&M, J.Crew , Loft Outlet, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, RH Outlet, The North Face, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
44.Phoenix Premium Outlets  AZ Chandler
(Phoenix) Ground Lease (2077)   100.0 % Built 2013   96.0 %  356,508  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswe ar, Gap Factory
Store, Guess, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors,
Nike, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Bahama,
Tommy Hilfiger , Tumi, Under Armour
45.Pismo Beach Premium
Outlets CA Pismo Beach Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  89.3 %  147,603  Calvin Klein, Coach, Guess, Kate Spade New York,
Levi's, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Skechers, Tommy
Hilfiger
46.Pleasant Prairie Premium
Outlets WI Pleasant Prairie
(Chicago, IL/
Milwaukee) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  88.9 %  402,411  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Gap Outle t, Kate Spade New York, J.Crew ,
Lacoste, Loft Outlet, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, The North  Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch,
Under Armour
47.Puerto Rico Premium Outlets  PR Barceloneta  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  97.1 % 349,884  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, Invicta,
Lacoste, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Puma, Tommy Hilfiger
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
34Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal Or
Property Name State City (CBSA) Lease) (3) Ownership AcquiredOccupancy
(5)  Total GLA   Selected T enants
48.Queenstown Premium
Outlets MD  Queenstown
(Baltimore) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  90.2 % 289,695  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswe ar, Gap Outlet,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Loft Outlet, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, St. John, Tommy
Bahama, Under Armour
49.Rio Grande V alley Premium
Outlets TX Mercedes
(McAllen) Fee   100.0 % Built 2006   87.0 % 603,929  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Armani Outlet, A/X Armani
Exchange, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein, Coach,
Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet, H&M, Kate Spade
New York, Levi's, Michael Kors, Nike, Pandora, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
50.Round Rock Premium Outlets  TX Round Rock
(Austin) Fee   100.0 % Built 2006   97.2 % 498,398  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Duluth Trading
Company , Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Kate Spade New
York, Loft Outlet, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour , Embassy
Suites (15) (6), (16)
51.San Francisco Premium
Outlets CA Livermore (San
Francisco) Fee and Ground Lease
(2026) (9)  100.0 % Built 2012   97.3 % 696,898  All Saints, Arc'teryx, A/X Armani Exchange,
Bloomingdale's The Outlet Store, Bottega Veneta,
Brunello Cucinelli, Burberry , CH Carolina Herrera,
Coach, Ermenegildo Zegna, Etro, Furla, Gucci, H&M,
Jimmy Choo, John Varvatos, Kate Spade New York,
Lacoste, Longchamp, MaxMara, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Laure n, Prada, Roger Vivier, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, Sandro & Maje, Salvatore
Ferragamo, Stuart  Weitzman, The North Face, Tod's,
Tory Burch, Under Armour , Versace, Zadig et V oltaire
52.San Marcos Premium Outlets  TX San Marcos
(Austin/ San
Antonio) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  95.4 % 735,135  Armani Outlet, Banana Republic , Burberry , CH
Carolina Herrera, Gucci, J. Crew , Jimmy Choo, Kate
Spade New York, Lacoste, Lululemon, Neiman
Marcus Last Call, Marc Jacobs,  Michael Kors,
Pandora, Polo Ralph Lauren, Potte ry Barn, Prada,
RH Outlet, Saint Laurent Paris, Salvatore
Ferragamo, Stuart Weitzman, The North Face,
Tommy Bahama, Tory Burch, Versace, Vineyard
Vines
53.Seattle Premium Outlets  WA Tulalip (Seattle)  Ground Lease (2079)   100.0 % Built 2005   95.3 % 554,515  Adidas, Ann Taylor, Arc'teryx, Armani Outlet, Banana
Republic, Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , Kate Spade New York, Lululemon,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Stuart
Weitzman, The North Face, Tommy Bahama, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
54.Silver Sands Premium
Outlets FL Destin  Fee   50.0 %
(4)Acquired
2012  91.4 % 451,004  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Coach,
Columbia Sportsw ear, J.Crew , Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma,
Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, The North Face, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour , Vera Bradley
55.St. Augustine Premium
Outlets FL St. Augustine
(Jacksonville) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  96.6 % 327,713  Adidas,  Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
Gap Outlet,  J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Lucky
Brand, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma, St. John,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
56.St. Louis Premium Outlets  MO  St. Louis
(Chesterfield) Fee   60.0 %
(4)Built 2013   93.4 %  351,424  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Brooks Brothers, Coach, Gap
Outlet, H&M, J. Crew , Kate Spade New York, Levi's,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma,
Tommy Hilfiger , Ugg, Under Armour , Vera Bradley
57.Tampa Premium Outlets  FL Lutz (T ampa)  Fee   100.0 % Built 2015   99.4 %  459,687  Adidas, A/X Armani Outlet, Banana Republic, BJ's
Restaurant and Brewhouse, Brooks  Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet, J.
Crew , Kate Spade New York, Lucky Brand, Marc
Jacobs, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Puma, Saks 5th Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Tumi, Under Armour
58.Tanger Outlets - Columbus
(1) OH Sunbury
(Columbus) Fee   50.0 %
(4)Built 2016   95.0 %  355,243  Banana Republic , Brooks Brothers, Coach, Kate
Spade New York, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Under
Armour
59.Tanger Outlets -
Galveston/Houston (1) TX Texas City  Fee   50.0 %
(4)Built 2012   90.2 %  352,705  Banana Republic, Brooks Brother s, Coach, Gap
Outlet, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Tommy Hilfiger
60.The Crossings Premium
Outlets PA Tannersville  Fee and Ground Lease
(2029) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
2004  98.6 %  411,925  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Johnny Rockets, Kate
Spade New York, Loft Outlet, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face , Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour , Vera Bradley
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
35Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal Or
Property Name State City (CBSA) Lease) (3) Ownership AcquiredOccupancy
(5)  Total GLA   Selected T enants
61.Tucson Premium Outlets  AZ Marana (T ucson)  Fee   100.0 % Built 2015   76.8 %  363,470  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, Guess, Johnny Rockets,
Levi’s, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks
5th Avenue Off 5th, Skechers, Tommy Hilfiger , Under
Armour
62.Twin Cities Premium Outlets  MN  Eagan  Fee   35.0 %
(4)Built 2014   88.7 %  408,976  Adidas, Ann Taylor, Armani Outlet, Banana Republic,
Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, J.
Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Talbots,  Under Armour
63.Vacaville Premium Outlets  CA Vacaville  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  90.9 %  447,255  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet, J.Crew ,
Kate Spade New York, Lacoste, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Skechers, The North Face,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour , West Elm Outlet
64.Waikele Premium Outlets  HI Waipahu
(Honolulu) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  97.0 %  219,485  Adidas, Armani Outlet, Calvin Klein, Coach, Furla,
Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Swarovski,
Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch
65.Waterloo Premium Outlets  NY Waterloo  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  74.4 %  421,862  American Eagle Outfitters, Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Chico’ s, Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , H&M , J.Crew , Kate Spade New York,
Levi's, Loft Outlet, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Skechers, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
66.Williamsburg Premium
Outlets VA Williamsburg  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  91.6 %  518,979  Adidas, American Eagle Outfitters, Ann Taylor ,
Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein,
Coach, J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Levi's, Loft
Outlet, Michael Kors, New Balance, Nike, Pandora,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma, The North Face,
Timberland, Tommy Bahama, Tomm y Hilfiger , Under
Armour , Vera Bradley , Vineyard V ines
67.Woodburn Premium Outlets  OR Woodburn
(Portland) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2013  91.7 %  389,511  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Gap Outlet, Levi's, Michael Kors, Nike, The
North Face, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory
Burch, Under Armour
68.Woodbury Common Premium
Outlets NY Central V alley
(New York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  98.0 %  910,991  Arc'teryx, Armani Outlet, Balenciaga, Balmain,
Bottega Veneta, Breitling, Brioni, Brunello Cucinelli,
Burberry , Canali, Celine, Chloe, Coach, Dior, Dolce &
Gabbana, Dunhill, Fendi, Givenchy , Golden Goose,
Gucci, Jimmy Choo, Lacoste, Loewe, Longchamp,
Loro Piana, Marc Jacobs, Michae l Kors, Moncler ,
Mulberry , Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada, Saint
Laurent, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore
Ferragamo, Santo ni, Shake Shack, Stone Island,
Stuart Weitzman, Theory , Tod's, Tom Ford, Tory
Burch, V alentino, V ersace, Zegna
69.Wrentham V illage Premium
Outlets MA Wrentham
(Boston) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  98.7 %  672,872  Adidas, All Saints , Armani Outlet, Banana Republic,
Bloomingdale's The Outlet Store, Brooks Brothers,
Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, David Yurman, Gucci,
Karl Lagerfeld, Kate Spade New York, Lacoste,
Lululemon, Marc Jacobs, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Prada, Puma, RH Outlet, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore Ferragamo, Theory ,
Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour , Vineyard
Vines
Total U.S. Premium Outlets
GLA 30,435,380
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
36Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected T enants
The Mills
1.Arizona Mills  AZ Tempe
(Phoenix) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007  90.7 %  1,223,952  Marshalls, Burlington, Ross, Harki ns Cinemas &
IMAX, Sea Life Center , Conn's, Legoland,  Forever
21, dd's Discounts (6), Going, Going, Gone by
Dick's Sporting Goods, Rainforest Café
2.Arundel Mills  MD  Hanover
(Baltimore) Fee   59.3 % (4) Acquired
2007  99.8 %  1,929,935  Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Burlington, Dave &
Buster's, Medieval Times, Saks Fifth Avenue Off
5th, Off Broadway Shoe Warehou se, T.J. Maxx,
Cinemark Egyptia n 24 Theatres, Maryland Live!
Casino, Forever 21, Ulta, Live! Hotel (14), Sun & Ski
3.Colorado Mills  CO  Lakewood
(Denver) Fee   37.5 % (4) Acquired
2007  93.3 %  1,416,677  Forever 21, Off Broadway Shoe Warehouse, Super
Target, United Artists Theatre, Burlington, H&M,
Dick's Sporting Goods, Rodz & Bodz Museum
Movie Cars & More, Slick City Action Park (6),
Springhill Suites (15)
4.Concord Mills  NC Concord
(Charlotte) Fee   59.3 % (4) Acquired
2007  99.0 %  1,334,473  Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Burlington, Dave &
Buster's, Nike Factory Store, Off Broadway Shoes,
AMC Theatres, Best Buy, Foreve r 21, Sea Life
Center , H&M, Dick's Sporting Goods
5.Grapevine Mills  TX Grapevine
(Dallas) Fee   59.3 % (4) Acquired
2007  99.1 % 1,781,299  Burlington, Marshalls, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
AMC Theatres, Sun & Ski Sports, Neiman Marcus
Last Call, Legoland Discovery Center, Sea Life
Center , Ross, H&M, Round 1 Entertainment,
Fieldhouse USA, Rainforest Café, Meow Wolf (6),
Macy's Backstage (6), Springhill Suites (15), Hyatt
Place (15), Hawthorn (15)
6.Great Mall  CA Milpitas (San
Jose) Fee and Ground Lease
(2049) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
2007  97.8 % 1,368,827  Camille La Vie, Kohl's, Dave & Buster's, Burlington,
Marshalls, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Nike Factory
Store, Century Theatres, Bed Bath & Beyond (13),
Dick's Sporting Goods, Legoland Discovery Center
7.Gurnee Mills  IL Gurnee
(Chicago) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007  95.7 % 1,802,880  Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Bed Bath &
Beyond/Buy Buy Baby , Burlington, Kohl's, Marshalls
Home Goods, Marcus Cinemas , Value City
Furniture, Off Broadway Shoe Warehouse, Macy's,
Floor & Decor , Dick's Sporting Goods, Rainforest
Café, The Room Place, 2nd and Charles, Hobby
Lobby (6)
8.Katy Mills  TX Katy
(Houston) Fee   62.5 % (4)
(2)Acquired
2007  92.3 % 1,786,507  Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Books-A-Million,
Burlington, Marshalls, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Sun & Ski Sports, AMC Theatres, Tilt, Ross, H&M,
RH Outlet, Rainforest Café
9.Mills at Jersey Gardens, The NJ Elizabeth  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2015  100.0 % 1,296,113  Burlington, Cohoe s, Forever 21, AMC Theatres,
Marshalls, Nike Factory Store, Saks  5th Avenue Off
5th, H&M , Tommy Hilfiger , Bloomingdale's Outlet,
Residence Inn (15), Courtyard by Marriott (15),
Embassy Suites (15), Country Inn & Suites (15)
10.Ontario Mills  CA Ontario
(Riverside) Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007  99.9 % 1,421,863  Burlington, Nike Factory Store, Marshalls, Saks
Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Nordstrom Rack, Dave &
Buster's, Camille La Vie, Sam Ash Music, AMC
Theatres, Forever 21, Uniqlo, Skech ers Superstore,
Rainforest Café, Aki Home
11.Opry Mills  TN Nashville  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007 98% 1,177,549  Regal Cinema & IMAX, Dave & Buster's, Sun & Ski,
Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Forever 21, H&M,
Madame Tussauds, Rainforest Café, Aquarium
Restaurant
12.Outlets at Orange, The  CA Orange (Los
Angeles) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007 99.8 %  866,975  Dave & Buster ’s, Vans Skatepark, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, AMC Theatres, Neiman Marcus
Last Call, Nordstrom Rack, Bloomingdale's the
Outlet Store, Guitar Center , Nike Factory Store
13.Potomac Mills  VA Woodbridge
(Washington,
DC) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007 99.8 %  1,555,876  Marshalls, T.J. Maxx, JCPenney , Burlington,
Nordstrom Rack, Saks Fifth Avenue  Off 5th Outlet,
Costco Warehouse, AMC Theatres, Bloomingdale's
Outlet, Buy Buy Baby/and That!, Round 1
14.Sawgrass Mills  FL Sunrise
(Miami) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007 97.2 % 2,327,642  Bed Bath & Beyond, BrandsMart USA, Burlington,
Marshalls, Neiman Marcus Last Call, Nordstrom
Rack, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Super Target, T.J.
Maxx, Regal Cinema, Bloomingdale 's Outlet, Dick's
Sporting Goods, Primark, AC Hotel by Marriott
Total Mills Properties GLA 21,290,568
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
37Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected T enants
Lifestyle Centers
1.ABQ Uptown  NM  Albuquerque  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2011 99.3 % 228,563  Anthropologie, Apple, Pottery Barn
2.Hamilton Town Center  IN Noblesville
(Indianapolis) Fee   50.0 %
(4)Built 2008  94.7 % 675,141  JCPenney , Dick's Sporting Goods, Bed Bath &
Beyond, DSW , Emagine Noblesville, Total
Wine & More (6), BJ's Wholesale (6)
3.Liberty Tree Mall  MA  Danvers
(Boston) Fee   49.1 %
(4)Acquired
1999 78.7 % 860,222  Marshalls, Target,  Kohl's, Best Buy, Staples,
AMC Theatres, Nordstrom Rack, Off
Broadway Shoes,  Sky Zone, Total Wine &
More
4.Northgate Station  WA Seattle  Fee   100.0 %Redeveloped
2021 -(17) 416,236 (17)Kraken Community Iceplex, Barnes & Noble,
Bed Bath & Beyond, Nordstrom Rack
5.Pier Park  FL Panama City
Beach Fee   65.6 %
(4)Built 2008   95.9 % 948,329  Dillard's, JCPenney , Target, Grand Theatres,
Ron Jon Surf Shop, Margaritaville, Marshalls,
Dave & Buster's, Skywheel
6.University Park V illage  TX Fort W orth  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2015  98.2 % 170,016  Anthropologie, Apple, Pottery Barn
Total Lifestyle Centers
GLA 3,298,507
Other Properties
1 - 13. Other Properties  9,423,545  
14 - 15. TMLP  Acquired
2007 2,782,207  
Total Other GLA 12,205,752 (18)
Total U.S. Properties GLA 175,301,121
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
38Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected T enants
Domestic T aubman
1.Beverly Center  CA Los Angeles  Ground Lease (2054)   80.0 % (4) Acquired
2020  91.9 %  779,000  Bloomingdale's, Macy's
2.Cherry Creek Shopping Center  CO  Denver  Ground Lease (2083)   40.0 % (4) Acquired
2020  97.1 %  1,037,000  Macy's, Neiman Marcus, Nordstrom
3.City Creek Center  UT Salt Lake
City Ground Lease (2082)   80.0 % (4) Acquired
2020  99.8 %  623,000  Macy's, Nordstrom
4.Country Club Plaza  MO  Kansas City  Fee   40.0 % (4) Acquired
2020  81.6 %  965,000  Barnes & Noble, Brio Italian, Bana na
Republic
5.Dolphin Mall  FL Miami  Fee   80.0 % (4) Acquired
2020  99.1 % 1,436,000  Bass Pro Shops, Cobb Theatres,
Burlington, Dave & Busters
6.Fair Oaks Mall  VA Fairfax  Fee   40.0 % (4) Acquired
2020  90.4 % 1,559,000  JC Penney , Macy's (8), Dicks Spor ting
Goods
7.Gardens Mall, The  FL Palm Beach
Gardens Fee   38.8 % (4) Acquired
2020  92.6 % 1,383,000  Bloomingdale's, Macy's, Nordstrom,
Saks Fifth Avenue, Sears
8.Gardens on El Paseo, The  CA Palm Desert  Fee   80.0 % (4) Acquired
2020  98.9 % 237,000  Saks Fifth Avenue
9.Great Lakes Crossing Outlets  MI Auburn Hills  Fee   80.0 % (4) Acquired
2020  93.6 % 1,356,000  AMC Theatre, Bass Pro Shops,
Burlington, Round 1, Nordstrom Rack
10.International Market Place  HI Waikiki   
(Honolulu) Ground Lease (2091)   74.8 % (4) Acquired
2020  88.3 % 340,000  Saks Fifth Avenue
11.International Plaza  FL Tampa  Ground Lease (2080)   40.1 % (4) Acquired
2020 97.8 % 1,178,000  Dillard's, Neiman Marcus, Nordstrom,
LifeT ime Fitness
12.Mall at Green Hills, The  TN Nashville  Fee   80.0 % (4) Acquired
2020 93.3 %  1,034,000  Dillard's, Macy's, Nordstrom
13.Mall at Millenia, The  FL Orlando  Fee   40.0 % (4) Acquired
2020 95%  1,114,000  Bloomingdale's, Macy's, Neiman
Marcus
14.Mall at Short Hills, The  NJ Short Hills  Fee   80.0 % (4) Acquired
2020 98.2 % 1,408,000  Bloomingdale's, Macy's, Neiman
Marcus, Nordstrom, Industrious
15.Mall at University Town Center , The  FL Sarasota  Fee   40.0 % (4) Acquired
2020 98.8 % 866,000  Dillard's, Macy's, Saks Fifth Avenue
16.Mall of San Juan, The  PR San Juan  Fee   76.0 % (4) Acquired
2020 89.4 % 626,000  H&M, Zara, Pottery Barn, Urban
Outfitters, Anthropologie
17.Sunvalley  CA Concord  Ground Lease (2061)   40.0 % (4) Acquired
2020 97.9 % 1,324,000  JC Penney , Macy's (8), Sears
18.Twelve Oaks Mall  MI Novi  Fee   80.0 % (4) Acquired
2020 95.3 % 1,522,000  JC Penney , Macy's, Nordstrom
19.Waterside Shops  FL Naples  Fee   40.0 % (4) Acquired
2020 94.3 % 336,000  Saks Fifth Avenue
20.Westfarms  CT West
Hartford Fee   63.2 % (4) Acquired
2020 94.6 % 1,266,000  JC Penney , Macy's (8), Nordstrom
Total Domestic T aubman Properties GLA 20,389,000
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
39FOOTNOTES:
(1)This property is managed by a third party .
(2)Our direct and indirect interests in some of the properties held as joint venture interests are subject to preferences on distributions in favor of other partners
or us.
(3)The date listed is the expiration date of the last renewal option available to the operating entity under the ground lease. In a majority of the ground leases, we
have a right to purchase the lessor ’s interest under an option, right of first refusal or other provision.  Unless otherwise indicated, each ground lease listed in
this column covers at least 50% of its respective property .
(4)Joint venture properties accounted for under the equity method.
(5)Malls - Execute d leases for all company-owned GLA in mall stores, excluding majors and anchors. Premium Outlet s and The Mills - Executed leases for all
company-owned GLA  (or total center GLA).
(6)Indicates box, anchor , major or project currently under development/construction or has announced plans for development.
(7)Indicates ground lease covers less than 50% of the acreage of this property .
(8)Tenant has multiple locations at this center .
(9)Indicates ground lease covers outparcel only .
(10)Tenant has an existing store at this center but will move to a new location.
(11)We receive substantially all the economic benefit of the property due to a preference or advance.
(12)We own a mortgage note that encumbers Pheasant Lane Mall that entitles us to 100% of the economics of this property .
(13)Indicates anchor has announced its intent to close this location.
(14)Indicates box, anchor , major or project currently under development/construction by a third party .
(15)Owned by a third party .
(16)Includes multi-family tenant on-site.
(17)This property is undergoing significant renovation.
(18)GLA includes of fice space.
    
Table of Contents
40United States Lease Expirations
The following table summarizes lease expiration data for our U.S. malls and Premium Outlets, including Puerto
Rico, as of December 31, 2021. The data presented does not consider the impact of renewal options that may be
contained in leases and excludes data related to TRG.
U.S. MALLS AND PREMIUM OUTLETS LEASE EXPIRATIONS (1)
Avg. Base Percentage of Gross
Number of Minimum Rent Annual Rental
Year Leases ExpiringSquare FeetPSF at 12/31/2021 Revenues (2)
Inline Stores and Freestanding
Month to Month Leases  555  1,782,236 $  55.85  1.9%
2022  2,832 10,341,505 $  50.49  9.6%
2023  2,744 10,870,312 $  57.33  10.4 %
2024  2,545 10,148,796 $  54.59  10.5 %
2025  1,559  6,342,247 $  62.44  7.5%
2026  1,506  5,711,401 $  57.12  6.1%
2027  941  3,996,411 $  60.60  4.6%
2028  749  3,388,618 $  63.78  4.1%
2029  735  3,151,125 $  66.89  3.8%
2030  457  2,159,987 $  67.28  2.6%
2031  294  1,600,032 $  56.87  1.6%
2032 and Thereafter  467  2,158,120 $  46.69  2.0%
Specialty Leasing Agreements w/
terms in excess of 12 months  2,597  6,874,720 $  17.91  2.3%
Anchors
Month to Month Leases  1  138,409 $  1.18 0.0%
2022  2  338,166 $  4.98 0.0%
2023  16  2,110,674 $  4.76  0.2%
2024  16  1,465,287 $  8.10  0.2%
2025  17  1,676,634 $  6.70  0.2%
2026  16  1,702,455 $  5.01  0.2%
2027  12  1,682,163 $  3.93  0.1%
2028  6  622,099 $  7.12  0.1%
2029  5  556,306 $  4.51 0.0%
2030  7  754,336 $  8.54 0.1%
2031  5  427,004 $  12.18 0.0%
2032 and Thereafter  22  2,323,486 $  13.48  0.6%
(1)Does not consider the impact of renewal options that may be contained in leases.
(2)Annual rental revenues represent domestic 2021 consolidated and joint venture combined base rental revenue.
Table of Contents
41International Properties
Our ownership interests in properties outside the United States are primarily owned through joint venture
arrangements.  With the exception of our Premium Outlets in Canada, all of our international properties are managed
by related parties.  
European Investments
At December 31, 2021, we owned 63,924,148 shares, or approximately 22.4%, of Klépierre, which had a
quoted market price of $23.65 per share. Klépierre is a publicly traded, Paris-based real estate company, which owns,
or has an interest in shopping centers located in 14 countries.
As of December 31, 2021, we had a controlling interest in a European investee with interests in 11 Designer
Outlet properties. Ten of the outlet properties are located in Europe and one outlet property is located in Canada. Of
the ten properties in Europe, two are in Italy, two are in the Netherlands, two are in the United Kingdom, and one each
is in Austria, France, Germany, and Spain. As of December 31, 2021, our legal percentage ownership interests in
these entities ranged from 23% to 94%.
We own a 14.6% interest in Value Retail PLC and affiliated entities, which own and operate nine luxury outlets
throughout Europe. We also have a minority direct ownership in three of those outlets.
Other International Investments
We hold a 40% interest in nine operating joint venture properties in Japan, a 50% interest in five operating joint
venture properties in South Korea, a 50% interest in two operating joint venture properties in Mexico, a 50% interest
in two operating joint venture properties in Malaysia, a 50% interest in one operating joint venture in Thailand, and a
50% interest in three Premium Outlet operating joint venture properties in Canada. The nine Japanese Premium
Outlets operate in various cities throughout Japan and comprise over 3.6 million square feet of GLA and were 99.8%
leased as of December 31, 2021.
Our investment in TRG includes an interest in four operating joint venture properties located outside of the
U.S.; two located in the People’s Republic of China and two located in South Korea. Our effective ownership in these
centers, through our investment in TRG, ranges from 13.7% to 39.2%.
The following property tables summarize certain data for our international properties as of December 31, 2021
and do not include our equity investments in Klépierre, or our investment in Value Retail PLC and affiliated entities.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
International Properties
42     City     Ownership     SPG Effective         Total Gross      
COUNTR Y/Property Name (Metropolitan area) Interest Ownership Year Built Leasable Area (1) Selected T enants  
INTERNA TIONAL  PREMIUM OUTLETS
JAPAN
 1.Ami Premium Outlets Ami (T okyo) Fee  40.0 %  2009  315,000 Adidas, Beams, Coach, Gap
Outlet, Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Puma, TaylorMade, Tommy Hilfiger
2.Gotemba Premium Outlets Gotemba City (T okyo) Fee  40.0 %  2000  659,500 Adidas, Armani, Balenciaga, Bally ,
Beams, Bottega Veneta, Burberry ,
Coach, Dolce & Gabbana, Dunhill,
Gap Outlet, Gucci, Loro Piana,
Michael Kors, Moncler , Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Prada/Miu Miu,
Puma, Salvatore Ferragamo, Tod's,
Tory Burch, United Arrows
3.Kobe-Sanda Premium Outlets Hyougo-ken (Osaka) Ground Lease (2026)  40.0 %  2007  441,000 Adidas, Armani, Bally , Beams,
Coach, Dolce & Gabbana, Gap
Outlet, Gucci, Kate Spade New
York, Marc Jacobs, Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Prada/Miu Miu, Salvatore
Ferragamo, Tod's, Tommy Hilfiger ,
United Arrows, V alentino
4.Rinku Premium Outlets Izumisano (Osaka) Ground Lease (2031)  40.0 %  2000  512,500 Adidas, Armani, Bally , Beams,
Brooks Brothers, Burberry , Coach,
Dolce & Gabbana, Dunhill, Eddie
Bauer , Furla, Gap Outlet, Kate
Spade New York, Lanvin
Collection, Micha el Kors, Nike,
Olive des Olive, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Puma, Salvatore
Ferragamo, TaylorMade, Tommy
Hilfiger , United Arrows, Zara
5.Sano Premium Outlets Sano (T okyo) Fee  40.0 %  2003  390,800 Adidas, Beams, Coach, Dunhill,
Eddie Bauer , Etro, Furla, Gap
Outlet, Gucci, Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Prada/Miu Miu,
Salvatore Ferragamo, TaylorMade
6.Sendai-Izumi Premium Outlets Izumi Park Town (Sendai) Ground Lease (2027)  40.0 %  2008  164,200 Adidas, Beams, Coach, Gap, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger ,
United Arrows
7.Shisui Premium Outlets Shisui (Chiba), Japan Ground Lease (2033)  40.0 %  2013  434,600 Adidas, Beams, Citizen, Coach,
Dunhill, Furla, Gap, Kate Spade
New York, Marmot, Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Samsonite, Tomm y Hilfiger , United
Arrows
8.Toki Premium Outlets Toki (Nagoya) Ground Lease (2033)  40.0 %  2005  367,700 Adidas, Beams, Coach, Furla, Gap
Outlet, Kate Spade New York,
Nike, Olive des Olive, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Puma, Timberland, Tommy
Hilfiger , United Arrows
9.Tosu Premium Outlets Fukuoka (Kyushu) Fee  40.0 %  2004  328,400 Adidas, Beams, Coach, Furla, Gap
Outlet, Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Olive des
Olive, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma,
Tommy Hilfiger , United Arrows
Subtotal Japan 3,613,700
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
International Properties
43     City     Ownership     SPG Effective         Total Gross      
COUNTR Y/Property Name (Metropolitan area) Interest Ownership Year BuiltLeasable Area
(1) Selected T enants  
MEXICO
10.Punta Norte Premium
OutletsMexico City Fee  50.0 %  2004  333,000 Adidas, Calvin Klein, CH Carolina Herrera, Coach, Dolce &
Gabbana, Kate Spade New York, Nautica, Nike, Palacio Outlet,
Salvatore Ferragamo, Zegna
11.Premium Outlets Querétaro Querétaro Fee  50.0 %  2019  274,800 Adidas, Adrianna Papell, Calvin Klein, Guess, Levi's, Nike,
Tommy Hilfiger , True Religion, Under Armour
Subtotal Mexico  607,800
SOUTH KOREA
12.Yeoju Premium Outlets Yeoju (Seoul) Fee  50.0 %  2007  551,600 Adidas, Armani, Burberry , Chloe, Coach, Fendi, Gucci, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada, Salvatore Ferragamo,
Tod's, Under Armour , Valentino, V ivienne W estwood
13.Paju Premium Outlets Paju (Seoul) Ground Lease
(2040) 50.0 %  2011  558,900 Adidas, Armani, Bean Pole, Calvin Klein, Coach, Jill Stuart,
Lanvin Collection, Marc Jacobs, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Puma, Tory Burch, Under Armour , Vivienne
Westwood
14.Busan Premium Outlets Busan Fee  50.0 %  2013  360,200 Adidas, Armani, Bean Pole, Calvin Klein, Coach, Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger
15.Siehung Premium Outlets Siehung Fee  50.0 %  2017  444,400 Adidas, Armani, Bean Pole, Calvin Klein, Coach, Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Salvato re Ferragamo, The North
Face, Under Armour
16.Jeju Premium Outlets Jeju Province Ground Lease
(2041) 50.0 % 2021  92,000 Adidas, Arcteryx,  Golden Goose, Guess, Hugo Boss, J.
Lindeberg, Lacoste
Subtotal South Korea  2,007,100
MALA YSIA
17.Johor Premium Outlets Johor (Singapore) Fee  50.0 %  2011  309,400 Adidas, Armani, Calvin Klein, Coach, DKNY , Furla, Gucci,
Guess, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada, Puma,
Salvatore Ferragamo, Timberland, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch,
Zegna
18.Genting Highlands
Premium OutletsKuala Lumpur Fee  50.0 %  2017  277,500 Adidas, Coach, Furla, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors,
Nike, Padini, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma
Subtotal Malaysia  586,900
THAILAND
19.Siam Premium Outlets
BangkokBangkok Fee  50.0 %  2020  264,000 Adidas, Balenciage, Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, Furla, Kate
Spade New York, Nike, Skechers, Under Armour
Subtotal Thailand  264,000
CANADA
20.Toronto Premium Outlets Toronto (Ontario) Fee  50.0 %  2013  504,900 Adidas, Armani, Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, Eddie Bauer ,
Gap, Gucci, Gues s, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory
Burch, Under Armour
21.Premium Outlets Montreal Montreal (Quebec) Fee  50.0 %  2014  367,400 Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap, Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Salvatore Ferragamo,
The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
22.Premium Outlet Collection
Edmonton International
AirportEdmonton (Alberta) Ground Lease
(2072) 50.0 %  2018  422,600 Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Factory , Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
Subtotal Canada  1,294,900
TOTAL INTERNA TIONAL  PREMIUM OUTLETS  8,374,400
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
International Properties
44     City     Ownership     SPG
Effective         Total Gross      
COUNTR Y/Property Name(Metropolitan
area) Interest Ownership Year BuiltLeasable
Area (1) Selected T enants  
INTERNA TIONAL  DESIGNER OUTLETS
AUSTRIA                             
1.Parndorf Designer Outlet  Vienna Fee  90.0 %  2005  118,000 Adidas, Armani, Bally , Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, Dolce &
Gabbana, Furla, Geox, Gucci, Guess, Michael Kors, Moncler ,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Porsche Design, Prada, Puma, Tommy
Hilfiger ,  Zegna
Subtotal Austria  118,000
ITALY
2.La Reggia Designer Outlet
(2) Marcianise
(Naples)Fee  90.0 %  2010  344,000 Adidas, Armani, Calvin Klein, Coach, Guess, Liu Jo, Michael
Kors, Nike, Pinko, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma, Timberland,
Tommy Hilfiger
Phase 3 -
2021
3.Noventa Di Piave Designer
Outlet Venice Fee  90.0 %  2008  353,000 Adidas, Armani, Bally , Bottega Veneta, Burberry , Calvin Klein,
Coach, Dolce & Gabanna, Fendi, Furla, Gucci, Loro Piana,
Michael Kors, Nike, Pinko, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada, Salvatore
Ferragamo, Sergi o Rossi,T ommy Hilfiger , Valentino, Versace,
Zegna
Subtotal Italy  697,000
NETHERLANDS
4.Roermond Designer Outlet
Phases 2 & 3 Roermond Fee  90.0 %  2005  173,000 Armani, Bally , Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, Furla, Gucci,
Michael Kors, Moncler , Mulberry , Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada,
Swarovski, Tod's, Tommy Hilfiger , UGG, Zegna
5.Roermond Designer Outlet
Phase 4Roermond Fee  46.1 % 2017  125,000 Adidas, Karl Lagerfield, Liu Jo, Longchamp, Tag Heuer , Tom
Tailor, Woolrich
6.Designer Outlet Roosendaal Roosendaal Fee  94.0 % 2017  247,500 Adidas, Calvin Klein, Esprit, Guess, Nike, Puma, S. Oliver ,
Tommy Hilfiger
Subtotal Netherlands  545,500
UNITED KINGDOM
7.Ashford Designer Outlet  Kent Fee  45.0 %  2000  281,000 Adidas, Calvin Klein, Clarks, Fossil, French Connection, Gap,
Guess, Kate Spade New York, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Superdry , Tommy Hilfiger
8.West Midlands Designer
OutletCannock (W est
Midlands)Fee  23.2 % 2021  197,000
Subtotal England  478,000
CANADA
9.Vancouver Designer Outlets  Vancouver Ground Lease
(2072) 45.0 %  2015  326,000 Adidas, Armani, Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap, Kate Spade
New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour
Subtotal Canada  326,000
GERMANY
10.Ochtrup Designer Outlets Ochtrup Fee 70.5 % 2016  191,500 Adidas, Calvin Klein, Guess, Lindt, Nike, Puma, Samsonite,
Schiesser , Seidensticker , Steif f, Tom Tailor, Vero Moda
Subtotal Germany  191,500
FRANCE
11.Provence Designer Outlet Miramas Fee 90.0 % 2017  269,000 Armani, Calvin Klein, Guess, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Puma, Prada, Timberland, Tommy Hilfiger
Subtotal France  269,000
SPAIN
12.Málaga Designer Outlet Málaga Fee 46.1 % 2020  191,000 Adidas, Armani, Burberry , Calvin Klein, Furla, Guess, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Prada, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
Subtotal Spain  191,000
Total International Designer Outlets  2,816,000
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
International Properties
45     City     Ownership     SPG Effective     Year Built     Total Gross     
COUNTR Y/Property Name (Metropolitan area) Interest Ownership or Acquired Leasable Area (1) Selected T enants
International T aubman
China                             
1.CityOn.Xian  Xi'an Ground Lease (2051)  20.0 %  Acquired 2020  995,000 Wangfujing
2.CityOn.Zhengzhou  Zhengzhou Ground Lease (2051)  19.6 %  Acquired 2020  919,000 G-Super , Wangfujing
Subtotal China  1,914,000
South Korea
3.Starfield Anseong  Anseong Fee  39.2 %  Acquired 2020  1,068,000 Shinsegae, E-Mart Traders
4.Starfield Hanam  Hanam Fee  13.7 %  Acquired 2020  1,709,000 Shinsegae, E-Mart Traders
Subtotal South Korea  2,777,000
Total International T aubman  4,691,000
FOOTNOTES:
(1)All gross leasable area listed in square feet.
(2)Property completed an expansion in 2021.
(3)Property is undergoing an expansion.
Table of Contents
46Land
We have direct or indirect ownership interests in approximately 127 acres of land held in the United States and
Canada for future development.
Sustainability
At Simon, we define and implement sustainability and Environmental, Social and Governance, or ESG,
initiatives into all aspects of our business; from how we plan, develop, and operate our properties, to how we do
business with our customers, engage with our communities, and create a healthy, safe, productive, and positive work
environment for our employees. Our sustainability framework focuses on four key areas: Customers, Communities,
Environment, and Employees.
The health and safety of all who work in and visit our properties has and continues to be our top priority, and
beginning in 2020 and sustained through 2021, we enrolled and successfully achieved the International WELL
Building Institute’s (WELL) third party verified WELL Health-Safety Rating for Facility Operations and Management for
over 200 properties in our portfolio. This rating was earned primarily as a result of our emergency management
program and the implementation of Simon’s rigorous COVID-19 exposure mitigation protocols. To learn more about
our Health-Safety efforts and rating visit: www.simon.com/health.
 Since 2003, we have measured our environmental impact and utilized sustainability to reduce this impact
while achieving cost efficiencies in our operations by implementing a range of energy management practices. As a
result, we have reduced our energy consumption every year since 2003. In this period, excluding new developments,
we have reduced the energy usage over which we have direct control, by 540 million kWh, representing a 51%
reduction across a portfolio of comparable properties. In recent years, we have ramped up these efforts, and from
2013-2020 have achieved an energy use reduction of 370 million kWh, representing a 41% reduction in a seven-year
period, accounting for 69% of total reductions achieved since 2003.
Our reduction in greenhouse gas emissions resulting from our energy management efforts since 2003 is
384,962 metric tons of CO2e. This figure represents a reduction of 67% and includes emission streams scope 1 and
scope 2. Enhanced efforts from 2013-2020 have resulted in emissions reduction of 199,886 metric tons of CO2e. This
represents a 51% reduction in a seven-year period, accounting for 52% of total reductions achieved since 2003.
Additional emission streams, such as scope 3 emissions generated from tenants’ plug-load consumption, are
included in Simon’s annual sustainability report published in accordance with the guidelines of the Global Reporting
Initiatives (GRI).
We are also focused on reducing our water usage and have a goal of reducing consumption by 20% from
levels established in 2013 before 2025. While in 2020 we achieved a reduction of 25% in water use, this was primarily
due to governmental restrictions which caused the temporary closure of our properties. Therefore, Simon is not
comparing FY2020 water consumption against its 2025 target, and we will release our water consumption against the
20% reduction goal in 2022.
In 2020, due to governmental restrictions, many centers were closed temporarily. For this reason, our
environmental impact during 2020 shows a steep decrease compared to other years. Our energy consumption
decreased in this period by 27% and our carbon emissions from our properties decreased by 26%. We used 25% less
water in 2020 compared to 2019 and collected 42% less solid waste. Since our assets were not open for
approximately 13,500 shopping days during 2020, these reductions do not represent actual environmental
improvements alone, but a combination of these and the many actions our management teams took to reduce
operational expenditures during the closures. For this reason, the reductions from 2019 to 2020 should not be viewed
as continuing on an annual basis.
In 2020, Simon announced new 2035 emissions targets approved by the Science Based Target Initiative
(SBTi). Our commitment is to reduce scope 1 and scope 2 emissions by 68% (2019 baseline), and scope 3, including
tenant emissions by 21% (2018 baseline). We are developing our “Roadmap to 2035” which will identify how we will
plan to achieve our new science-based targets and that will detail all aspects of our business that will include a
sustainability focus. Our complete “Low Carbon Transition Plan” will be published in the future. We also continue to
align our climate-related risk disclosure with the recommendations made by the Task Force on Climate Related
Financial Disclosures (TCFD), established by the Financial Stability Board (FSB).
Simon’s sustainability performance improved in 2021 and has been recognized by international organizations.
In 2021, Simon again participated in CDP’s annual climate change questionnaire, and for the 2nd consecutive year
received an A score, earning a prestigious place on CDP’s climate change ‘A List’ that represents results achieved by
only 200 of the 13,000+ (<1.5%) reporting organizations globally. In 2021 Simon was once again awarded a Green
Star ranking (2014-
Table of Contents
472021) - the highest designation awarded for leadership in sustainability performance by the Global Real Estate
Sustainability Benchmark (GRESB). Simon was also awarded 28 new Institute of Real Estate Management (IREM®)
Certified Sustainable Property Certifications (IREM CSP) across our portfolio and renewed our certifications at the
Shops at Crystals. The IREM CSP is a prestigious sustainability certification program that focuses on the role of
exceptional real estate management in green building performance.  Finally, Simon was recognized for the first time
as a “Best Places to Work for Disability Inclusion” by Disability: IN for our continued efforts in diversity and inclusion.
To learn more and access the latest report visit: investors.simon.com/sustainability.  The information in such
report is not incorporated herein by reference and should not be considered part of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Mortgages and Unsecured Debt
The following table sets forth certain information regarding the mortgages encumbering our properties, and the
properties held by our domestic and international joint venture arrangements, and also our unsecured corporate debt,
excluding TRG. Substantially all of the mortgage and property related debt is nonrecourse to us.  
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2021
(Dollars in thousands)
Interest Face Annual DebtMaturity 
Property Name     Rate     Amount     Service (1)    Date 
Consolidated Indebtedness:
Secured Indebtedness:
Arizona Mills   
3.80%  $  99,682 $ 5,582 09/01/26
Birch Run Premium Outlets   
4.21%   123,000  5,249(2)02/06/26
Calhoun Outlet Marketplace   
4.17%   17,552(19)  1,139 06/01/26
Domain, The   
3.09%   210,000  6,497(2)07/01/31
Ellenton Premium Outlets   
4.30%   178,000  7,758(2)12/01/25
Empire Mall   
4.31%   180,452  11,289 12/01/25
Florida Keys Outlet Marketplace   
4.17%   17,000  718(2)12/01/25
Gaffney Outlet Marketplace   
4.17%   28,352(19)  1,839 06/01/26
Grove City Premium Outlets   
4.31%   140,000  6,116(2)12/01/25
Gulfport Premium Outlets   
4.35%   50,000  2,204(2)12/01/25
Gurnee Mills   
3.99%   257,710  10,283(2)10/01/26
Hagerstown Premium Outlets   
4.26%   71,901  4,546 02/06/26
La Reggia Designer Outlet Phases 1 & 2   
2.53%  (25)  148,397(30)  13,014 02/15/22
Lee Premium Outlets   
4.17%   48,604(19)  2,975 06/01/26
Noventa Di Piave Designer Outlet Phases 1, 2, 3, 4   
1.90%   314,876(30)  6,648(2)07/25/25
Ochtrup Designer Outlet 
2.10%   56,715(30)  2,586(2)06/30/26
Opry Mills   
4.09%   375,000  15,558(2)07/01/26
Outlets at Orange, The   
4.22%   215,000  9,192(2)04/01/24
Oxford Valley Mall   
4.77%   32,783(8)  3,429 03/06/21
Parndorf Designer Outlet   
2.00%   208,273(30)  4,066(2)07/04/29
Penn Square Mall   
3.84%   310,000  12,076(2)01/01/26
Phipps Plaza Hotel   
1.85%  (1)  25,000  470(2)10/25/26
Pismo Beach Premium Outlets   
3.33%   32,975(20)  1,953 09/06/26
Plaza Carolina   
1.20%  (1)  225,000  2,782(2)07/27/23
Pleasant Prairie Premium Outlets   
4.00%   145,000  5,873(2)09/01/27
Potomac Mills   
3.46%   416,000  14,583(2)11/01/26
Provence Designer Outlet   
1.60%  (28)  92,899(30)  1,775(2)07/27/22(3)
Puerto Rico Premium Outlets   
1.20%  (1)  160,000  1,962(2)07/26/23
Queenstown Premium Outlets   
3.33%   57,928(20)  3,430 09/06/26
Roermond Designer Outlet   
1.78%   260,891(30)  4,974(2)03/31/22
Roosendaal Designer Outlets   
1.75%  (24)  65,105(30)  6,689 02/25/24(3)
Shops at Chestnut Hill, The   
4.69%   120,000  5,703(2)11/01/23
Southridge Mall   
3.85%   112,087  4,342(2)06/06/23
Summit Mall   
3.31%   85,000  2,856(2)10/01/26
Syosset Park 
2.60%  (1)  48,854  1,271 05/12/26(3)
48University Park Village   
3.85%   53,408  3,091 05/01/28
White Oaks Mall   
2.98%  (1)  42,594  2,894 06/01/24(3)
Williamsburg Premium Outlets   
4.23%   185,000  7,932(2)02/06/26
Wolfchase Galleria 
4.15%   155,152  6,522(2)11/01/26
Total Consolidated Secured Indebtedness $ 5,366,190
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2021
(Dollars in thousands)
Interest Face Annual DebtMaturity 
Property Name     Rate     Amount     Service (1)    Date 
Unsecured Indebtedness:
Simon Property Group, L.P.  
Global Commercial Paper - USD   
0.22%  (16)  500,000   1,104(2)01/23/22
Revolving Credit Facility - USD   
0.88%  (15)  125,000   1,100(2)06/30/25(3)
Supplemental Credit Facility - USD 
0.88%  (15)  1,050,000(35)  9,240(2)01/31/27(3)
Unsecured Notes - 22C   
6.75%   600,000   
40,500(14)02/01/40
Unsecured Notes - 25C   
4.75%   550,000   
26,125(14)03/15/42
Unsecured Notes - 27B   
3.75%   600,000   
22,500(14)02/01/24
Unsecured Notes - 28A   
3.38%   900,000 
30,375(14)10/01/24
Unsecured Notes - 28B   
4.25%   400,000 
17,000(14)10/01/44
Unsecured Notes - 29B   
3.50%   1,100,000   
38,500(14)09/01/25
Unsecured Notes - 30B   
3.30%   800,000   
26,400(14)01/15/26
Unsecured Notes - 31B   
3.25%   750,000   
24,375(14)11/30/26
Unsecured Notes - 31C   
4.25%   550,000   
23,375(14)11/30/46
Unsecured Notes - 32B   
3.38%   750,000   
25,313(14)06/15/27
Unsecured Notes - 33A   
2.75%   600,000   
16,500(14)06/01/23
Unsecured Notes - 33B   
3.38%   750,000   
25,313(14)12/01/27
Unsecured Notes - 34A   
2.00%   1,000,000   
20,000(14)09/13/24
Unsecured Notes - 34B   
2.45%   1,250,000   
30,625(14)09/13/29
Unsecured Notes - 34C   
3.25%   1,250,000   
40,625(14)09/13/49
Unsecured Notes - 35A 
2.65%   750,000 
19,875(14)07/15/30
Unsecured Notes - 35B 
3.80%   750,000 
28,500(14)07/15/50
Unsecured Notes - 36A 
1.75%   800,000 
14,000(14)02/01/28
Unsecured Notes - 36B 
2.20%   700,000 
15,400(14)02/01/31
Unsecured Notes - 37A 
1.38%   550,000  7,563(14)01/15/27
Unsecured Notes - 37B 
2.25%   700,000 
15,750(14)01/15/32
Unsecured Notes - Euro 2   
1.38%   850,731(13)  
11,698(6)11/18/22
Unsecured Notes - Euro 3 
1.25%   567,156(10)  7,089(6)05/13/25
Unsecured Notes - Euro 4 
1.13%   850,731(13)  9,571(6)03/19/33
Total Consolidated Unsecured Indebtedness $ 
20,043,618
Total Consolidated Indebtedness at Face Amounts $ 
25,409,808
Premium on Indebtedness   28,055
Discount on Indebtedness   (56,127)
Debt Issuance Costs   (124,159)
Other Debt Obligations   63,445 
(18)
Total Consolidated Indebtedness $ 
25,321,022
Our Share of Consolidated Indebtedness $ 
25,148,756
49
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2021
(Dollars in thousands)
Interest Face Annual DebtMaturity 
Property Name     Rate     Amount     Service (1)    Date 
Joint Venture Indebtedness:
Secured Indebtedness:  
Ami Premium Outlets   
2.22%  $  14,889(26)$ 13,252 09/25/23
Arundel Mills   
4.29%    383,500   16,673(2)02/06/24
Ashford Designer Outlet   
3.08%    135,121(21)  4,062(2)02/22/22
Aventura Mall   
4.12%    1,750,000   73,124(2)07/01/28
Avenues, The   
3.60%    110,000   4,015(2)02/06/23
Briarwood Mall   
3.29%    165,000   5,507(2)09/01/26
Busan Premium Outlets   
3.04%    91,624(17)  2,574(2)06/20/23
Cape Cod Mall   
2.35%  (1)  52,000   1,223(2)07/30/26(3)
Charlotte Premium Outlets   
4.27%    100,000   4,278(2)07/01/28
Clarksburg Premium Outlets   
3.95%    160,000   6,362(2)01/01/28
Coconut Point   
3.95%    179,212   10,811 10/01/26
Colorado Mills - 1   
4.28%    126,401   8,050 11/01/24
Colorado Mills - 2   
2.80%    30,000   1,099(2)07/01/31
Concord Mills   
3.84%    235,000   9,140(2)11/01/22
Crystal Mall   
4.46%    83,086   4,742 06/06/22
Dadeland Mall   
4.50%    385,000   27,439 01/05/27
Dadeland Mall Hotel 
2.45%  (1)  27,134  665(2)07/01/24(3)
Del Amo Fashion Center   
3.66%    585,000   21,694(2)06/01/27
Domain Westin   
4.12%    61,876   4,406 09/01/25
Dover Mall   
5.57%    80,506   4,485(2)08/06/26
Emerald Square Mall   
4.71%    99,568   4,615(2)08/11/22
Falls, The   
3.45%    150,000   5,247(2)09/01/26
Fashion Centre at Pentagon City, The   
3.04%  (1)  455,000   13,834(2)05/09/26(3)
Fashion Valley   
3.75%  (34)  415,000   15,563(2)02/01/26(3)
Florida Mall, The   
5.25%    296,071   25,172 03/05/22
Galleria, The   
3.55%    1,200,000   43,189(2)03/01/25
Genting Highland Premium Outlets   
3.97%  (7)  19,051(9)  870(2)02/14/24
Gloucester Premium Outlets 
1.60%  (1)  86,000  1,399(2)03/01/23(3)
Gotemba Premium Outlets   
0.16%    112,952(26)  270(2)04/08/27
Grapevine Mills   
3.83%   268,000  10,414(2)10/01/24
Hamilton Town Center   
4.81%   74,613  5,286 04/01/22
Katy Mills   
3.49%   140,000  4,954(2)12/06/22
Kobe-Sanda Premium Outlets   
0.34%  (12)  7,821(26)  28(2)01/31/23
Lehigh Valley Mall   
4.06%    185,317   11,522 11/01/27
Liberty Tree Mall   
3.41%    28,486   1,964 05/06/23
50Malaga Designer Outlet   
2.75%  (22)  67,246   2,166(2)02/09/23
Mall at Rockingham Park, The   
4.04%    262,000   10,732(2)06/01/26
Mall at Tuttle Crossing, The   
3.56%    114,814   4,056(2)05/01/23
Mall of New Hampshire, The   
4.11%    150,000   6,248(2)07/01/25
Meadowood Mall   
5.70%    107,841   8,592 12/01/26
Miami International Mall   
4.42%    160,000   7,170(2)02/06/24
Northshore Mall   
3.30%    222,911   14,717 07/05/23
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2021
(Dollars in thousands)
Interest Face Annual DebtMaturity 
Property Name     Rate     Amount     Service (1)    Date 
Ontario Mills   
4.25%    280,247   20,976 03/05/22
Paju Premium Outlets   
2.95%    59,680(17)  4,340(2)07/13/24
Premium Outlet Collection Edmonton IA   
1.73%  (4)  107,476(5)  1,870(2)11/30/23
Premium Outlets Montréal   
3.08%    94,498(5)  2,703(2)06/01/24
Quaker Bridge Mall   
4.50%    180,000   8,100(2)05/01/26
Querétaro Premium Outlets - Fixed   
9.98%    21,227(32)  2,119 12/20/33
Querétaro Premium Outlets - Variable 
8.49%   4,070(32)  346(2)06/30/23
Rinku Premium Outlets - Fixed   
0.30%    51,263(26)  155(2)07/31/27
Rinku Premium Outlets - Variable 
0.34%  (12)  8,687(26)  29(2)07/31/22
Roermond 4 Designer Outlet   
1.30%  (23)  190,563(30)  2,477(2)08/18/25
Roosevelt Field Hotel   
3.20%  (1)  29,150   772(2)07/31/23(3)
Sano Premium Outlets   
0.28%    39,533(26)  129(2)02/28/25
Sawgrass Mills Hotel   
5.27%  (33)  28,501   1,502(1)06/07/24(3)
Shisui Premium Outlets Phase 1   
0.32%  (12)  24,329(26)  258(2)05/31/23
Shisui Premium Outlets Phase 2   
0.35%    43,443(26)  150(2)04/08/25
Shisui Premium Outlets Phase 3   
0.32%  (12)  22,591(26)  72(2)11/30/23
Shops at Clearfork, The   
2.81%  (27)  145,000   4,072(2)03/11/30
Shops at Crystals, The   
3.74%    550,000   20,878(2)07/01/26
Shops at Mission Viejo, The   
3.61%    295,000   10,797(2)02/01/23
Siam Premium Outlets Bangkok   
3.95%    73,305(11)  2,152(2)06/05/31
Siheung Premium Outlets   
2.51%    126,086(17)  3,625(2)03/15/24
Silver Sands Premium Outlets   
3.93%    100,000   2,940(2)06/01/22
Smith Haven Mall   
3.10%  (1)  171,750   5,392(2)03/31/24(3)
Solomon Pond Mall   
4.01%    91,178   5,833 11/01/22
Southdale Hotel   
2.10%  (1)  17,000   431(2)06/01/22
Southdale Residential   
4.46%    37,160   2,525 10/15/35
Springfield Mall   
4.45%    57,949   4,171 10/06/25
Square One Mall   
5.47%    84,177   4,701(2)01/06/27
St. Johns Town Center   
3.82%    350,000   13,552(2)09/11/24
St. Louis Premium Outlets   
4.06%    91,459   5,478 10/06/24
Stoneridge Shopping Center   
3.50%    330,000   11,550(2)09/05/26
Tanger Outlets Columbus   
1.95%  (1)  71,000   1,502(2)11/28/22(3)
Tanger Outlets - Galveston/Houston   
1.95%  (1)  64,500   1,385(2)07/01/23(3)
Toki Premium Outlets - Fixed   
0.21%    23,025(26)  52(2)11/30/24
Toki Premium Outlets - Variable   
0.29%  (12)  3,041(26)  3,041(2)11/30/24
Toronto Premium Outlets   
3.11%    133,871(5)  4,158(2)06/01/22
Toronto Premium Outlets II   
1.63%  (4)  92,729(5)  1,509(2)05/24/22
51Tosu Premium Outlets   
0.20%  (12)  53,870(26)  169(2)10/31/26
Twin Cities Premium Outlets   
4.32%    115,000   5,037(2)11/06/24
Vancouver Designer Outlet 
1.98%  (4)  127,104(5)  2,388(2)02/18/23(3)
West Midlands Designer Outlets 
3.91%   81,632(16)  3,193(1)02/27/23
West Town Mall 
4.37%    203,199   12,844 07/01/22
Westchester, The 
3.25%    400,000   13,181(2)02/01/30
Woodfield Mall 
4.50%    389,507  26,137 03/05/24
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2021
(Dollars in thousands)
52Interest Face Annual DebtMaturity 
Property Name     Rate     Amount     Service (1)    Date 
Yeoju Premium Outlets 
2.95%    56,316(17)  1,953(2)09/28/24
Total Joint Venture Secured Indebtedness at Face
Value   
14,898,156 
TMLP Indebtedness at Face Value   363,137 
(29)
Total Joint Venture and TMLP Indebtedness at Face
Value   
15,261,293 
Debt Issuance Costs   (37,583)
Total Joint Venture Indebtedness $ 
15,223,710 
Our Share of Joint Venture Indebtedness $ 6,994,873 
(31)
(1)Variable rate loans based on one-month (1M) LIBOR plus interest rate spreads ranging from 110 bps to 324 bps.  1M
LIBOR as of December 31, 2021 was 0.10%.
(2)Requires monthly payment of interest only.
(3)Includes applicable extension available at the Applicable Borrower's option.
(4)Variable rate loans based on 1M CDOR plus interest rate spreads ranging from 120 bps to 155 bps.  1M CDOR at
December 31, 2021 was 0.45%.
(5)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  CAD equivalent is 705.6 million.
(6)Requires annual payment of interest only.
(7)Variable rate loans based on Cost of Fund plus interest rate spreads of 175 bps. Cost of Fund as of December 31, 2021
was 2.22%.
(8)Mortgage is outstanding as of 12/31/2021, the single purpose entity borrower and the lender are currently working
together to extend the maturity date of this non-recourse loan.
(9)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Ringgit equivalent is 79.4 million.
(10)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Euro equivalent is 500.0 million.
(11)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Baht equivalent is 2.4 billion.
(12)Variable rate loans based on six-month (6M) TIBOR plus interest rate spreads ranging from 15 bps to 35 bps.  As of
December 31, 2021, 6M TIBOR was 0.14%.
(13)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Euro equivalent is 750.0 million.
(14)Requires semi-annual payments of interest only.
(15)Credit Facilities. As of December 31, 2021, the Credit Facilities bear interest at a SOFR index subject to a 10bps
adjustment plus 72.5 bps credit spread. The Credit Facilities provide for different pricing based upon our investment
grade rating. As of December 31, 2021, $5.8 billion was available after outstanding borrowings and letters of credit
under our Credit Facilities.
(16)Reflects the weighted average maturity date and weighted average interest rate of all outstanding tranches of
commercial paper at December 31, 2021.
(17)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Won equivalent is 397.0 billion.
(18)City of Sunrise Bond Liability (Sawgrass Mills).
(19)Loans secured by these three properties are cross-collateralized and cross-defaulted.
(20)Loans secured by these two properties are cross-collateralized and cross-defaulted.
(21)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  GBP equivalent is 100.0 million.
(22)Variable rate loan based on three-month (3M) EURIBOR, which is subject to a floor of 0.00%, plus an interest rate
spread of 275 bps.
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2021
(Dollars in thousands)
53(23)Variable rate loan based on 3M EURIBOR plus an interest rate spread of 130 bps. Through an interest rate floor
agreement, 3M EURIBOR is currently fixed at 0.00%. Also, 3M EURIBOR is capped at 1.30%.
(24)Variable rate loan based on 3M EURIBOR, which is subject to a floor of 0.00%, plus an interest rate spread of 175 bps.
(25)Variable rate loan based on 3M EURIBOR plus an interest rate spread from 250 bps to 275 bps.  Through an interest
rate floor agreement, 3M EURIBOR is currently fixed at 0.00%.
(26)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Yen equivalent is 46.7 billion
(27)Associated with this loan is an interest rate swap agreement that effectively fixes the interest rate on this loan at the all-
in rate presented.
(28)Variable rate loan based on 3M EURIBOR plus an interest rate spread of 160 bps. Through an interest rate floor
agreement, 3M EURIBOR is currently fixed at 0.00%. In addition, 3M EURIBOR is capped at 1.00%.
(29)Consists of two properties with interest rates ranging from 5.65% to 7.32% and maturities in 2024.
(30)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Euro equivalent is 1.2 billion.
(31)Our share of total indebtedness includes a pro rata share of the mortgage debt on joint venture properties, including
properties owned by The Mills Limited Partnership.  To the extent total indebtedness is secured by a property, it is non-
recourse to us, with the exception of approximately $209.9 million of payment guarantees provided by the Operating
Partnership.
(32)Amount shown in USD equivalent. Peso equivalent is 517.6 million.
(33)Variable rate loan based on 1M LIBOR plus an interest rate spread of 295 bps. In addition, LIBOR floor at 2.32%.
(34)Variable rate loan based on 1M LIBOR plus an interest rate spread of 350 bps. In addition, LIBOR floor at 0.25%.
(35)On January 12, 2022, the Operating Partnership repaid $1.05 billion under the Supplemental Credit Facility.
The changes in consolidated mortgages and unsecured indebtedness for the years ended December 31,
2021, 2020 and 2019 are as follows:
    2021     2020     2019  
Balance, Beginning of Year $ 26,723,361 $ 24,163,230 $ 23,305,535
Additions during period:
New Loan Originations   9,255,220   15,269,455   13,355,809
Loans assumed in acquisitions and consolidation   46,263   —   21,001
Net (Discount)/Premium   (9,118)   28,906   (16,903)
Net Debt Issuance Costs  (35,818)  (34,595)  (23,505)
Deductions during period:
Loan Retirements   (10,386,133)   
(12,932,448)   
(12,366,951)
Amortization of Net Discounts/(Premiums)   168   174   (758)
Debt Issuance Cost Amortization  24,794  23,076  18,400
Scheduled Principal Amortization   (48,386)   (51,728)   (58,419)
Foreign Currency Translation  (249,329)  257,291  (70,979)
Balance, Close of Year $ 25,321,022 $ 26,723,361 $ 24,163,230
Table of Contents
54Item 3.  Legal Proceedings
We are involved from time-to-time in various legal and regulatory proceedings that arise in the ordinary course
of our business, including, but not limited to, commercial disputes, environmental matters, and litigation in connection
with transactions such as acquisitions and divestitures. We believe that current proceedings will not have a material
adverse effect on our financial condition, liquidity or results of operations. We record a liability when a loss is
considered probable and the amount can be reasonably estimated.
Item 4.  Mine Safety Disclosures
Not applicable.
Table of Contents
55Part II
Item 5.  Market for the Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters, and Issuer Purchases of
Equity Securities
Simon
Market Information
Simon’s common stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol “SPG”.
Holders
The number of holders of record of common stock outstanding was 1,102 as of January 31, 2022. The Class B
common stock is subject to two voting trusts as to which Herbert Simon and David Simon are the trustees. Shares of
Class B common stock convert automatically into an equal number of shares of common stock upon the occurrence
of certain events and can be converted into shares of common stock at the option of the holders.
Dividends
We must pay a minimum amount of dividends to maintain Simon’s status as a REIT. Simon’s future dividends
and future distributions of the Operating Partnership will be determined by Simon’s Board of Directors, in its sole
discretion, based on actual and projected financial condition, liquidity and results of operations, cash available for
dividends and limited partner distributions, cash reserves as deemed necessary for capital and operating
expenditures, financing covenants, if any, and the amount required to maintain Simon’s status as a REIT.
Common stock cash dividends paid during 2021 aggregated $7.15 per share. Common stock cash dividends
during 2020 aggregated $4.70 per share. On February 7, 2022, Simon’s Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash
dividend for the first quarter of 2022 of $1.65 per share, payable on March 31, 2022 to shareholders of record on
March 10, 2022.  
We offer a dividend reinvestment plan that allows Simon’s stockholders to acquire additional shares by
automatically reinvesting cash dividends. Shares are acquired pursuant to the plan at a price equal to the prevailing
market price of such shares, without payment of any brokerage commission or service charge.
Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities
There were no unregistered sales of equity securities made by Simon during the quarter ended December 31,
2021.
Issuances Under Equity Compensation Plans
For information regarding the securities authorized for issuance under our equity compensation plans, see
Item 12 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
There were no unregistered purchases of equity securities made by Simon during the quarter ended
December 31, 2021.
The Operating Partnership
Market Information
There is no established trading market for units or preferred units.  
Holders
The number of holders of record of units was 228 as of January 31, 2022.
Distributions
The Operating Partnership makes distributions on its units in amounts sufficient to maintain Simon's
qualification as a REIT. Simon is required each year to distribute to its stockholders at least 90% of its REIT taxable
income after certain
Table of Contents
56adjustments. Future distributions will be determined by Simon’s Board of Directors, in its sole discretion, based on
actual and projected financial condition, liquidity and results of operations, cash available for distributions, cash
reserves as deemed necessary for capital and operating expenditures, financing covenants, if any, and the
distributions that may be required to maintain Simon's status as a REIT.
Distributions during 2021 aggregated $7.15 per unit.  Distributions during 2020 aggregated $4.70 per unit.  On
February 7, 2022, Simon’s Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash distribution for the first quarter of 2022 of
$1.65 per unit, payable on March 31, 2022 to unitholders of record on March 10, 2022.  The distribution rate on the
Operating Partnership’s units is equal to the dividend rate on Simon’s common stock.
Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities
There were no unregistered sales of equity securities made by the Operating Partnership during the quarter
ended December 31, 2021.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
During the quarter ended December 31, 2021, the Operating Partnership redeemed 15,219 units from five
limited partners for $2.2 million in cash.  
Item 6.  Reserved
Table of Contents
57Item 7.  Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
The following discussion should be read in conjunction with the consolidated financial statements and notes
thereto that are included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Overview
Simon Property Group, Inc. is a Delaware corporation that operates as a self-administered and self-managed
real estate investment trust, or REIT, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or the Internal Revenue
Code. REITs will generally not be liable for U.S. federal corporate income taxes as long as they distribute not less
than 100% of their REIT taxable income. Simon Property Group, L.P. is our majority-owned Delaware partnership
subsidiary that owns all of our real estate properties and other assets. In this discussion, unless stated otherwise or
the context otherwise requires, references to "Simon" mean Simon Property Group, Inc. and references to the
"Operating Partnership" mean Simon Property Group, L.P.  References to "we," "us" and "our" mean collectively
Simon, the Operating Partnership and those entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by Simon and/or the Operating
Partnership. According to the Operating Partnership's partnership agreement, the Operating Partnership is required to
pay all expenses of Simon.
We own, develop and manage premier shopping, dining, entertainment and mixed-use destinations, which
consist primarily of malls, Premium Outlets®, and The Mills®. As of December 31, 2021, we owned or held an interest
in 199 income-producing properties in the United States, which consisted of 95 malls, 69 Premium Outlets, 14 Mills,
six lifestyle centers, and 15 other retail properties in 37 states and Puerto Rico. We also own an 80% noncontrolling
interest in The Taubman Realty Group, LLC, or TRG, which has an interest in 24 regional, super-regional, and outlet
malls in the U.S. and Asia. In addition, we have redevelopment and expansion projects, including the addition of
anchors, big box tenants, and restaurants, underway at several properties in the North America, Europe and Asia.
Internationally, as of December 31, 2021, we had ownership in 33 Premium Outlets and Designer Outlet properties
primarily located in Asia, Europe, and Canada. We also have two international outlet properties under development.
As of December 31, 2021, we also owned a 22.4% equity stake in Klépierre SA, or Klépierre, a publicly traded, Paris-
based real estate company, which owns, or has an interest in, shopping centers located in 14 countries in Europe.
We generate the majority of our lease income from retail, dining, entertainment, and other tenants including
consideration received from:
●fixed minimum lease consideration and fixed common area maintenance (CAM) reimbursements, and
●variable lease consideration primarily based on tenants’ sales, as well as reimbursements for real estate
taxes, utilities, marketing and certain other items.
Revenues of our management company, after intercompany eliminations, consist primarily of management
fees that are typically based upon the revenues of the property being managed.
We invest in real estate properties to maximize total financial return which includes both operating cash flows
and capital appreciation. We seek growth in earnings, funds from operations, or FFO, and cash flows by enhancing
the profitability and operation of our properties and investments. We seek to accomplish this growth through the
following:
●attracting and retaining high quality tenants and utilizing economies of scale to reduce operating expenses,
●expanding and re-tenanting existing highly productive locations at competitive rental rates,
●selectively acquiring or increasing our interests in high quality real estate assets or portfolios of assets,
●generating consumer traffic in our retail properties through marketing initiatives and strategic corporate
alliances, and
●selling selective non-core assets.
We also grow by generating supplemental revenues from the following activities:
●establishing our malls as leading market resource providers for retailers and other businesses and
consumer-focused corporate alliances, including payment systems (such as handling fees relating to the
sales of bank-issued prepaid cards), national marketing alliances, static and digital media initiatives,
business development, sponsorship, and events,
Table of Contents
58●offering property operating services to our tenants and others, including waste handling and facility
services, and the provision of energy services,
●selling or leasing land adjacent to our properties, commonly referred to as “outlots” or “outparcels,” and
●generating interest income on cash deposits and investments in loans, including those made to related
entities.
We focus on high quality real estate across the retail real estate spectrum. We expand or redevelop properties
to enhance profitability and market share of existing assets when we believe the investment of our capital meets our
risk-reward criteria. We selectively develop new properties in markets we believe are not adequately served by
existing retail outlet properties.
We routinely review and evaluate acquisition opportunities based on their ability to enhance our portfolio. Our
international strategy includes partnering with established real estate companies and financing international
investments with local currency to minimize foreign exchange risk.
To support our growth, we employ a three-fold capital strategy:
●provide the capital necessary to fund growth,
●maintain sufficient flexibility to access capital in many forms, both public and private, and
●manage our overall financial structure in a fashion that preserves our investment grade credit ratings.
We consider FFO, net operating income, or NOI, and portfolio NOI to be key measures of operating
performance that are not specifically defined by accounting principles generally accepted in the United States, or
GAAP. We use these measures internally to evaluate the operating performance of our portfolio and provide a basis
for comparison with other real estate companies. Reconciliations of these measures to the most comparable GAAP
measure are included below in this discussion.
COVID-19
On March 11, 2020, the World Health Organization declared the novel strain of coronavirus, or COVID-19, a
global pandemic and recommended containment and mitigation measures worldwide. The COVID-19 pandemic has
had a material negative impact on economic and market conditions around the world, and, notwithstanding the fact
that vaccines are being administered in the United States and elsewhere, the pandemic continues to adversely impact
economic activity in retail real estate. The impact of the COVID-19 pandemic continues to evolve and governments
and other authorities, including where we own or hold interests in properties, have imposed at times measures
intended to control its spread, including restrictions on freedom of movement, group gatherings and business
operations such as travel bans, border closings, business closures, quarantines, stay-at-home, shelter-in-place
orders, capacity limitations and social distancing measures. As a result of the COVID-19 pandemic and these periodic
measures, the Company has experienced material impacts including changes in the ability to recognize revenue due
to changes in our assessment of the probability of collection of lease income and asset impairment charges as a
result of changing cash flows generated by our properties and investments.  Due to certain restrictive governmental
orders placed on us, our domestic portfolio lost approximately 13,500 shopping days in 2020, the majority of which
occurred in the second quarter.
As we developed and implemented our response to the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic and restrictions
intended to prevent its spread on our business, our primary focus has been on the health and safety of our
employees, our shoppers and the communities in which we serve.  In the second quarter of 2020, in connection with
the property closures, we implemented a series of actions to reduce costs and increase liquidity in light of the
economic impacts of the pandemic, including:
●significantly reduced all non-essential corporate spending,
●significantly reduced property operating expenses, including discretionary marketing spend,
●implemented a temporary furlough of certain corporate and field employees due to the closure of the
Company’s U.S. properties as a result of restrictive governmental orders; reduced certain corporate and
field personnel and implemented a temporary freeze on company hiring efforts, and
●suspended more than $1.0 billion of redevelopment and new development projects.
Table of Contents
59Results Overview
Diluted earnings per share and diluted earnings per unit increased $3.25 during 2021 to $6.84 as compared to
$3.59 in 2020. The increase in diluted earnings per share and diluted earnings per unit was primarily attributable to:
●improved operating performance and solid core business fundamentals in 2021 and the impact of our
acquisition, development and expansion activity,
●increased income from unconsolidated entities of $563.0 million, or $1.50 per diluted share/unit, primarily
due to favorable results of operations from our other platform investments, including earnings from our
acquisition of an interest in J.C. Penney in the later part of 2020, and international investments which
included the reversal of a previously established deferred tax liability at Klépierre resulting in a non-cash
gain, of which our share was $118.4 million, partially offset by amortization of our excess investment in
TRG,
●increased other income of $65.3 million, or $0.17 per diluted share/unit, primarily due to an increase in
lease settlement income of $39.8 million, or $0.11 per diluted share/unit,
●a non-cash gain in 2021 on acquisitions and disposals of $203.4 million, or $0.54 per diluted share/unit,
related to the disposition of our interest in three properties of $176.8 million, or $0.47 per diluted share/unit,
a non-cash gain on the consolidation of one property of $3.7 million, or $0.01 per diluted share/unit, and
net gains of $21.0 million, or $0.06 per diluted share/unit, related to property insurance recoveries of
previously depreciated assets, primarily due to hurricane, flood and wind storm damage,
●a net loss in 2020 of $115.0 million, or $0.32 per diluted share/unit, primarily related to impairment charges
related to Klépierre, an unconsolidated investment, one consolidated property, and three joint venture
properties, partially offset by gains from disposition activity, of $14.9 million, or $0.04 per diluted share/unit,
●a non-cash gain in 2021 on the exchange of equity interests of $159.8 million, or $0.43 per diluted
share/unit,
●a gain in 2021 on the sale of equity interests of $18.8 million, or $0.05 per diluted share/unit, and
●an unrealized favorable change in fair value of equity instruments of $11.5 million, or $0.03 per diluted
share/unit, partially offset by
●increased tax expense of $161.8 million, or $0.43 per diluted share/unit, primarily due to favorable year-
over-year operations from other platform investments and a $55.9 million tax impact created by the gain on
sale or exchange of equity interests transactions noted above,
●increased interest expense in 2021 of $11.3 million, or $0.03 per diluted share/unit, due to Term Loan
borrowings, which were subsequently replaced by notes issuances to fund our investment in TRG, and
●a charge on early extinguishment of debt of $51.8 million, or $0.14 per diluted share/unit, in 2021.  
Portfolio NOI increased 22.3% in 2021 as compared to 2020. Average base minimum rent for U.S. Malls and
Premium Outlets decreased 3.4% to $53.91 psf as of December 31, 2021, from $55.80 psf as of December 31, 2020.
Ending occupancy for our U.S. Malls and Premium Outlets increased 2.1% to 93.4% as of December 31, 2021, from
91.3% as of December 31, 2020, primarily due to leasing activity, partially offset by 2020 tenant bankruptcy activity.
Our effective overall borrowing rate at December 31, 2021 on our consolidated indebtedness decreased 12
basis points to 2.86% as compared to 2.98% at December 31, 2020. This decrease was primarily due to a decrease
in the effective overall borrowing rate on variable rate debt of 11 basis points (1.20% at December 31, 2021 as
compared to 1.31% at December 31, 2020) and a decrease in the effective overall borrowing rate on fixed rate debt of
22 basis points (3.28% at December 31, 2021 as compared to 3.50% at December 31, 2020).  The weighted average
years to maturity of our consolidated indebtedness was 7.8 years and 7.3 years at December 31, 2021 and 2020,
respectively.
Our financing activity for the year ended December 31, 2021 included:
●borrowing $1.05 billion under the Operating Partnership’s $3.5 billion unsecured revolving credit facility, or
Supplemental Facility, and using a portion of the proceeds to remove the encumbrances with respect to
 approximately $1.16 billion aggregate principal amount of mortgage loans,
●decreasing our borrowings under the Operating Partnership’s global unsecured commercial paper note
program, or the Commercial Paper program, by $123.0 million,
Table of Contents
60●completing, on January 21, 2021, the issuance by the Operating Partnership of the following senior
unsecured notes: $800 million with a fixed interest rate of 1.75%, $700 million with a fixed interest rate of
2.20%, with maturity dates of February 2028 and 2031, respectively. Proceeds from the unsecured notes
offering funded the optional redemption at par of the Operating Partnership’s $550 million 2.50% notes due
July 15, 2021, including the make-whole amount on January 27, 2021 and repaid $750.0 million of the
indebtedness under the Operating Partnership’s $2.0 billion delayed-draw term loan facility, or Term
Facility, which was a feature of, and in addition to, the Operating Partnership’s $4.0 billion unsecured
revolving credit facility, or Credit Facility, and together with the Supplemental Facility, the Credit Facilities,
as discussed below,
●completing, on March 19, 2021, the issuance of €750 million ($893.0 million U.S. dollar equivalent as of the
issuance date) of senior unsecured notes at a fixed rate of 1.125% with a maturity date of March 19, 2033.
Proceeds from the unsecured notes offering funded the repayment of the remaining indebtedness under
the Term Facility, as discussed below,
●repaying, on March 23, 2021, the remaining $1.25 billion outstanding under the Term Facility, reducing the
Term Facility balance to zero, and
●completing, on August 18, 2021, the issuance by the Operating Partnership of the following senior
unsecured notes: $550 million with a fixed interest rate of 1.375% and $700 million with a fixed interest rate
of 2.250%, with maturity dates of January 2027 and 2032, respectively. Proceeds from the unsecured
notes offering, along with cash on hand, funded the optional redemption, including make-whole amounts, of
the following senior unsecured notes: Operating Partnership’s $550 million 2.350% notes due January 30,
2022 and $600 million 2.625% notes due June 15, 2022, in each case on August 25, 2021, and $500
million 2.750% notes due February 1, 2023, on September 9, 2021.
Subsequently on January 11, 2022, the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of the following senior
unsecured notes: $500 million with a floating interest rate of SOFR plus 43 basis points and $700 million with a
fixed interest rate of 2.650%, with maturity dates of January 2024 and February 2032, respectively. The
Operating Partnership used the net proceeds of the offering to repay $1.05 billion outstanding under the
Supplemental Facility and for general corporate purposes, including the repayment of other indebtedness.
United States Portfolio Data
The portfolio data discussed in this overview includes the following key operating statistics: ending occupancy,
and average base minimum rent per square foot. We include acquired properties in this data beginning in the year of
acquisition and remove disposed properties in the year of disposition. For comparative information purposes, we
separate the information related to The Mills from our other U.S. operations. We also do not include any information
for properties located outside the United States or properties included in TRG.
Table of Contents
61The following table sets forth these key operating statistics for the combined U.S. Malls and Premium Outlets:
●properties that are consolidated in our consolidated financial statements,
●properties we account for under the equity method of accounting as joint ventures, and
●the foregoing two categories of properties on a total portfolio basis.
%/Basis Point %/Basis Point  
    2021 Change (1) 2020 Change (1) 2019 
U.S. Malls and Premium
Outlets:
Ending Occupancy
Consolidated  93.5 %  200bps  91.5 %  -380 bps  95.3 %
Unconsolidated  93.1 %  220bps  90.9 %  -360 bps  94.5 %
Total Portfolio  93.4 %  210bps  91.3 %  -380 bps  95.1 %
Average Base Minimum
Rent per Square Foot
Consolidated $ 52.59  (2.6)%  $ 53.98  1.7%  $ 53.06
Unconsolidated $ 57.55  (5.6)%  $ 60.97  3.8%  $ 58.71
Total Portfolio $ 53.91  (3.4)%  $ 55.80  2.2%  $ 54.59
The Mills:
Ending Occupancy   97.6 %  230 bps   95.3 %  -170bps   97.0 %
Average Base Minimum
Rent per Square Foot $ 33.80  0.1%  $ 33.77  2.1%  $ 33.09
(1)Percentages may not recalculate due to rounding. Percentage and basis point changes are representative of the
change from the comparable prior period.
Ending Occupancy Levels and Average Base Minimum Rent per Square Foot.  Ending occupancy is the
percentage of gross leasable area, or GLA, which is leased as of the last day of the reporting period. We include all
company owned space except for mall anchors, mall majors, mall freestanding and mall outlots in the calculation.
Base minimum rent per square foot is the average base minimum rent charge in effect for the reporting period for all
tenants that would qualify to be included in ending occupancy.
Total Reported Sales per Square Foot.  Given all of our U.S. retail properties were closed for a portion of the
prior year due to the COVID-19 pandemic, we are not presenting reported retail tenant sales per square foot as we do
not believe the trends for the period are indicative of future operating trends.
Current Leasing Activities
During the twelve months ended December 31, 2021, we signed 992 new leases and 1,460 renewal leases
(excluding mall anchors and majors, new development, redevelopment and leases with terms of one year or less)
with a fixed minimum rent across our U.S. Malls and Premium Outlets portfolio, comprising approximately 8.3 million
square feet, of which 6.5 million square feet related to consolidated properties. During 2020, we signed 460 new
leases and 1,175 renewal leases with a fixed minimum rent, comprising approximately 6.1 million square feet, of
which 4.8 million square feet related to consolidated properties. The average annual initial base minimum rent for new
leases was $55.90 per square foot in 2021 and $53.97 per square foot in 2020 with an average tenant allowance on
new leases of $53.75 per square foot and $51.01 per square foot, respectively.
Table of Contents
62Japan Data
The following are selected key operating statistics for our Premium Outlets in Japan. The information used to
prepare these statistics has been supplied by the managing venture partner.
December 31,     %/basis point    December 31,     %/basis point    December 31,  
2021 Change 2020 Change 2019  
Ending Occupancy 99.8% +30 bps 99.5% +0 bps 99.5%
Average Base Minimum Rent per
Square Foot ¥  5,509 1.14% ¥  5,447 3.38% ¥  5,269
Critical Accounting Estimates
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, or
GAAP, requires management to use judgment in the application of accounting policies, including making estimates
and assumptions. We base our estimates on historical experience and on various other assumptions believed to be
reasonable under the circumstances. These judgments affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities,
disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the dates of the financial statements and the reported amounts of
revenue and expenses during the reporting periods. If our judgment or interpretation of the facts and circumstances
relating to various transactions had been different, it is possible that different accounting policies would have been
applied resulting in a different presentation of our financial statements. From time to time, we reevaluate our
estimates and assumptions. In the event estimates or assumptions prove to be different from actual results,
adjustments are made in subsequent periods to reflect more current information. Below is a discussion of accounting
policies that we consider critical in that they may require complex judgment in their application or require estimates
about matters that are inherently uncertain. For a summary of our significant accounting policies, see Note 3 of the
notes to the consolidated financial statements.
● We, as a lessor, retain substantially all of the risks and benefits of ownership of the investment properties
and account for our leases as operating leases. We accrue fixed lease income on a straight-line basis over
the terms of the leases, when we believe substantially all lease income, including the related straight-line
rent receivable, is probable of collection. Our assessment of collectability incorporates available operational
performance measures such as sales and the aging of billed amounts as well as other publicly available
information with respect to our tenant’s financial condition, liquidity and capital resources, including declines
in such conditions due to, or amplified by, the COVID-19 pandemic.  When a tenant seeks to reorganize its
operations through bankruptcy proceedings, we assess the collectability of receivable balances including,
among other things, the timing of a tenant’s bankruptcy filing and our expectations of the assumption by the
tenant in bankruptcy proceeding of leases at the Company’s properties on substantially similar terms.  In
the event that we determine accrued receivables are not probable of collection, lease income will be
recorded on a cash basis, with the corresponding tenant receivable and straight-line rent receivable
charged as a direct write-off against lease income in the period of the change in our collectability
determination.  
●We review investment properties for impairment on a property-by-property basis to identify and evaluate
events or changes in circumstances which indicate that the carrying value of investment properties may not
be recoverable. These circumstances include, but are not limited to, changes in a property’s operational
performance such as declining cash flows, occupancy or total sales per square foot, the Company’s intent
and ability to hold the related asset, and, if applicable, the remaining time to maturity of underlying financing
arrangements. We measure any impairment of investment property when the estimated undiscounted
operating income before depreciation and amortization during the anticipated holding period plus its
residual value is less than the carrying value of the property. To the extent impairment has occurred, we
charge to income the excess of carrying value of the property over our estimate of its fair value. We also
review our investments, including investments in unconsolidated entities, to identify and evaluate whether
events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of our investments may not be
recoverable. We will record an impairment charge if we determine the fair value of the investments are less
than their carrying value and such impairment is other-than-temporary. Our evaluation of changes in
economic or operating conditions and whether an impairment is other-than-temporary may include
developing estimates of fair value, forecasted cash flows or operating income before depreciation and
amortization. We estimate undiscounted cash flows and fair value using observable and unobservable data
such as operating income, hold periods, estimated capitalization and discount rates, or relevant market
multiples, leasing prospects and local market information and whether certain impairments are other-than-
temporary. Changes in economic and operating conditions, including changes in the financial condition of
our tenants, and changes to our intent and ability to hold the related asset, that occur subsequent to our
review
Table of Contents
63of recoverability of investment property and other investments could impact the assumptions used in that
assessment and could result in future charges to earnings if assumptions regarding those investments differ
from actual results.
●To maintain Simon’s status as a REIT, we must distribute at least 90% of REIT taxable income in any given
year and meet certain asset and income tests. We monitor our business and transactions that may
potentially impact Simon’s REIT status. In the unlikely event that we fail to maintain Simon’s REIT status,
and available relief provisions do not apply, we would be required to pay U.S. federal income taxes at
regular corporate income tax rates during the period Simon did not qualify as a REIT. If Simon lost its REIT
status, it could not elect to be taxed as a REIT for four taxable years following the year during which
qualification was lost unless its failure was due to reasonable cause and certain other conditions were met.
As a result, failing to maintain REIT status would result in a significant increase in the income tax expense
recorded and paid during those periods.
●In the period of a significant acquisition of real estate, we make estimates as part of our valuation of the
purchase price of asset acquisitions (including the components of excess investment in joint ventures) to
the various components of the acquisition based upon the relative fair value of each component. The most
significant components of our real estate valuations are typically the determination of relative fair value to
the buildings as-if-vacant, land and market value of in-place leases. In the case of the fair value of buildings
and fair value of land and other intangibles, our estimates of the values of these components will affect the
amount of depreciation or amortization we record over the estimated useful life of the property acquired or
the remaining lease term. In the case of the market value of in-place leases, we make our best estimates of
the tenants’ ability to pay rents based upon the tenants’ operating performance at the property, including the
competitive position of the property in its market as well as sales psf, rents psf, and overall occupancy cost
for the tenants in place at the acquisition date. Our assumptions affect the amount of future revenue that we
will recognize over the remaining lease term for the acquired in-place leases.  
Results of Operations
In addition to the activity discussed above in the “Results Overview” section, the following acquisitions,
dispositions, and openings of consolidated properties affected our consolidated results in the comparative periods:
●During 2021, we disposed of three retail properties.
●During the first quarter of 2021, we consolidated one Designer Outlet property in Europe that had previously
been accounted for under the equity method.
●During the fourth quarter of 2020, we disposed of one consolidated retail property.
●On September 19, 2019, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in a hotel adjacent to one of our
properties from our joint venture partner.
●During the third quarter of 2019, we disposed of two retail properties.
In addition to the activities discussed above and in “Results Overview”, the following acquisitions, dispositions,
and openings of noncontrolling interests in joint venture entities affected our income from unconsolidated entities in
the comparative periods:
●During the fourth quarter of 2021, we disposed of our noncontrolling interest in one retail property.
●On December 20, 2021, we sold a portion of our interest in ABG for cash consideration of $65.5 million and
purchased additional interests in ABG for cash consideration of $100.0 million.  Our noncontrolling interest
in ABG is approximately 10.4%.
●On October 15, 2021, we opened Jeju Premium Outlet, a 92,000 square foot center in Jeju Province, South
Korea. We own 50% interest in this center.
●On July 1, 2021, we contributed to ABG all of our interests in the licensing ventures of Forever 21 and
Brooks Brothers for additional interests in ABG.
●On June 1, 2021, we and our partner, ABG, acquired the licensing rights of Eddie Bauer. Our non-
controlling interest in the licensing venture is 49% and was acquired for cash consideration of $100.8
million.
Table of Contents
64●On April 12, 2021, we opened West Midlands Designer Outlet, a 197,000 square foot center in Cannock,
United Kingdom. We own 23.2% interest in this center.
●In the first quarter of 2021, we and our partner, ABG, both acquired additional 12.5% interests in the
licensing and operations of Forever 21 for $56.3 million bringing our interest to 50%. Subsequently the
Forever 21 operations were merged into SPARC Group.
●On December 29, 2020, we completed the acquisition of an 80% ownership interest in TRG.
●On December 7, 2020, we and a group of co-investors acquired certain assets and liabilities of J.C. Penney,
a department store retailer, out of bankruptcy. Our interest in the venture is 41.67%.
●On June 23, 2020, we opened Siam Premium Outlets, a 264,000 square foot center in Bangkok, Thailand.
We own a 50% interest in this center.
●On February 19, 2020 we and a group of co-investors acquired certain assets and liabilities of Forever 21, a
retailer of apparel and accessories, out of bankruptcy. The interests were acquired through two separate
joint ventures, a licensing venture and an operating venture. Our interest in each of the retail operations
venture and in the licensing venture is 37.5%.
●On February 13, 2020 through our European investee, we opened Malaga Designer Outlets, a 191,000
square foot center in Malaga, Spain. We own a 46% interest in this center.
●In January 2020, we acquired additional interests of 5.05% and 1.37% in SPARC Group, formerly known as
Aeropostale and Authentic Brands Groups, LLC, or ABG, respectively.
●On October 16, 2019 we acquired a 45% interest in Rue Gilt Groupe, or RGG, to create a new multi-
platform venture dedicated to digital value shopping.
●On May 22, 2019, we and our partner opened Premium Outlets Querétaro, a 274,800 square foot center in
Santiago de Querétaro, Mexico. We own a 50% interest in this center.
For the purposes of the following comparisons between the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 and
the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, the above transactions are referred to as the property transactions. In
the following discussions of our results of operations, “comparable” refers to properties we owned and operated in
both years in the year to year comparisons.
Year Ended December 31, 2021 vs. Year Ended December 31, 2020
Lease income increased $434.4 million, of which the property transactions accounted for a $17.6 million
decrease.  Comparable lease income increased $452.0 million, or 10.6%.  Total lease income increased primarily due
to an increase in variable lease income of $603.8 million primarily related to higher consideration based on tenant
sales and lower negative variable lease income due to abatements granted in 2020 as a result of the COVID-19
pandemic, partially offset by decreases in fixed minimum lease and CAM consideration recorded on a straight-line
basis of $169.4 million.  
Total other income increased $65.3 million, primarily due to an increase in lease settlement income of $39.8
million, a $14.9 million gain on the sale of our interest in a multi-family residential property, an $11.5 million increase
related to Simon Brand Ventures and gift card revenues, a $6.8 million increase from the non-cash dilution gain on a
non-retail investment, and a $3.3 million net increase in dividend, interest and other income, partially offset by a $7.8
million decrease related to higher land and outparcel sale activity in 2020, and a $3.2 million decrease related to
business interruption proceeds received in 2020.
Property operating expenses increased $66.6 million primarily due to the reopening of properties that had
been closed during 2020 as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic and the effect of the restrictions intended to prevent
its spread and cost reduction efforts, as previously discussed.
Repairs and maintenance expenses increased $15.5 million primarily due to the reopening of properties that
had been closed during 2020 as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic and the effect of the restrictions intended to
prevent its spread and cost reduction efforts, as previously discussed.
Advertising and promotion expenses increased $15.7 million primarily due to the reopening of properties that
had been closed during 2020 as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic and the effect of the restrictions intended to
prevent its spread and cost reduction efforts.
Table of Contents
65General and administrative expense increased $7.8 million primarily due to an increase in executive
compensation.
Other expense increased $2.8 million primarily due to an increase in the write-off of development projects we
are no longer intending to pursue, partially offset by a decrease related to legal fees.
During 2021, we recorded a loss on extinguishment of debt of $51.8 million as a result of the early redemption
of unsecured notes and the payoff of mortgages at nine properties.
During 2021, we recorded gains on sale or exchange of equity interests of $178.7 million as a result of the
contribution to ABG of all of our interests in the licensing ventures of Forever 21 and Brooks Brothers in exchange for
additional interests in ABG and the sale of a portion of our interest in ABG, as discussed further in footnote 6.
Income and other tax (expense) benefit increased $161.8 million due to increased deferred tax expense as a
result of the ABG transactions noted above which had a non-cash tax impact of $55.9 million and $92.1 million related
to strong operating performance of our other platform investments as well as earnings from our acquisition of an
interest in certain retailers throughout 2020.
Income from unconsolidated entities increased $563.0 million primarily due to favorable results of operations
from our other platform investments, including earnings from our acquisition of an interest in J.C. Penney in the later
part of 2020, and international investments which included the reversal of a previously established deferred tax
liability at Klépierre resulting in a non-cash gain, of which our share was $118.4 million, partially offset by amortization
of our excess investment in TRG.
During 2021, we recorded gains of $184.0 million related to the disposition of three consolidated properties,
our interest in one unconsolidated property and the impact from the consolidation of one property that was previously
unconsolidated, and gains of $21.2 million related to property insurance recoveries of previously depreciated assets.
 During 2020, we recorded $125.6 million of impairment charges related to one consolidated property, an other-than-
temporary impairment on our equity investment in three joint venture properties, an other-than-temporary impairment
to reduce an investment to its estimated fair value, and a $4.3 million loss, net, related to the impairment and
disposition of certain assets by Klépierre, partially offset by a $12.3 million gain on the disposal of our interest in one
consolidated property, a $1.9 million excess gain on insurance proceeds related to our two properties in Puerto Rico
and a $1.0 million gain related to the disposition of a shopping center by one of our joint venture investments.
Simon’s net income attributable to noncontrolling interests increased $154.3 million due to an increase in the
net income of the Operating Partnership.  
Year Ended December 31, 2020 vs. Year Ended December 31, 2019
Lease income decreased $941.4 million, of which the property transactions accounted for $3.9 million of the
decrease.  Comparable lease income decreased $937.5 million, or 17.9%. Total lease income decreased primarily
due to decreases in fixed minimum lease and CAM consideration recorded on a straight-line basis of $422.0 million
and reduced variable lease income of $519.4 million, primarily related to lower consideration based on tenant sales
and negative variable lease income due to abatements as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic.  
Total other income decreased $190.2 million, primarily due to a $75.7 million decrease related to Simon Brand
Venture and gift card revenues, a $68.0 million decrease related to a gain on settlement with our former insurance
broker in 2019, a $16.2 million gain on the 2019 sale of our interest in a multi-family residential property, a $10.9
million decrease in distributions from investments, a $9.1 million decrease in interest income and lower business
interruption insurance proceeds received in connection with our two Puerto Rico properties as a result of hurricane
damages of $5.2 million, partially offset by a $6.2 million gain on a partial sale and mark-to-market adjustment of our
retained interest in a non-retail investment and a $4.1 million gain related to the sale of outparcels.
Property operating expenses decreased $104.0 million primarily due to the closure of properties as a result of
the COVID-19 pandemic and governmental restrictions intended to prevent its spread and cost reduction efforts, as
previously discussed.
Repairs and maintenance expenses decreased $19.6 million primarily due to the closure of properties as a
result of the COVID-19 pandemic and governmental restrictions intended to prevent its spread and cost reduction
efforts, as previously discussed.
Table of Contents
66Advertising and promotion decreased $51.7 million primarily due to the closure of properties as a result of the
COVID-19 pandemic and governmental restrictions intended to prevent its spread and cost reduction efforts, as
previously discussed.
General and administrative expense decreased $12.3 million due to lower executive compensation.
Other expense increased $32.7 million primarily related to an increase in legal fees and expenses.
During 2019, we recorded a loss on extinguishment of debt of $116.3 million as a result of the early
redemption of senior unsecured notes.
Income and other tax expense changed by $34.7 million primarily as a result of a higher tax benefit due to
larger losses on our share of operating results in the retail operations venture of SPARC Group as compared to 2019,
and reduced withholding and income taxes related to certain of our international investments, partially offset by tax
expense from a bargain purchase gain recorded as a result of the acquisition of our interest in Forever 21.
Income from unconsolidated entities decreased $224.5 million primarily due to unfavorable year-over-year
domestic and international property operations, as well as results of operations from our other platform investments,
both of which were impacted by COVID-19 disruption, partially offset by a $35.0 million pre-tax non-cash bargain
purchase gain recorded as a result of the acquisition of our interest in Forever 21 and a gain from the sale of a non-
retail asset, of which our share was $17.8 million.
During 2020, we recorded $125.6 million of impairment charges related to one consolidated property, an other-
than-temporary impairment on our equity investment in three joint venture properties, an other-than-temporary
impairment to reduce an investment to its estimated fair value, and a $4.3 million loss, net, related to the impairment
and disposition of certain assets by Klépierre, partially offset by a $12.3 million gain on the disposal of our interest in
one consolidated property, a $1.9 million excess gain on insurance proceeds related to our two properties in Puerto
Rico and a $1.0 million gain related to the disposition of a shopping center by one of our joint venture investments.
During 2019, we recorded net gains of $62.1 million primarily related to Klépierre’s disposition of certain shopping
centers, offset by a $47.2 million impairment charge related to an unconsolidated investment.  
Simon’s net income attributable to noncontrolling interests decreased $156.8 million due to a decrease in the
net income of the Operating Partnership.  
Liquidity and Capital Resources
Because we own long-lived income-producing assets, our financing strategy relies primarily on long-term fixed
rate debt. Floating rate debt comprised only 7.6% of our total consolidated debt at December 31, 2021. We also enter
into interest rate protection agreements from time to time to manage our interest rate risk. We derive most of our
liquidity from positive net cash flow from operations and distributions of capital from unconsolidated entities that
totaled $3.9 billion in the aggregate during 2021. The Credit Facilities and the Commercial Paper program provide
alternative sources of liquidity as our cash needs vary from time to time. Borrowing capacity under these sources may
be increased as discussed further below.
Our balance of cash and cash equivalents decreased $477.7 million during 2021 to $533.9 million as of
December 31, 2021 as further discussed below.
On December 31, 2021, we had an aggregate available borrowing capacity of approximately $5.8 billion under
the Facilities, net of outstanding borrowings of $1.18 billion, amounts outstanding under the Commercial Paper
program of $500.0 million and letters of credit of $11.8 million. For the year ended December 31, 2021, the maximum
aggregate outstanding balance under the Credit Facilities was $2.1 billion and the weighted average outstanding
balance was $519.9 million. The weighted average interest rate was 0.85% for the year ended December 31, 2021.
Simon has historically had access to public equity markets and the Operating Partnership has historically had
access to private and public, short and long-term unsecured debt markets and access to secured debt and private
equity from institutional investors at the property level.
Our business model and Simon’s status as a REIT require us to regularly access the debt markets to raise
funds for acquisition, development and redevelopment activity, and to refinance maturing debt. Simon may also, from
time to time, access the equity capital markets to accomplish our business objectives. We believe we have sufficient
cash on hand and availability under the Credit Facilities and the Commercial Paper program to address our debt
maturities and capital needs through 2022.
Table of Contents
67Cash Flows
Our net cash flow from operating activities and distributions of capital from unconsolidated entities totaled
$3.9 billion during 2021. In addition, we had net repayments of debt from our debt financing and repayment activities
of $0.8 billion in 2021. These activities are further discussed below under “Financing and Debt.” During 2021, we also:
●funded the acquisition of the licensing venture of Eddie Bauer, acquired additional interests in the licensing
and operations of Forever 21 and acquired additional interest in ABG, the aggregate cash portion of which
was $257.1 million,
●paid stockholder dividends and unitholder distributions totaling approximately $2.7 billion and preferred unit
distributions totaling $5.3 million,
●funded consolidated capital expenditures of $527.9 million (including development and other costs of $96.3
million, redevelopment and expansion costs of $299.8 million, and tenant costs and other operational
capital expenditures of $131.8 million),
●funded investments in unconsolidated entities of $56.9 million,
●funded investments in equity instruments of $33.6 million, and
●received proceeds from the sale of equity instruments of $65.5 million.
In general, we anticipate that cash generated from operations will be sufficient to meet operating expenses,
monthly debt service, recurring capital expenditures, and dividends to stockholders and/or distributions to partners
necessary to maintain Simon’s REIT qualification on a long-term basis.  At this time, we do not expect the impact of
COVID-19 to impact our ability to fund these needs for the foreseeable future; however its ultimate impact is difficult
to predict. In addition, we expect to be able to generate or obtain capital for nonrecurring capital expenditures, such
as acquisitions, major building redevelopments and expansions, as well as for scheduled principal maturities on
outstanding indebtedness, from the following, however a severe and prolonged disruption and instability in the global
financial markets, including the debt and equity capital markets, may affect our ability to access necessary capital:
●excess cash generated from operating performance and working capital reserves,
●borrowings on the Credit Facilities and Commercial Paper program,
●additional secured or unsecured debt financing, or
●additional equity raised in the public or private markets.
We expect to generate positive cash flow from operations in 2022, and we consider these projected cash flows
in our sources and uses of cash. These cash flows are principally derived from rents paid by our tenants. A significant
deterioration in projected cash flows from operations, including one due to the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic and
restrictions intended to restrict its spread, could cause us to increase our reliance on available funds from the Credit
Facilities and Commercial Paper program, further curtail planned capital expenditures, or seek other additional
sources of financing.
Financing and Debt
Unsecured Debt
At December 31, 2021, our unsecured debt consisted of $18.4 billion of senior unsecured notes of the
Operating Partnership, $125.0 million outstanding under the Credit Facility, $1.05 billion outstanding under the
Supplemental Facility and $500.0 million outstanding under the Commercial Paper program.  
The Credit Facility also included an additional single, delayed-draw $2.0 billion term loan facility, or Term
Facility, or together with the Credit Facility and the Supplemental Facility, the Facilities, which the Operating
Partnership drew on December 15, 2020, which was recorded in 2021.
In November 2021, we amended our Credit Facility to transition the borrowing rates from LIBOR to successor
benchmark indexes. The Credit Facility can be increased in the form of additional commitments in an aggregate not to
exceed $1.0 billion, for a total aggregate size of $5.0 billion, subject to obtaining additional lender commitments and
satisfying certain customary conditions precedent.  Borrowings may be denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro, Yen,
Pounds, Sterling, Canadian dollars and Australian dollars. Borrowings in currencies other than the U.S. dollar are
limited to 95% of
Table of Contents
68the maximum revolving credit amount, as defined. The initial maturity date of the Credit Facility is June 30, 2024. The
Credit Facility can be extended for two additional six-month periods to June 30, 2025, at our sole option, subject to
satisfying certain customary conditions precedent.
Borrowings under the Credit Facility bear interest, at our election, at either (i) (x) for Term Benchmark Loans,
the Adjusted Term SOFR Rate, the applicable Local Rate, the Adjusted EURIBOR Rate, or the Adjusted TIBOR Rate,
(y) for RFR Loans, if denominated in Sterling, SONIA plus a benchmark adjustment and if denominated in Dollars,
Daily Simple SOFR plus a benchmark adjustment, or (z) for Daily SOFR Loans, the Adjusted Floating Overnight Daily
SOFR Rate, in each case of clauses (x) through (z) above, plus a margin determined by our corporate credit rating of
between 0.650% and 1.400% or (ii) for loans denominated in U.S. Dollars only, the base rate (which rate is equal to
the greatest of the prime rate, the federal funds effective rate plus 0.500% or Adjusted Term SOFR Rate for one
month plus 1.000%) (the “Base Rate”), plus a margin determined by our corporate credit rating of between 0.000%
and 0.400%. The Credit Facility includes a facility fee determined by our corporate credit rating of between 0.100%
and 0.300% on the aggregate revolving commitments under the Credit Facility.  Based upon our current credit ratings,
the interest rate on the Credit Facility is SOFR plus 72.5 basis points, plus a spread adjustment to account for the
transition from LIBOR to SOFR.
In October 2021, we amended, restated, and extended the Supplemental Facility. The Supplemental Facility’s
initial borrowing capacity of $3.5 billion may be increased to $4.5 billion during its term and provides for borrowings
denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro, Yen, Pounds, Sterling, Canadian dollars and Australian dollars. Borrowings in
currencies other than the U.S. dollar are limited to 100% of the maximum revolving credit amount, as defined. The
initial maturity date of the Supplemental Facility is January 31, 2026 and can be extended for an additional year to
January 31, 2027 at our sole option, subject to satisfying certain customary conditions precedent.
Borrowings under the Supplemental Facility bear interest, at our election, at either (i) (x) for Term Benchmark
Loans, the Adjusted Term SOFR Rate, the applicable Local Rate, the Adjusted EURIBOR Rate, or the Adjusted
TIBOR Rate, (y) for RFR Loans, if denominated in Sterling, SONIA plus a benchmark adjustment and if denominated
in Dollars, Daily Simple SOFR plus a benchmark adjustment, or (z) for Daily SOFR Loans, the Adjusted Floating
Overnight Daily SOFR Rate, in each case of clauses (x) through (z) above, plus a margin determined by our
corporate credit rating of between 0.650% and 1.400% or (ii) for loans denominated in U.S. Dollars only, the base rate
(which rate is equal to the greatest of the prime rate, the federal funds effective rate plus 0.500% or Adjusted Term
SOFR Rate for one month plus 1.000%) (the “Base Rate”), plus a margin determined by our corporate credit rating of
between 0.000% and 0.400%. The Supplemental Facility includes a facility fee determined by our corporate credit
rating of between 0.100% and 0.300% on the aggregate revolving commitments under the Supplemental Facility.
 Based upon our current credit ratings, the interest rate on the Supplemental Facility is SOFR plus 72.5 basis points,
plus a spread adjustment to account for the transition from LIBOR to SOFR.
On December 31, 2021, we had an aggregate available borrowing capacity of $5.8 billion under the Facilities.
The maximum aggregate outstanding balance under the Facilities during the year ended December 31, 2021 was
$2.1 billion and the weighted average outstanding balance was $519.9 million. Letters of credit of $11.8 million were
outstanding under the Facilities as of December 31, 2021.
The Operating Partnership also has available a Commercial Paper program of $2.0 billion, or the non-U.S.
dollar equivalent thereof. The Operating Partnership may issue unsecured commercial paper notes, denominated in
U.S. dollars, Euro and other currencies. Notes issued in non-U.S. currencies may be issued by one or more
subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership and are guaranteed by the Operating Partnership.  Notes will be sold under
customary terms in the U.S. and Euro commercial paper note markets and rank (either by themselves or as a result of
the guarantee described above) pari passu with the Operating Partnership's other unsecured senior indebtedness.
 The Commercial Paper program is supported by the Credit Facilities, and if necessary or appropriate, we may make
one or more draws under either of the Credit Facilities to pay amounts outstanding from time to time on the
Commercial Paper program. On December 31, 2021, we had $500.0 million outstanding under the Commercial Paper
program, fully comprised of U.S. dollar denominated notes with a weighted average interest rate of 0.22%.  These
borrowings have a weighted average maturity date of January 23, 2022 and reduce amounts otherwise available
under the Credit Facilities.
On July 9, 2020, the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of the following senior unsecured notes:
$500.0 million with a fixed interest rate of 3.50%, $750 million with a fixed interest rate of 2.650%, and $750 million
with a fixed interest rate of 3.80%, with maturity dates of September 2025 (the “2025” Notes”), June 2030, and June
2050, respectively. The 2025 Notes were issued as additional notes under an indenture pursuant to which the
Operating Partnership previously issued $600 million principal amount of 3.50% senior notes due September 2025 on
August 17, 2015. Proceeds from the unsecured notes offering funded the optional redemption at par of senior
unsecured notes in July and August 2020, as discussed below, and repaid a portion of the indebtedness under the
Facilities.
Table of Contents
69On July 10, 2020 the Operating Partnership repaid $1.75 billion under the Credit Facility and $750.0 million
under the Supplemental Facility.
On July 22, 2020, the Operating Partnership completed the optional redemption at par of its $500 million
2.50% notes due September 1, 2020.
On August 6, 2020 the Operating Partnership completed the optional redemption at par of its €375 million
2.375% notes due October 2, 2020.
On January 21, 2021 the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of the following senior unsecured
notes: $800 million with a fixed interest rate of 1.750%, and $700 million with a fixed interest rate of 2.20%, with
maturity dates of February 2028 and 2031, respectively.
On January 27, 2021 the Operating Partnership completed the planned optional redemption of its $550 million
2.50% notes due on July 15, 2021, including the make-whole amount. Further, on February 2, 2021 the Operating
Partnership repaid $750 million under the Term Facility.
On March 19, 2021, the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of €750 million ($893.0 million U.S.
dollar equivalent as of the issuance date) of senior unsecured notes at a fixed rate of 1.125% with a maturity date of
March 19, 2033, the proceeds of which were used on March 23, 2021 to repay the remaining $1.25 billion under the
Term Facility reducing it to zero.
On August 18, 2021, the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of the following senior unsecured
notes: $550 million with a fixed interest rate of 1.375%, and $700 million with a fixed interest rate of 2.250%, with
maturity dates of January 15, 2027, and 2032, respectively.
In the third quarter of 2021, the Operating Partnership completed the optional redemption of all of its
outstanding $550 million 2.350% notes due on January 30, 2022, $600 million 2.625% notes due on June 15, 2022,
and $500 million 2.750% notes due on February 1, 2023. We recorded a $28.6 million loss on extinguishment of debt
as a result on the optional redemptions.
On December 14, 2021, the Operating Partnership drew $1.05 billion under the Supplemental Facility, the
proceeds of which funded the early extinguishment of nine mortgages with a principal balance of $1.16 billion. We
recorded a $20.3 million loss on extinguishment of debt as a result of this transaction.
On January 11, 2022, the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of the following senior unsecured
notes: $500 million with a floating interest rate of SOFR plus 43 basis points, and $700 million with a fixed interest
rate of 2.650%, with maturity dates of January 11, 2024 and February 1, 2032, respectively. The proceeds were used
to repay $1.05 billion outstanding under the Supplemental Facility on January 12, 2022.
Mortgage Debt
Total consolidated mortgage indebtedness, which is typically secured by the underlying assets and non-
recourse to the Operating Partnership, was $5.4 billion and $7.0 billion at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Covenants
Our unsecured debt agreements contain financial covenants and other non-financial covenants. If we were to
fail to comply with these covenants, after the expiration of the applicable cure periods, the debt maturity could be
accelerated or other remedies could be sought by the lender, including adjustments to the applicable interest rate. As
of December 31, 2021, we were in compliance with all covenants of our unsecured debt.
At December 31, 2021, our consolidated subsidiaries were the borrowers under 36 non-recourse mortgage
notes secured by mortgages on 39 properties and other assets, including two separate pools of cross-defaulted and
cross-collateralized mortgages encumbering a total of five properties. Under these cross-default provisions, a default
under any mortgage included in the cross-defaulted pool may constitute a default under all mortgages within that pool
and may lead to acceleration of the indebtedness due on each property within the pool. Certain of our secured debt
instruments contain financial and other non-financial covenants which are specific to the properties that serve as
collateral for that debt. If the applicable borrower under these non-recourse mortgage notes were to fail to comply with
these covenants, the lender could accelerate the debt and enforce its rights against their collateral. At December 31,
2021, the applicable borrowers under these non-recourse mortgage notes were in compliance with all covenants
where non-compliance could individually
Table of Contents
70or in the aggregate, giving effect to applicable cross-default provisions, have a material adverse effect on our financial
condition, liquidity or results of operations.
Summary of Financing
Our consolidated debt, adjusted to reflect outstanding derivative instruments, and the effective weighted
average interest rates as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, consisted of the following (dollars in thousands):
        Effective         Effective  
Adjusted Balance Weighted Adjusted Weighted 
as of Average Balance as of Average  
Debt Subject to December 31, 2021 Interest Rate(1)December 31, 2020 Interest Rate(1)
Fixed Rate $  23,364,566  2.99% $  23,477,498  3.50%
Variable Rate   1,956,456  1.22%   3,245,863  1.31%
$  25,321,022  2.86% $  26,723,361  2.98%
(1)Effective weighted average interest rate excludes the impact of net discounts and debt issuance costs.
Contractual Obligations and Off-balance Sheet Arrangements
In regards to long-term debt arrangements, the following table summarizes the material aspects of these future
obligations on our consolidated indebtedness as of December 31, 2021, and subsequent years thereafter (dollars in
thousands) assuming the obligations remain outstanding through initial maturities:
    2022     2023-2024    2025-2026    After 2026    Total  
Long Term Debt (1) (2) $ 
1,898,889 $ 
4,059,530 $ 
6,589,689 $ 12,861,700 $ 25,409,808
Interest Payments (3)   718,712   
1,308,849   977,571   3,771,163   6,776,295
Consolidated Capital
Expenditure Commitments (3)   236,318   —   —   —   236,318
Lease Commitments (4)   32,838   66,093   66,262   855,079   1,020,272
(1)Represents principal maturities only and, therefore, excludes net discounts and debt issuance costs.
(2)Variable rate interest payments are estimated based on the LIBOR or other applicable rate at December 31,
2021.
(3)Represents contractual commitments for capital projects and services at December 31, 2021. Our share of
estimated 2022 development, redevelopment and expansion activity is further discussed below under
“Development Activity”.
(4)Represents only the minimum non-cancellable lease period, excluding applicable lease extension and renewal
options, unless reasonably certain of exercise.
(5)The amount due in 2022 includes $500.0 million in Global Commercial Paper.
Our off-balance sheet arrangements consist primarily of our investments in joint ventures which are common in
the real estate industry and are described in Note 6 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements. Our joint
ventures typically fund their cash needs through secured non-recourse debt financings obtained by and in the name
of the joint venture entity. The joint venture debt is secured by a first mortgage, is without recourse to the joint venture
partners, and does not represent a liability of the partners, except to the extent the partners or their affiliates expressly
guarantee the joint venture debt. As of December 31, 2021, the Operating Partnership guaranteed joint venture-
related mortgage indebtedness of $209.9 million. Mortgages guaranteed by the Operating Partnership are secured by
the property of the joint venture which could be sold in order to satisfy the outstanding obligation and which has an
estimated fair value in excess of the guaranteed amount. We may elect to fund cash needs of a joint venture through
equity contributions (generally on a basis proportionate to our ownership interests), advances or partner loans,
although such fundings are not required contractually or otherwise.
Table of Contents
71Hurricane Impacts
As discussed further in Note 10 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements, during the third quarter
of 2017, two of our wholly-owned properties located in Puerto Rico sustained significant property damage and
business interruption as a result of Hurricane Maria.  
Since the date of the loss, we have received $84.0 million of insurance proceeds from third-party carriers
related to the two properties located in Puerto Rico, of which $48.3 million was used for property restoration and
remediation and to reduce the insurance recovery receivable.  During the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020,
we recorded $2.1 million and $5.2 million, respectively, as business interruption income, which was recorded in other
income in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.  
During the third quarter of 2020, one of our properties located in Texas experienced property damage and
business interruption as a result of Hurricane Hanna.  We wrote-off assets of approximately $9.6 million, and
recorded an insurance recovery receivable, and have received $14.0 million of insurance proceeds from third-party
carriers.  The proceeds were used for property restoration and remediation and reduced the insurance recovery
receivable.  During the year ended December 31, 2021, we recorded a $3.5 million gain related to property insurance
recovery of previously depreciated assets.  This amount was recorded in gain (loss) on acquisition of controlling
interest, sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net.
During the third quarter of 2020, one of our properties located in Louisiana experienced property damage and
business interruption as a result of Hurricane Laura.   We wrote-off assets of approximately $11.1 million and
recorded an insurance recovery receivable, and have received $27.5 million of insurance proceeds from third-party
carriers.  The proceeds were used for property restoration and remediation and reduced the insurance recovery
receivable.  During the year ended December 31, 2021, we recorded a $17.5 million gain related to property
insurance recovery of previously depreciated assets.  This amount was recorded in gain (loss) on acquisition of
controlling interest, sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment,
net.  
Acquisitions and Dispositions
Buy-sell, marketing rights, and other exit mechanisms are common in real estate partnership agreements.
Most of our partners are institutional investors who have a history of direct investment in retail real estate. We and our
partners in our joint venture properties may initiate these provisions (subject to any applicable lock up or similar
restrictions). If we determine it is in our best interests for us to purchase the joint venture interest and we believe we
have adequate liquidity to execute the purchase without hindering our cash flows, then we may initiate these
provisions or elect to buy our partner’s interest. If we decide to sell any of our joint venture interests, we expect to use
the net proceeds to reduce outstanding indebtedness or to reinvest in development, redevelopment, or expansion
opportunities.
Acquisitions. The Company sponsored, through a wholly-owned subsidiary, a special purpose acquisition
corporation, or SPAC, named Simon Property Group Acquisition Holdings, Inc. On February 18, 2021 the SPAC
announced the pricing of its initial public offering, which was consummated on February 23, 2021, generating gross
proceeds of $345.0 million.  The SPAC is a consolidated VIE which was formed for the purpose of effecting a
business combination and is targeting innovative businesses that operate within Simon’s “Live, Work, Play, Stay,
Shop” ecosystem.  
On July 1, 2021, we contributed to ABG all of our interests in both the Forever 21 and Brooks Brothers
licensing ventures in exchange for additional interests in ABG.  As a result, in the third quarter of 2021, we recognized
a non-cash gain of $159.8 million representing the difference between fair value of the interests received and the
carrying value of our interests in the licensing ventures, less costs to sell.  On December 20, 2021, we sold a portion
of our interest in ABG, resulting in a pre-tax gain of $18.8 million.  In connection with this transaction, we recorded
taxes of $8.0 million.  Subsequently we acquired additional interests in ABG for tax consideration of $100.0 million.  At
December 31, 2021, our noncontrolling interest in ABG was approximately 10.4%.
In the first quarter of 2021, we and our partner, ABG, each acquired additional 12.5% interests in the licensing
and operations of Forever 21, our share of which was $56.3 million, bringing our interest to 50%. Subsequently the
Forever 21 operations were merged into SPARC Group.
In January 2020, we acquired additional interests of 5.05% and 1.37% in SPARC Group and ABG,
respectively, for $6.7 million and $33.5 million, respectively. During the third quarter of 2020, SPARC acquired certain
assets and operations of Brooks Brothers and Lucky Brands out of bankruptcy. At September 30, 2020, our
noncontrolling equity method interests in the operations venture of SPARC Group and in ABG were 50.0% and 6.8%,
respectively.
Table of Contents
72On September 19, 2019, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in a hotel adjacent to one of our properties
from our joint venture partner for cash consideration of $12.8 million. As of closing, the property was subject to a
$21.5 million, 4.02% variable rate mortgage.
Dispositions.  We may continue to pursue the disposition of properties that no longer meet our strategic
criteria or that are not a primary retail venue within their trade area.
During 2021, we recorded net gains of $176.8 million primarily related to disposition activity which included the
foreclosure of three consolidated retail properties in satisfaction of their respective $180.0 million, $120.9 million and
$100.0 million non-recourse mortgage loans. We also disposed of our interest in an unconsolidated property resulting
in a gain of $3.4 million.
During 2020, we disposed of our interest in one consolidated retail property. A portion of the gross proceeds on
this transaction of $33.4 million was used to partially repay a cross-collateralized mortgage. Our share of the $12.3
million gain is included in (loss) gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated
entities and impairment, net in the accompanying consolidated statement of operations and comprehensive income.
During 2019, we disposed of our interests in one multi-family residential investment. Our share of the gross
proceeds on this transaction was $17.9 million. Our share of the gain of $16.2 million is included in other income in
the accompanying consolidated statement of operations and comprehensive income. We also recorded net gains of
$62.1 million, primarily related to Klépierre’s disposition of its interests in certain shopping centers, of which our share
was $58.6 million, as discussed in Note 6 to the consolidated financial statements.  
Joint Venture Formation Activity
On June 1, 2021, we and our partner, ABG, acquired the intellectual property of Eddie Bauer. Our non-
controlling interest in the licensing venture is 49% and was acquired for cash consideration of $100.8 million.
On December 29, 2020, we completed the acquisition of an 80% ownership interest in TRG, which has an
ownership interest in 24 regional, super-regional, and outlet malls in the U.S. and Asia. Under the terms of the
transaction, we, through the Operating Partnership, acquired all of Taubman Centers, Inc. common stock for $43.00
per share in cash. Total consideration for the acquisition, including the redemption of Taubman’s $192.5 million 6.5%
Series J Cumulative Preferred Shares and its $170.0 million 6.25% Series K Cumulative Preferred Shares, and the
issuance of 955,705 Operating Partnership units, was approximately $3.5 billion.  Our investment includes the 6.38%
Series A Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units for $362.5 million issued to us.
On December 7, 2020, we and a group of co-investors acquired certain assets and liabilities of J.C. Penney, a
department store retailer, out of bankruptcy. Our noncontrolling interest in the venture is 41.67% and was acquired for
cash consideration of $125.0 million.
On February 19, 2020, we and a group of co-investors acquired certain assets and liabilities of Forever 21, a
retailer of apparel and accessories, out of bankruptcy. The interests were acquired through two separate joint
ventures, a licensing venture and an operating venture. Our noncontrolling interest in each of the retail operations
venture and in the licensing venture is 37.5%. Our aggregate investment in the ventures was $67.6 million. In
connection with the acquisition of our interest, the Forever 21 joint venture recorded a non-cash bargain purchase
gain of which our share of $35.0 million pre-tax is included in income from unconsolidated entities in the consolidated
statement of operations and comprehensive income.  
Development Activity
We routinely incur costs related to construction for significant redevelopment and expansion projects at our
properties. Redevelopment and expansion projects, including the addition of anchors, big box tenants, and
restaurants are underway at several properties in North America, Europe, and Asia.
Construction continues on certain redevelopment and new development projects in the U.S. and internationally
that are nearing completion.  Our share of the costs of all new development, redevelopment and expansion projects
currently under construction is approximately $944 million.  Simon’s share of remaining net cash funding required to
complete the new development and redevelopment projects currently under construction is approximately $263
million.  We expect to fund these capital projects with cash flows from operations. We seek a stabilized return on
invested capital in the range of 7-10% for all of our new development, expansion and redevelopment projects.
Table of Contents
73Summary of Capital Expenditures.  The following table summarizes total capital expenditures on
consolidated properties on a cash basis (in millions):
    2021    2020    2019 
New Developments $ 96 $ 27 $ 73
Redevelopments and Expansions   
300   399   498
Tenant Allowances   
127   53   162
Operational Capital Expenditures   5  5  143
Total $ 
528 $ 484 $ 876
International Development Activity  
We typically reinvest net cash flow from our international joint ventures to fund future international
development activity. We believe this strategy mitigates some of the risk of our initial investment and our exposure to
changes in foreign currencies. We have also funded most of our foreign investments with local currency-denominated
borrowings that act as a natural hedge against fluctuations in exchange rates. Our consolidated net income exposure
to changes in the volatility of the Euro, Yen, Peso, Won, and other foreign currencies is not material. We expect our
share of estimated committed capital for international development projects to be completed with projected delivery in
2022 or 2023 is $172 million, primarily funded through reinvested joint venture cash flow and construction loans.
The following table describes recently completed and new development and expansion projects as well as our
share of the estimated total cost as of December 31, 2021 (in millions):
Gross Our Our Share of Our Share of Projected/Actual
LeasableOwnershipProjected Net CostProjected Net Cost Opening
Property    Location    Area (sqft)   Percentage   (in Local Currency)   (in USD)  (1)   Date
New Development Projects:
West Midlands Designer
OutletCannock (West
Midlands), England 197,000 23%GBP  31.2$  42.2 Opened Apr. -
2021
Jeju Premium Outlets Jeju Province, South
Korea 92,000 50%KRW  12,328$  10.4 Opened Oct. -
2021
Fukaya-Hanazono Premium
OutletsFukaya City, Japan  292,500 40%JPY  6,153$  53.5 Oct. - 2022
Paris-Giverny Designer OutletVernon (Normandy),
France 220,000 74%EUR  119.5$  135.6 Jan. - 2023
Expansions:
La Reggia Designer Outlet
Phase 3Marcianise (Naples),
Italy 56,000 92%EUR  18.8$  21.3 Opened Oct. -
2021
(1)USD equivalent based upon December 31, 2021 foreign currency exchange rates.
Dividends, Distributions and Stock Repurchase Program
Simon paid a common stock dividend of $1.65 per share in the fourth quarter of 2021 and $7.15 per share for
the year ended December 31, 2021. The Operating Partnership paid distributions per unit for the same amounts. In
2020, Simon paid dividends of $1.30 and $4.70 per share for the three and twelve month periods ended December
31, 2020, respectively. The Operating Partnership paid distributions per unit for the same amounts. On February 7,
2022, Simon’s Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend for the first quarter of 2022 of $1.65 per share,
payable on March 31, 2022 to shareholders of record on March 10, 2022.  The distribution rate on units is equal to the
dividend rate on common stock. In order to maintain its status as a REIT, Simon must pay a minimum amount of
dividends. Simon’s future dividends and the Operating Partnership’s future distributions will be determined by Simon’s
Board of Directors, in its sole discretion, based on actual and projected financial condition, liquidity and results of
operations, cash available for dividends and limited partner distributions, cash reserves as deemed necessary for
capital and operating expenditures, financing covenants, if any, and the amount required to maintain Simon’s status
as a REIT.
On February 13, 2017, Simon’s Board of Directors authorized a two-year extension of the previously
authorized $2.0 billion common stock repurchase plan through March 31, 2019.  On February 11, 2019, Simon's
Board of Directors authorized a new common stock repurchase plan.  Under the plan, Simon was authorized to
repurchase up to $2.0 billion of its common stock during the two-year period ending February 11, 2021 in the open
market or in privately negotiated transactions as market conditions warranted.  The Repurchase Program was not
extended.  During the year ended
Table of Contents
74December 31, 2020, Simon purchased 1,245,654 shares at an average price of $122.50 per share.  During the year
ended December 31, 2019, Simon purchased 2,247,074 shares at an average price of $160.11 per share, of which
46,377 shares at an average price of $164.49 were purchased as part of the previous program.  As Simon
repurchased shares under these programs, the Operating Partnership repurchased an equal number of units from
Simon.  
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements made in this section or elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K may be deemed
"forward–looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Although we
believe the expectations reflected in any forward–looking statements are based on reasonable assumptions, we can
give no assurance that its expectations will be attained, and it is possible that our actual results may differ materially
from those indicated by these forward–looking statements due to a variety of risks, uncertainties and other factors.
Such factors include, but are not limited to: uncertainties regarding the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic and
governmental restrictions intended to prevent its spread on our business, financial condition, results of operations,
cash flow and liquidity and our ability to access the capital markets, satisfy our debt service obligations and make
distributions to our stockholders; changes in economic and market conditions that may adversely affect the general
retail environment; the potential loss of anchor stores or major tenants; the inability to collect rent due to the
bankruptcy or insolvency of tenants or otherwise; the intensely competitive market environment in the retail industry,
including e-commerce; an increase in vacant space at our properties; the inability to lease newly developed properties
and renew leases and relet space at existing properties on favorable terms; our international activities subjecting us to
risks that are different from or greater than those associated with our domestic operations, including changes in
foreign exchange rates; risks associated with the acquisition, development, redevelopment, expansion, leasing and
management of properties; general risks related to real estate investments, including the illiquidity of real estate
investments; the impact of our substantial indebtedness on our future operations, including covenants in the
governing agreements that impose restrictions on us that may affect our ability to operate freely; any disruption in the
financial markets that may adversely affect our ability to access capital for growth and satisfy our ongoing debt
service requirements; any change in our credit rating; changes in market rates of interest; the transition of LIBOR to
an alternative reference rate; our continued ability to maintain our status as a REIT; changes in tax laws or regulations
that result in adverse tax consequences; risks relating to our joint venture properties, including guarantees of certain
joint venture indebtedness; environmental liabilities; natural disasters; the availability of comprehensive insurance
coverage; the potential for terrorist activities;  security breaches that could compromise our information technology or
infrastructure; and the loss of key management personnel; and. We discussed these and other risks and uncertainties
under the heading "Risk Factors" in Part 1, Item 1A of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. We may update that
discussion in subsequent other periodic reports, but except as required by law, we undertake no duty or obligation to
update or revise these forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future developments, or
otherwise.  
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Industry practice is to evaluate real estate properties in part based on performance measures such as FFO,
diluted FFO per share, NOI, and portfolio NOI. We believe that these non-GAAP measures are helpful to investors
because they are widely recognized measures of the performance of REITs and provide a relevant basis for
comparison among REITs. We also use these measures internally to measure the operating performance of our
portfolio.
We determine FFO based upon the definition set forth by the National Association of Real Estate Investment
Trusts (“NAREIT”) Funds From Operations White Paper – 2018 Restatement.  Our main business includes acquiring,
owning, operating, developing, and redeveloping real estate in conjunction with the rental of real estate.  Gains and
losses of assets incidental to our main business are included in FFO.  We determine FFO to be our share of
consolidated net income computed in accordance with GAAP:
●excluding real estate related depreciation and amortization,
●excluding gains and losses from extraordinary items,
●excluding gains and losses from the sale, disposal or property insurance recoveries of, or any impairment
related to, depreciable retail operating properties,
●plus the allocable portion of FFO of unconsolidated joint ventures based upon economic ownership
interest, and
●all determined on a consistent basis in accordance with GAAP.
Table of Contents
75You should understand that our computations of these non-GAAP measures might not be comparable to
similar measures reported by other REITs and that these non-GAAP measures:
●do not represent cash flow from operations as defined by GAAP,
●should not be considered as an alternative to net income determined in accordance with GAAP as a
measure of operating performance, and
●are not an alternative to cash flows as a measure of liquidity.
The following schedule reconciles total FFO to consolidated net income and, for Simon, diluted net income per
share to diluted FFO per share.
    2021 2020 2019
(in thousands)
Funds from Operations (A) $ 4,486,964 $ 3,236,963 $ 4,272,271
Change in FFO from prior period   38.6%    (24.2)%    (1.2)%
Consolidated Net Income $ 2,568,707 $ 1,277,324 $ 2,423,188
Adjustments to Arrive at FFO:
Depreciation and amortization from consolidated properties   1,254,039   1,308,419   1,329,843
Our share of depreciation and amortization from unconsolidated
entities, including Klépierre, TRG and other corporate
investments (B)   887,390   536,133   551,596
(Gain) loss on acquisition of controlling interest, sale or disposal
of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated
entities and impairment, net   (206,855)  114,960   (14,883)
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments  3,177  19,632  8,212
Net loss (gain) attributable to noncontrolling interest holders in
properties   6,053   4,378   (991)
Noncontrolling interests portion of depreciation and amortization
and gain on consolidation of properties   (20,295)  (18,631)  (19,442)
Preferred distributions and dividends   (5,252)  (5,252)  (5,252)
FFO of the Operating Partnership (A) $ 4,486,964 $ 3,236,963 $ 4,272,271
FFO allocable to limited partners   564,407   424,063   563,342
Dilutive FFO allocable to common stockholders (A) $ 3,922,557 $ 2,812,900 $ 3,708,929
Diluted net income per share to diluted FFO per share
reconciliation:
Diluted net income per share $  6.84 $  3.59 $  6.81
Depreciation and amortization from consolidated properties and
our share of depreciation and amortization from unconsolidated
entities, including Klépierre, TRG and other corporate
investments, net of noncontrolling interests portion of
depreciation and amortization (B)   5.64   5.14   5.25
(Gain) loss on acquisition of controlling interest, sale or disposal
of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated
entities and impairment, net   (0.55)  0.32   (0.04)
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments  0.01  0.06  0.02
Diluted FFO per share (A) $  11.94 $  9.11 $  12.04
Basic and Diluted weighted average shares outstanding   328,587   308,738   307,950
Weighted average limited partnership units outstanding   47,280   46,544   46,774
Basic and Diluted weighted average shares and units outstanding   375,867   355,282   354,724
(A)Includes FFO of the Operating Partnership related to a loss on extinguishment of debt of $116.3 million for the
year ended December 31, 2019. Includes Diluted FFO per share/unit related to a loss on extinguishment of debt
of $0.33 for the year ended December 31, 2019. Includes Diluted FFO allocable to common stockholders related
to a loss on extinguishment of debt of $100.9 million for the year ended December 31, 2019.  
Table of Contents
76(B)The twelve months ended December 31, 2021 include amortization of our excess investment in TRG of $201.7
million, which includes $56.6 million of additional amortization expense related to the nine months ended
September 30, 2021 as a result of the finalization of purchase accounting.
The following schedule reconciles consolidated net income to our beneficial share of NOI.
For the Year
Ended December 31, 
 2021     2020
(in thousands)
Reconciliation of NOI of consolidated entities:      
Consolidated Net Income $ 2,568,707 $ 
1,277,324
Income and other tax expense (benefit)   157,199   (4,637)
Gain on sale or exchange of equity interests  (178,672)
Interest expense   795,712   784,400
Income from unconsolidated entities   (782,837)  (219,870)
Loss on extinguishment of debt  51,841  --
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments   8,095   19,632
(Gain) loss on acquisition of controlling interest, sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and
interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net   (206,855)  114,960
Operating Income Before Other Items   2,413,190   
1,971,809
Depreciation and amortization   1,262,715   
1,318,008
Home and regional office costs  184,660  171,668
General and administrative  30,339  22,572
Other expenses (1)  19,811  --
NOI of consolidated entities $ 3,910,715 $ 
3,484,057
Less: Noncontrolling interest partners share of NOI  (20,720)  (19,745)
Beneficial NOI of consolidated entities $ 3,889,995 $ 
3,464,312
Reconciliation of NOI of unconsolidated entities:
Net Income $ 668,061 $ 453,816
Interest expense   605,591   616,332
Gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities, net  (34,814)  —
Operating Income Before Other Items   1,238,838   
1,070,148
Depreciation and amortization   686,790   692,424
Other expenses (1)  26,013  —
NOI of unconsolidated entities $ 1,951,641 $ 
1,762,572
Less: Joint Venture partners share of NOI 
(1,021,839)  (921,147)
Beneficial NOI of unconsolidated entities $ 929,802 $ 841,425
Add: NOI from TRG  430,965  —
Add: NOI from Other Platform Investments and Investments  743,213  253,093
Beneficial interest of Combined NOI $ 5,993,975 $ 
4,558,830
Less: Corporate and Other NOI Sources (2)   172,844   178,009
Less: NOI from Other Platform Investments  533,299  21,507
Less: NOI from Investments (3)  203,223  201,240
Portfolio NOI $ 5,084,609 $ 
4,158,074
Portfolio NOI Change  22.3%  
(1)Represents the write-off of pre-development costs, our beneficial interest of which was $18.3 million with respect
to consolidated entities and $13.0 million with respect to our share of unconsolidated entities, for the year ended
December 31, 2021.
Table of Contents
77(2)Includes income components excluded from portfolio NOI and domestic property NOI (domestic lease
termination income, interest income, land sale gains, straight line lease income, above/below market lease
adjustments), unrealized and realized gains/losses on non-real estate related equity instruments, Simon
management company revenues, and other assets.
(3)Includes our share of NOI of Klépierre (at constant currency) and other corporate investments.
Item 7A.  Qualitative and Quantitative Disclosures About Market Risk
Our exposure to market risk due to changes in interest rates primarily relates to our long-term debt obligations.
We manage exposure to interest rate market risk through our risk management strategy by a combination of interest
rate protection agreements to effectively fix or cap a portion of variable rate debt. We are also exposed to foreign
currency risk on financings of certain foreign operations. Our intent is to offset gains and losses that occur on the
underlying exposures, with gains and losses on the derivative contracts hedging these exposures. We do not enter
into either interest rate protection or foreign currency rate protection agreements for speculative purposes.
We may enter into treasury lock agreements as part of anticipated issuances of senior notes. Upon completion
of the debt issuance, the cost of these instruments is recorded as part of accumulated other comprehensive income
(loss) and is amortized to interest expense over the life of the debt agreement.
Our future earnings, cash flows and fair values relating to financial instruments are dependent upon prevalent
market rates of interest, primarily SOFR and LIBOR. Based upon consolidated indebtedness and interest rates at
December 31, 2021, a 50 basis point increase in the market rates of interest would decrease future earnings and
cash flows by approximately $9.9 million, and would decrease the fair value of debt by approximately $791.9 million.
Table of Contents
78Item 8.  Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The Stockholders and the Board of Directors of Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited Simon Property Group, Inc.’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31,
2021, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013 Framework) (the COSO criteria). In our opinion, Simon
Property Group, Inc. (the Company) maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial
reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on the COSO criteria.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB), the consolidated balance sheets of the Company as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, the
related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, equity and cash flows for each of the three
years in the period ended December 31, 2021, and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the
Index at Item 15(a) and our report dated February 24, 2022, expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting
and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting included in the accompanying
Management’s Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the
Company’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered
with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal
securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we
plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial
reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk
that a material weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control
based on the assessed risk, and performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the
circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance
regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting
includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail,
accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable
assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance
with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made
only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s
assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect
misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that
controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies
or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/ ERNST  & Y OUNG  LLP
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 24, 2022
Table of Contents
79Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The Stockholders and the Board of Directors of Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Simon Property Group, Inc. (the
Company) as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive
income, equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, and the related
notes and financial statement schedule listed in the Index at Item 15(a) (collectively referred to as the “consolidated
financial statements”). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the
financial position of the Company at December 31, 2021 and 2020, and the results of its operations and its cash flows
for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted
accounting principles.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB), the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on
criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations
of the Treadway Commission (2013 Framework) and our report dated February 24, 2022, expressed an unqualified
opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to
express an opinion on the Company’s financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm
registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the
U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and
the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we
plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material
misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of
material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that
respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and
disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and
significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements.
We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the financial
statements that were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1) relate to
accounts or disclosures that are material to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging,
subjective or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on
the consolidated financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters
below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Purchase Accounting for the Investment in Taubman Realty Group
Description of the
MatterOn December 29, 2020, the Company completed its acquisition of an 80% non-controlling
ownership interest in Taubman Realty Group (TRG) for consideration of $3.1 billion, as
described in Note 6 of the consolidated financial statements. The Company allocates any excess
investment in unconsolidated entities to the various components of an acquisition based upon
the relative fair value of each component which may be derived from various observable or
unobservable inputs and assumptions, as described in Note 3 of the consolidated financial
statements. The components typically include buildings, land and intangibles related to in-place
leases.
Auditing management’s purchase accounting for the Company’s acquisition of an equity method
interest in TRG is complex due to the judgmental nature of numerous assumptions made by
management when determining the estimated fair value of the various components of the
acquisition. In particular, the acquisition purchase accounting was sensitive to significant
assumptions including, but not limited to, forecasted cash flows and operating income before
depreciation and amortization, capitalization rates and comparable market values for land.
Table of Contents
80How We
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design, and tested the operating effectiveness of
controls over the Company’s process for purchase accounting for the investment in TRG,
including controls over management’s review of the assumptions described above.
To test the Company’s purchase accounting for the investment in TRG, we performed audit
procedures that included, among others, assessing the methodologies used in the valuation
models, evaluating the assumptions used by management in its allocation of the purchase price
to the various components of excess investment, and testing the completeness and accuracy of
the underlying data supporting the assumptions. We compared significant assumptions used to
external market data to assess whether the assumptions were market supported. We involved
our valuation specialists to assist in the assessment of the methodology utilized by the Company
and to test certain of the assumptions including capitalization rates and the valuation of land. We
also compared the forecasted cash flows and operating income before depreciation and
amortization used in the valuations to historical actual results and market-supported data,
evaluated significant variances, including consideration of the current economic environment,
and performed certain sensitivity analyses to evaluate the impact on the purchase accounting
allocations.  We also tested the completeness and accuracy of the underlying data included in
the valuation models.  
Evaluation of Investment Properties for Impairment
Description of the
MatterAt December 31, 2021, the Company’s consolidated net investment properties totaled $22.3
billion. In addition, a significant number of the Company’s investments in unconsolidated entities
and its investments in Klépierre and TRG hold investment properties. As discussed in Note 3 to
the consolidated financial statements, the Company reviews investment properties for
impairment on a property-by-property basis to identify and evaluate events or changes in
circumstances that indicate the carrying value of an investment property may not be recoverable.
The Company estimates undiscounted cash flows of an investment property using observable
and unobservable inputs such as historical and forecasted cash flows, operating income before
depreciation and amortization, estimated capitalization rates, leasing prospects and local market
information.
Auditing management’s evaluation of investment properties for impairment was complex due to
the estimation uncertainty in determining the undiscounted cash flows of an investment property.
In particular, the impairment evaluation for investment properties was sensitive to significant
assumptions such as forecasted cash flows and operating income before depreciation and
amortization, and capitalization rates, all of which can be affected by expectations about future
market or economic conditions, demand, and competition.
Table of Contents
81How We
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design, and tested the operating effectiveness of
controls over the Company’s process for evaluating investment properties for impairment,
including controls over management’s review of the significant assumptions described above.  
To test the Company’s evaluation of investment properties for impairment, we performed audit
procedures that included, among others, assessing the methodologies applied, evaluating the
significant assumptions discussed above and testing the completeness and accuracy of the
underlying data used by management in its analysis. We compared the significant assumptions
used by management to current industry and economic trends, relevant market information, and
other applicable sources. We also involved a valuation specialist to assist in evaluating certain
assumptions. In addition, we compared the forecasted cash flows and operating income before
depreciation and amortization to historical actual results and evaluated significant variances,
including consideration of the current economic environment. As part of our evaluation, we
assessed the historical accuracy of management’s estimates and performed sensitivity analyses
of significant assumptions to evaluate the changes in the undiscounted cash flows of the related
investment property that would result from changes in the assumptions.
Description of the
MatterAt December 31, 2021, the carrying value of the Company’s investments in unconsolidated
entities and its investments in Klépierre and TRG totaled $8.0 billion. As explained in Note 3 to
the consolidated financial statements, the Company reviews investments in unconsolidated
entities for impairment if events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying value of
an investment in an unconsolidated entity may not be recoverable. To identify and evaluate
whether an other-than-temporary decline in the fair value of an investment below its carrying
value has occurred, the Company assesses economic and operating conditions that may affect
the fair value of the investment. The evaluation of operating conditions may include developing
estimates of forecasted cash flows or operating income before depreciation and amortization to
support the recoverability of the carrying amount of the investment. When required, the Company
estimates the fair value of an investment and assesses whether any impairment is other than
temporary using observable and unobservable inputs such as historical and forecasted cash
flows or operating income before depreciation and amortization, estimated capitalization and
discount rates, or relevant market multiples, leasing prospects and local market information.
Auditing management’s evaluation of investments in unconsolidated entities for impairment was
complex due to the estimation uncertainty in determining the forecasted cash flows, operating
income before depreciation and amortization, estimated fair value of the investment and whether
any decline in fair value below the related investment’s carrying amount is other-than-temporary.
In particular, the impairment evaluation for these investments was sensitive to significant
assumptions such as forecasted cash flows, operating income before depreciation and
amortization, relevant market multiples, and capitalization and discount rates, all of which can be
affected by expectations about future market or economic conditions, demand, and competition.
How We
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design, and tested the operating effectiveness of
controls over the Company’s process for evaluating investments in unconsolidated entities for
impairment, including controls over management’s review of the significant assumptions
described above.
To test the Company’s evaluation of investments in unconsolidated entities for impairment, we
performed audit procedures that included, among others, assessing the methodologies applied,
evaluating the significant assumptions discussed above and testing the completeness and
accuracy of data used by management in its analysis. We compared the significant assumptions
used by management to current industry and economic trends, relevant market information, and
other applicable sources. We also involved a valuation specialist to assist in evaluating certain
assumptions. In addition, we compared the forecasted cash flows and operating income before
depreciation and amortization to historical actual results and evaluated significant variances,
including consideration of the current economic environment. As part of our evaluation, we
assessedEvaluation of Investments in Unconsolidated Entities for Impairment
Table of Contents
82the historical accuracy of management’s estimates and performed sensitivity analyses of
significant assumptions to evaluate the changes in the cash flows and the fair value of the
related investment that would result from changes in the assumptions, and we evaluated
whether a decline in fair value below the related investment’s carrying value was other-than-
temporary.
/s/ ERNST  & Y OUNG  LLP
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 2002.
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 24, 2022
Table of Contents
83Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The Partners of Simon Property Group, L.P. and the Board of Directors of Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited Simon Property Group, L.P.’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31,
2021, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013 Framework) (the COSO criteria). In our opinion, Simon
Property Group, L.P. (the Partnership) maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial
reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on the COSO criteria.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB), the consolidated balance sheets of the Partnership as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, the
related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, equity and cash flows for each of the three
years in the period ended December 31, 2021, and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the
Index at Item 15(a) and our report dated February 24, 2022, expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
The Partnership’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting
and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting included in the accompanying
Management’s Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the
Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered
with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Partnership in accordance with the U.S.
federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the
PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we
plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial
reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk
that a material weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control
based on the assessed risk, and performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the
circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance
regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting
includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail,
accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable
assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance
with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made
only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s
assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect
misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that
controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies
or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/ ERNST  & Y OUNG  LLP
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 24, 2022
Table of Contents
84Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The Partners of Simon Property Group, L.P. and the Board of Directors of Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Simon Property Group, L.P. (the
Partnership) as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, the related consolidated statements of operations and
comprehensive income, equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021
and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the Index at Item 15(a) (collectively referred to as the
“consolidated financial statements”). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all material
respects, the financial position of the Partnership at December 31, 2021 and 2020, and the results of its operations
and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, in conformity with U.S.
generally accepted accounting principles.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB), the Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021, based
on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring
Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013 Framework) and our report dated February 24, 2022, expressed
an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Partnership’s management. Our responsibility is to
express an opinion on the Partnership’s financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm
registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Partnership in accordance with the
U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and
the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we
plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material
misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of
material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that
respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and
disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and
significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements.
We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the financial
statements that were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1) relate to
accounts or disclosures that are material to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging,
subjective or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on
the consolidated financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters
below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Purchase Accounting for the Investment in Taubman Realty Group
Description of the
MatterOn December 29, 2020, the Partnership completed its acquisition of an 80% non-controlling
ownership interest in Taubman Realty Group (TRG) for consideration of $3.1 billion, as
described in Note 6 of the consolidated financial statements. The Partnership allocates any
excess investment in unconsolidated entities to the various components of an acquisition based
upon the relative fair value of each component which may be derived from various observable
or unobservable inputs and assumptions, as described in Note 3 of the consolidated financial
statements. The components typically include buildings, land and intangibles related to in-place
leases.
Auditing management’s purchase accounting for the Partnership’s acquisition of an equity
method interest in TRG is complex due to the judgmental nature of numerous assumptions
made by management when determining the estimated fair value of the various components of
the acquisition. In particular, the acquisition purchase accounting was sensitive to significant
assumptions including,
Table of Contents
85but not limited to, forecasted cash flows and operating income before depreciation and
amortization, capitalization rates and comparable market values for land.  
How We
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design, and tested the operating effectiveness of
controls over the Partnership’s process for purchase accounting for the investment in TRG,
including controls over management’s review of the assumptions described above.
To test the Partnership’s purchase accounting for the investment in TRG, we performed audit
procedures that included, among others, assessing the methodologies used in the valuation
models, evaluating the assumptions used by management in its allocation of the purchase price
to the various components of excess investment, and testing the completeness and accuracy of
the underlying data supporting the assumptions. We compared significant assumptions used to
external market data to assess whether the assumptions were market supported. We involved
our valuation specialists to assist in the assessment of the methodology utilized by the
Partnership and to test certain of the assumptions including capitalization rates and the
valuation of land. We also compared the forecasted cash flows and operating income before
depreciation and amortization used in the valuations to historical actual results and market-
supported data, evaluated significant variances, including consideration of the current economic
environment, and performed certain sensitivity analyses to evaluate the impact on the purchase
accounting allocations.  We also tested the completeness and accuracy of the underlying data
included in the valuation models.
Evaluation of Investment Properties for Impairment
Description of the
MatterAt December 31, 2021, the Partnership’s consolidated net investment properties totaled $22.3
billion. In addition, a significant number of the Partnership’s investments in unconsolidated
entities and its investments in Klépierre and TRG hold investment properties. As discussed in
Note 3 to the consolidated financial statements, the Partnership reviews investment properties
for impairment on a property-by-property basis to identify and evaluate events or changes in
circumstances that indicate the carrying value of an investment property may not be
recoverable. The Partnership estimates undiscounted cash flows of an investment property
using observable and unobservable inputs such as historical and forecasted cash flows,
operating income before depreciation and amortization, estimated capitalization rates, leasing
prospects and local market information.
Auditing management’s evaluation of investment properties for impairment was complex due to
the estimation uncertainty in determining the undiscounted cash flows of an investment property.
In particular, the impairment evaluation for investment properties was sensitive to significant
assumptions such as forecasted cash flows and operating income before depreciation and
amortization, and capitalization rates, all of which can be affected by expectations about future
market or economic conditions, demand, and competition.
How We
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design, and tested the operating effectiveness of
controls over the Partnership’s process for evaluating investment properties for impairment,
including controls over management’s review of the significant assumptions described above.
 
To test the Partnership’s evaluation of investment properties for impairment, we performed audit
procedures that included, among others, assessing the methodologies applied, evaluating the
significant assumptions discussed above and testing the completeness and accuracy of the
underlying data used by management in its analysis. We compared the significant assumptions
used by management to current industry and economic trends, relevant market information, and
other applicable sources. We also involved a valuation specialist to assist in evaluating certain
assumptions. In addition, we compared the forecasted cash flows and operating income before
depreciation and amortization to historical actual results and evaluated significant variances,
including consideration of the current economic environment. As part of our evaluation, we
assessed the historical accuracy of management’s estimates and performed sensitivity analyses
of significant assumptions to evaluate the changes in the undiscounted cash flows of the related
investment property that would result from changes in the assumptions.
Table of Contents
86Evaluation of Investments in Unconsolidated Entities for Impairment
Description of the
MatterAt December 31, 2021, the carrying value of the Partnership’s investments in unconsolidated
entities and its investments in Klépierre and TRG totaled $8.0 billion. As explained in Note 3 to
the consolidated financial statements, the Partnership reviews investments in unconsolidated
entities for impairment if events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying value of
an investment in an unconsolidated entity may not be recoverable. To identify and evaluate
whether an other-than-temporary decline in the fair value of an investment below its carrying
value has occurred, the Partnership assesses economic and operating conditions that may
affect the fair value of the investment. The evaluation of operating conditions may include
developing estimates of forecasted cash flows or operating income before depreciation and
amortization to support the recoverability of the carrying amount of the investment. When
required, the Partnership estimates the fair value of an investment and assesses whether any
impairment is other than temporary using observable and unobservable inputs such as historical
and forecasted cash flows or operating income before depreciation and amortization, estimated
capitalization and discount rates, or relevant market multiples, leasing prospects and local
market information.
Auditing management’s evaluation of investments in unconsolidated entities for impairment was
complex due to the estimation uncertainty in determining the forecasted cash flows, operating
income before depreciation and amortization, estimated fair value of the investment and whether
any decline in fair value below the related investment’s carrying amount is other-than-temporary.
In particular, the impairment evaluation for these investments was sensitive to significant
assumptions such as forecasted cash flows, operating income before depreciation and
amortization, relevant market multiples, and capitalization and discount rates, all of which can be
affected by expectations about future market or economic conditions, demand, and competition.
How We
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design, and tested the operating effectiveness of
controls over the Partnership’s process for evaluating investments in unconsolidated entities for
impairment, including controls over management’s review of the significant assumptions
described above.
To test the Partnership’s evaluation of investments in unconsolidated entities for impairment, we
performed audit procedures that included, among others, assessing the methodologies applied,
evaluating the significant assumptions discussed above and testing the completeness and
accuracy of data used by management in its analysis. We compared the significant assumptions
used by management to current industry and economic trends, relevant market information, and
other applicable sources. We also involved a valuation specialist to assist in evaluating certain
assumptions. In addition, we compared the forecasted cash flows and operating income before
depreciation and amortization to historical actual results and evaluated significant variances,
including consideration of the current economic environment. As part of our evaluation, we
assessed the historical accuracy of management’s estimates and performed sensitivity analyses
of significant assumptions to evaluate the changes in the cash flows and the fair value of the
related investment that would result from changes in the assumptions, and we evaluated
whether a decline in fair value below the related investment’s carrying value was other-than-
temporary.
/s/ ERNST  & Y OUNG  LLP
We have served as the Partnership’s auditor since 2002.
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 24, 2022
Table of Contents
87Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets
(Dollars in thousands, except share amounts)
    December 31,     December 31,  
2021 2020  
ASSETS:
Investment properties, at cost $37,932,366$38,050,196
Less - accumulated depreciation  15,621,127 14,891,937
 22,311,239 23,158,259
Cash and cash equivalents  533,936 1,011,613
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net  919,654 1,236,734
Investment in TRG, at equity  3,305,102 3,451,897
Investment in Klépierre, at equity  1,661,943 1,729,690
Investment in other unconsolidated entities, at equity 3,075,375 2,603,571
Right-of-use assets, net 504,119 512,914
Investments held in trust - special purpose acquisition company 345,000 —
Deferred costs and other assets  1,121,011 1,082,168
Total assets $33,777,379$34,786,846
LIABILITIES:
Mortgages and unsecured indebtedness $25,321,022$26,723,361
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, and deferred revenues  1,433,216 1,311,925
Cash distributions and losses in unconsolidated entities, at equity  1,573,105 1,577,393
Dividend payable 1,468 486,922
Lease liabilities 506,931 515,492
Other liabilities  540,912 513,515
Total liabilities  29,376,654 31,128,608
Commitments and contingencies
Limited partners’ preferred interest in the Operating Partnership and noncontrolling
redeemable interests  547,740 185,892
EQUITY:
Stockholders’ Equity
Capital stock (850,000,000 total shares authorized, $0.0001 par value, 238,000,000
shares of excess common stock, 100,000,000 authorized shares of preferred
stock):
Series J 83/8% cumulative redeemable preferred stock, 1,000,000 shares
authorized, 796,948 issued and outstanding with a liquidation value of $39,847  41,763 42,091
Common stock, $0.0001 par value, 511,990,000 shares authorized, 342,907,608
and 342,849,037 issued and outstanding, respectively  34 34
Class B common stock, $0.0001 par value, 10,000 shares authorized, 8,000 issued
and outstanding  —  —
Capital in excess of par value  11,212,990 11,179,688
Accumulated deficit  (5,823,708) (6,102,314)
Accumulated other comprehensive loss  (185,186) (188,675)
Common stock held in treasury, at cost, 14,295,983 and 14,355,621 shares,
respectively  (1,884,441) (1,891,352)
Total stockholders’ equity  3,361,452 3,039,472
Noncontrolling interests  491,533 432,874
Total equity  3,852,985 3,472,346
Total liabilities and equity $33,777,379$34,786,846
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
88Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income
(Dollars in thousands, except per share amounts)
For the Year  
Ended December 31,  
    2021     2020     2019  
REVENUE:
Lease income $4,736,719$4,302,367$5,243,771
Management fees and other revenues  106,483 96,882 112,942
Other income  273,587 208,254 398,476
Total revenue  5,116,789 4,607,503 5,755,189
EXPENSES:
Property operating  415,720 349,154 453,145
Depreciation and amortization  1,262,715 1,318,008 1,340,503
Real estate taxes  458,953 457,142 468,004
Repairs and maintenance  96,391 80,858 100,495
Advertising and promotion  114,303 98,613 150,344
Home and regional office costs  184,660 171,668 190,109
General and administrative  30,339 22,572 34,860
Other  140,518 137,679 104,942
Total operating expenses  2,703,599 2,635,694 2,842,402
OPERATING INCOME BEFORE OTHER ITEMS  2,413,190 1,971,809 2,912,787
Interest expense  (795,712) (784,400) (789,353)
Loss on extinguishment of debt (51,841) — (116,256)
Gain on sale or exchange of equity interests (Note 6) 178,672 — —
Income and other tax (expense) benefit  (157,199) 4,637 (30,054)
Income from unconsolidated entities  782,837 219,870 444,349
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments (8,095) (19,632) (13,168)
Gain (loss) on acquisition of controlling interest, sale or disposal of, or recovery
on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net  206,855 (114,960) 14,883
CONSOLIDATED NET INCOME 2,568,707 1,277,324 2,423,188
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests  319,076 164,760 321,604
Preferred dividends  3,337 3,337 3,337
NET INCOME ATTRIBUTABLE TO COMMON STOCKHOLDERS $2,246,294$1,109,227$2,098,247
BASIC AND DILUTED EARNINGS PER COMMON SHARE:
Net income attributable to common stockholders $ 6.84$ 3.59$ 6.81
Consolidated Net Income $2,568,707$1,277,324$2,423,188
Unrealized gain (loss) on derivative hedge agreements  51,114 (106,548) (4,066)
Net (gain) loss reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into
earnings  (7,285) (106) 13,634
Currency translation adjustments  (38,772) 27,288 (1,850)
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other  (1,014) 180 718
Comprehensive income  2,572,750 1,198,138 2,431,624
Comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interests  319,629 155,646 322,627
Comprehensive income attributable to common stockholders $2,253,121$1,042,492$2,108,997
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
89Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(Dollars in thousands)
For the Year  
Ended December 31,  
    2021     2020     2019  
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES:                     
Consolidated Net Income $2,568,707$1,277,324$2,423,188
Adjustments to reconcile consolidated net income to net cash
provided by operating activities
Depreciation and amortization  1,325,895  1,354,991  1,394,172
Loss on debt extinguishment 51,841 — 116,256
(Gain) loss upon acquisition of controlling interests, sale or
disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in
unconsolidated entities, and impairment, net  (206,855) 114,960  (14,883)
Gain on sale or exchange of equity interests (178,672) — —
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments 8,095 19,632 8,212
Straight-line lease loss (income)  22,619  19,950  (67,139)
Equity in income of unconsolidated entities  (782,837) (219,870) (444,349)
Distributions of income from unconsolidated entities  436,881  184,733  428,769
Changes in assets and liabilities
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net  265,352  (415,911) (157)
Deferred costs and other assets  (77,592) (28,191) (49,338)
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, deferred
revenues and other  203,968  19,080  13,100
Net cash provided by operating activities  3,637,402  2,326,698  3,807,831
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES:
Acquisitions  (257,080) (3,606,694) (12,800)
Funding of loans to related parties  (15,848) (8,236) —
Repayments of loans to related parties  14,027  —  7,641
Capital expenditures, net  (527,935) (484,119) (876,011)
Cash impact from the consolidation of properties  5,595  —  1,045
Net proceeds from sale of assets  3,000  33,418  6,776
Investments in unconsolidated entities  (56,901) (191,368) (63,789)
Purchase of equity instruments  (33,605) (32,955) (374,231)
Proceeds from sales of equity instruments  65,504  30,000  —
Insurance proceeds for property restoration 7,200 31,198 5,662
Distributions of capital from unconsolidated entities and other  243,279  250,358  229,000
Net cash used in investing activities  (552,764) (3,978,398) (1,076,707)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES:
Proceeds from sales of common stock and other, net of transaction
costs  (328) 1,556,148  (328)
Purchase of shares related to stock grant recipients' tax
withholdings (2,318) (854) (2,955)
Redemption of limited partner units  (2,220) (16,106) (6,846)
Purchase of treasury stock — (152,589) (359,773)
Proceeds from the special purpose acquisition company IPO, net
of transaction costs 338,121 — —
Establishment of trust account for special purpose acquisition
company  (345,000) —  —
Distributions to noncontrolling interest holders in properties  (5,024) (8,271) (41,549)
Contributions from noncontrolling interest holders in properties  20,902  220  139
Preferred distributions of the Operating Partnership  (1,915) (1,915) (1,915)
Distributions to stockholders and preferred dividends  (2,351,764) (1,443,183) (2,558,944)
Distributions to limited partners  (337,021) (219,095) (388,542)
Cash paid to extinguish debt (50,156) — (99,975)
Proceeds from issuance of debt, net of transaction costs  9,251,217  15,234,860  13,312,301
Repayments of debt (10,076,809)(12,955,275)(12,427,699)
Net cash (used in) provided by financing activities  (3,562,315) 1,993,940  (2,576,086)
(DECREASE) INCREASE IN CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS  (477,677) 342,240  155,038
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS, beginning of period  1,011,613  669,373  514,335
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS, end of period $ 533,936$1,011,613$ 669,373
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
90Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Equity
(Dollars in thousands)
            Accumulated Other                      
Comprehensive Capital in Common Stock  
Preferred Common Income Excess of Par Accumulated Held in Noncontrolling Total  
Stock Stock (Loss) Value Deficit Treasury Interests Equity  
Balance at December 31, 2018 $42,748 $ 32 $ (126,017 )$9,700,418 $(4,893,069 )$ (1,427,431 )$ 500,275 $3,796,956
Exchange of limited partner units ( 24,000
common shares, Note 8) 253 (253) —
Series J preferred stock premium amortization (328) (328)
Stock incentive program ( 90,902  common
shares, net) (16,589 ) 16,589 —
Redemption of limited partner units ( 43,255
units) (6,453 ) (393) (6,846 )
Amortization of stock incentive 12,604 12,604
Treasury stock purchase ( 2,247,074  shares) (359,773 ) (359,773 )
Long-term incentive performance units 20,749 20,749
Issuance of unit equivalents and other
(16,336  common shares repurchased) 19 (29,523 ) (2,956 ) 139 (32,321 )
Unrealized gain on  hedging activities (3,553 ) (513) (4,066 )
Currency translation adjustments (1,489 ) (361) (1,850 )
Changes in available-for-sale securities and
other 623 95 718
Net loss reclassified from accumulated
other comprehensive loss into earnings 11,832 1,802 13,634
Other comprehensive income 7,413 1,023  8,436
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from
change in ownership in the Operating
Partnership 65,821 (65,821 ) —
Distributions to common stockholders and
limited partners, excluding Operating
Partnership preferred interests (2,558,944 ) (388,541 ) (2,947,485 )
Distribution to other noncontrolling interest
partners (2,446 ) (2,446 )
Net income, excluding $ 1,915  attributable to
preferred interests in the Operating
Partnership and a $ 431 loss attributable to
noncontrolling redeemable interests in
properties 2,101,584 320,120 2,421,704
Balance at December 31, 2019 $42,420 $ 32 $ (118,604 )$9,756,073 $(5,379,952 )$ (1,773,571 )$ 384,852 $2,911,250
Exchange of limited partner units ( 293,204
common shares, Note 8) 2,028 (2,028 ) —
Issuance of limited partner units ( 955,705
units) 79,601 79,601
Public of fering of common stock ( 22,137,500
common shares) 2 1,556,477 — 1,556,479
Series J preferred stock premium amortization (329) (329)
Stock incentive program ( 462,967  common
shares, net) (35,662 ) 35,662 —
Redemption of limited partner units ( 116,658
units) (15,163 ) (943) (16,106 )
Amortization of stock incentive 11,660 11,660
Treasury stock purchase ( 1,245,654  shares) (152,590 ) (152,590 )
Long-term incentive performance units 2,331 2,331
Issuance of unit equivalents and other
(15,561  common shares repurchased) 30 34,894 (853) (3,582 ) 30,489
Unrealized loss on hedging activities (92,834 ) (13,714 ) (106,548 )
Currency translation adjustments 22,694 4,594 27,288
Changes in available-for-sale securities and
other 162 18 180
Net gain reclassified from accumulated
other comprehensive loss into earnings (93) (13) (106)
Other comprehensive income (70,071 ) (9,115 ) (79,186 )
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from
change in ownership in the Operating
Partnership (95,755 ) 95,755 —
Distributions to common stockholders and
limited partners, excluding Operating
Partnership preferred interests (1,869,820 ) (279,379 ) (2,149,199 )
Distribution to other noncontrolling interest
partners (3,507 ) (3,507 )
Net income, excluding $ 1,915  attributable to
preferred interests in the Operating
Partnership and a $ 6,044  loss attributable
to noncontrolling redeemable interests in
properties 1,112,564 168,889 1,281,453
Balance at December 31, 2020 $42,091 $ 34 $ (188,675 )$11,179,688 $(6,102,314 )$ (1,891,352 )$ 432,874 $3,472,346
Table of Contents
91            Accumulated Other                      
Comprehensive Capital in Common Stock  
Preferred Common Income Excess of Par Accumulated Held in Noncontrolling Total  
Stock Stock (Loss) Value Deficit Treasury Interests Equity  
Exchange of limited partner units ( 58,571
common shares, Note 8) 539 (539) —
Series J preferred stock premium amortization (328) (328)
Stock incentive program ( 80,012  common
shares, net) (9,229 ) 9,229 —
Redemption of limited partner units ( 15,705
units) (2,061 ) (159) (2,220 )
Amortization of stock incentive 19,673 19,673
Long-term incentive performance units 17,755 17,755
Issuance of unit equivalents and other
(20,374  common shares repurchased) 5,760 (44,319 ) (2,318 ) 18,494 (22,383 )
Unrealized gain on hedging activities 44,676 6,438 51,114
Currency translation adjustments (33,932 ) (4,840 ) (38,772 )
Changes in available-for-sale securities and
other (886) (128) (1,014 )
Net gain reclassified from accumulated
other comprehensive loss into earnings (6,369 ) (916) (7,285 )
Other comprehensive income 3,489 554 4,043
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from
change in ownership in the Operating
Partnership 18,620 (18,620 ) —
Distributions to common stockholders and
limited partners, excluding Operating
Partnership preferred interests (1,926,706 ) (276,698 ) (2,203,404 )
Distribution to other noncontrolling interest
partners (2,708 ) (2,708 )
Net income, excluding $ 1,915  attributable to
preferred interests in the Operating
Partnership and a $ 3,419  loss attributable
to noncontrolling redeemable interests in
properties 2,249,631 320,580 2,570,211
Balance at December 31, 2021 $41,763 $ 34 $ (185,186 )$11,212,990 $(5,823,708 )$ (1,884,441 )$ 491,533 $3,852,985
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
92Simon Property Group, L.P.
Consolidated Balance Sheets
(Dollars in thousands, except unit amounts)
    December 31,     December 31,  
2021 2020  
ASSETS:
Investment properties, at cost $37,932,366 $38,050,196
Less — accumulated depreciation  15,621,127  14,891,937
 22,311,239  23,158,259
Cash and cash equivalents  533,936  1,011,613
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net  919,654  1,236,734
Investment in TRG, at equity  3,305,102  3,451,897
Investment in Klépierre, at equity  1,661,943  1,729,690
Investment in other unconsolidated entities, at equity 3,075,375 2,603,571
Right-of-use assets, net 504,119 512,914
Investments held in trust - special purpose acquisition company 345,000 —
Deferred costs and other assets  1,121,011  1,082,168
Total assets $33,777,379 $34,786,846
LIABILITIES:
Mortgages and unsecured indebtedness $25,321,022 $26,723,361
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, and deferred revenues  1,433,216  1,311,925
Cash distributions and losses in unconsolidated entities, at equity  1,573,105  1,577,393
Distribution payable 1,468 486,922
Lease liabilities 506,931 515,492
Other liabilities  540,912  513,515
Total liabilities  29,376,654  31,128,608
Commitments and contingencies
Preferred units, various series, at liquidation value, and noncontrolling redeemable
interests  547,740  185,892
EQUITY:
Partners’ Equity
Preferred units, 796,948 units outstanding. Liquidation value of $39,847  41,763  42,091
General Partner, 328,619,625 and 328,501,416 units outstanding, respectively  3,319,689  2,997,381
Limited Partners, 47,247,936 and 47,322,212 units outstanding, respectively  477,292  431,784
Total partners’ equity  3,838,744  3,471,256
Nonredeemable noncontrolling interests in properties, net  14,241  1,090
Total equity  3,852,985  3,472,346
Total liabilities and equity $33,777,379 $34,786,846
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
93Simon Property Group, L.P.
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income
(Dollars in thousands, except per unit amounts)
 For the Year  
 Ended December 31,  
    2021 2020 2019  
REVENUE:   
Lease income $4,736,719$4,302,367$5,243,771
Management fees and other revenues  106,483 96,882 112,942
Other income  273,587 208,254 398,476
Total revenue  5,116,789 4,607,503 5,755,189
EXPENSES:
Property operating  415,720 349,154 453,145
Depreciation and amortization  1,262,715 1,318,008 1,340,503
Real estate taxes  458,953 457,142 468,004
Repairs and maintenance  96,391 80,858 100,495
Advertising and promotion  114,303 98,613 150,344
Home and regional office costs  184,660 171,668 190,109
General and administrative  30,339 22,572 34,860
Other  140,518 137,679 104,942
Total operating expenses  2,703,599 2,635,694 2,842,402
OPERATING INCOME BEFORE OTHER ITEMS  2,413,190 1,971,809 2,912,787
Interest expense  (795,712) (784,400) (789,353)
Loss on extinguishment of debt (51,841) — (116,256)
Gain on sale or exchange of equity interests (Note 6) 178,672 — —
Income and other tax (expense) benefit  (157,199) 4,637 (30,054)
Income from unconsolidated entities  782,837 219,870 444,349
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments (8,095) (19,632) (13,168)
Gain (loss) on acquisition of controlling interest, sale or disposal of, or recovery
on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net  206,855 (114,960) 14,883
CONSOLIDATED NET INCOME  2,568,707 1,277,324 2,423,188
Net (loss) income attributable to noncontrolling interests  (6,053) (4,378) 991
Preferred unit requirements  5,252 5,252 5,252
NET INCOME ATTRIBUTABLE TO UNITHOLDERS $2,569,508$1,276,450$2,416,945
NET INCOME ATTRIBUTABLE TO UNITHOLDERS ATTRIBUTABLE TO:
General Partner $2,246,294$1,109,227$2,098,247
Limited Partners  323,214 167,223 318,698
Net income attributable to unitholders $2,569,508$1,276,450$2,416,945
BASIC AND DILUTED EARNINGS PER UNIT:
Net income attributable to unitholders $ 6.84$ 3.59$ 6.81
Consolidated Net Income $2,568,707$1,277,324$2,423,188
Unrealized gain (loss) on derivative hedge agreements  51,114 (106,548) (4,066)
Net (gain) loss reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into
earnings  (7,285) (106) 13,634
Currency translation adjustments  (38,772) 27,288 (1,850)
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other  (1,014) 180 718
Comprehensive income  2,572,750 1,198,138 2,431,624
Comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interests  (2,634) 1,666 1,422
Comprehensive income attributable to unitholders $2,575,384$1,196,472$2,430,202
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
94Simon Property Group, L.P.
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(Dollars in thousands)
For the Year  
Ended December 31,  
    2021 2020    2019  
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES:      
Consolidated Net Income $2,568,707$1,277,324$2,423,188
Adjustments to reconcile consolidated net income to net cash provided by
operating activities
Depreciation and amortization  1,325,895  1,354,991  1,394,172
Loss on debt extinguishment 51,841 — 116,256
(Gain) loss on acquisition of controlling interests, sale or disposal of,
or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities, and
impairment, net  (206,855) 114,960  (14,883)
Gain on sale or exchange of equity interests (178,672) — —
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments 8,095 19,632 8,212
Straight-line lease loss (income)  22,619  19,950  (67,139)
Equity in income of unconsolidated entities  (782,837) (219,870) (444,349)
Distributions of income from unconsolidated entities  436,881  184,733  428,769
Changes in assets and liabilities
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net  265,352  (415,911) (157)
Deferred costs and other assets  (77,592) (28,191) (49,338)
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, deferred
revenues and other  203,968  19,080  13,100
Net cash provided by operating activities  3,637,402  2,326,698  3,807,831
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES:
Acquisitions  (257,080) (3,606,694) (12,800)
Funding of loans to related parties (15,848) (8,236) —
Repayments of loans to related parties  14,027  —  7,641
Capital expenditures, net  (527,935) (484,119) (876,011)
Cash impact from the consolidation of properties  5,595  —  1,045
Net proceeds from sale of assets 3,000 33,418 6,776
Investments in unconsolidated entities  (56,901) (191,368) (63,789)
Purchase of equity instruments  (33,605) (32,955) (374,231)
Proceeds from sale of equity instruments  65,504  30,000  —
Insurance proceeds for property restoration 7,200 31,198 5,662
Distributions of capital from unconsolidated entities and other  243,279  250,358  229,000
Net cash used in investing activities  (552,764) (3,978,398) (1,076,707)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES:
Issuance of units and other  (328) 1,556,148  (328)
Purchase of units related to stock grant recipients' tax withholdings  (2,318) (854) (2,955)
Redemption of limited partner units (2,220) (16,106) (6,846)
Purchase of general partner units — (152,589) (359,773)
Proceeds from the special purpose acquisition company IPO, net of
transaction costs 338,121 — —
Establishment of trust account for special purpose acquisition
company (345,000) — —
Distributions to noncontrolling interest holders in properties  (5,024) (8,271) (41,549)
Contributions from noncontrolling interest holders in properties  20,902  220  139
Partnership distributions  (2,690,700) (1,664,193) (2,949,401)
Cash paid to extinguish debt (50,156) — (99,975)
Mortgage and unsecured indebtedness proceeds, net of transaction
costs  9,251,217  15,234,860  13,312,301
Mortgage and unsecured indebtedness principal payments  (10,076,809) (12,955,275) (12,427,699)
Net cash (used in) provided by financing activities  (3,562,315) 1,993,940  (2,576,086)
(DECREASE) INCREASE IN CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS  (477,677) 342,240  155,038
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS, beginning of period  1,011,613  669,373  514,335
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS, end of period $ 533,936$1,011,613$ 669,373
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
95Simon Property Group, L.P.
Consolidated Statements of Equity
(Dollars in thousands)
Preferred Simon (Managing Limited Noncontrolling Total  
    Units     General Partner)     Partners     Interests     Equity  
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 42,748 $ 3,253,933 $ 492,877 $ 7,398 $ 3,796,956
Series J preferred stock premium and amortization (328) (328)
Limited partner units exchanged to common units ( 24,000  units) 253 (253) —
Stock incentive program ( 90,902  common units, net) — —
Amortization of stock incentive 12,604 12,604
Redemption of limited partner units ( 43,255  units) (6,453 ) (393) (6,846 )
Treasury unit purchase ( 2,247,074  units) (359,773 ) (359,773 )
Long-term incentive performance units 20,749 20,749
Issuance of unit equivalents and other ( 16,336  common units) (32,460 ) 139 (32,321 )
Unrealized loss on hedging activities (3,553 ) (513) (4,066 )
Currency translation adjustments (1,489 ) (361) (1,850 )
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other 623 95 718
Net loss reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into earnings 11,832 1,802 13,634
Other comprehensive income 7,413 1,023 8,436
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from change in ownership in the Operating
Partnership 65,821 (65,821 ) —
Distributions, excluding distributions on preferred interests classified as temporary
equity (3,337 ) (2,555,607 ) (388,541 ) (2,446 ) (2,949,931 )
Net income, excluding preferred distributions on temporary equity preferred units
of $1,915  and a $ 431 loss attributable to noncontrolling redeemable interests in
properties 3,337 2,098,247 318,698 1,422 2,421,704
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 42,420 $ 2,483,978 $ 378,339 $ 6,513 $ 2,911,250
Issuance of limited partner units ( 955,705  units) 79,601 79,601
Series J preferred stock premium and amortization (329) (329)
Limited partner units exchanged to common units ( 293,204  units) 2,028 (2,028 ) —
Issuance of units related to Simon's public of fering of its common stock
(22,137,500  units) 1,556,479 1,556,479
Stock incentive program ( 462,967  common units, net) — —
Amortization of stock incentive 11,660 11,660
Redemption of limited partner units ( 116,658  units) (15,163 ) (943) (16,106 )
Treasury unit purchase ( 1,245,654  units) (152,590 ) (152,590 )
Long-term incentive performance units 2,331 2,331
Issuance of unit equivalents and other ( 36,252  units and 15,561  common units) 34,071 (3,582 ) 30,489
Unrealized loss on hedging activities (92,834 ) (13,714 ) (106,548 )
Currency translation adjustments 22,694 4,594 27,288
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other 162 18 180
Net gain reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into earnings (93) (13) (106)
Other comprehensive income (70,071 ) (9,115 ) (79,186 )
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from change in ownership in the Operating
Partnership (95,755 ) 95,755 —
Distributions, excluding distributions on preferred interests classified as temporary
equity (3,337 ) (1,866,483 ) (279,379 ) (3,507 ) (2,152,706 )
Net income, excluding preferred distributions on temporary equity preferred units
of $1,915  and a $ 6,044  loss attributable to noncontrolling redeemable interests
in properties 3,337 1,109,227 167,223 1,666 1,281,453
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 42,091 $ 2,997,381 $ 431,784 $ 1,090 $ 3,472,346
Table of Contents
96Preferred Simon (Managing Limited Noncontrolling Total  
    Units     General Partner)     Partners     Interests     Equity  
Series J preferred stock premium and amortization (328) (328)
Limited partner units exchanged to common units ( 58,571  units) 539 (539) —
Stock incentive program ( 80,012  common units, net) — —
Amortization of stock incentive 19,673 19,673
Redemption of limited partner units ( 15,705  units) (2,061 ) (159) (2,220 )
Long-term incentive performance units 17,755 17,755
Issuance of unit equivalents and other ( 20,374  common units) (40,877 ) 1 18,493 (22,383 )
Unrealized gain on hedging activities 44,676 6,438 51,114
Currency translation adjustments (33,932 ) (4,840 ) (38,772 )
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other (886) (128) (1,014 )
Net gain reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into earnings (6,369 ) (916) (7,285 )
Other comprehensive income 3,489 554 4,043
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from change in ownership in the Operating
Partnership 18,620 (18,620 ) —
Distributions, excluding distributions on preferred interests classified as temporary
equity (3,337 ) (1,923,369 ) (276,698 ) (2,708 ) (2,206,112 )
Net income, excluding preferred distributions on temporary equity preferred units
of $1,915  and a $ 3,419  loss attributable to noncontrolling redeemable interests
in properties 3,337 2,246,294 323,214 (2,634 ) 2,570,211
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 41,763 $ 3,319,689 $ 477,292 $ 14,241 $ 3,852,985
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
971. Organization
Simon Property Group, Inc. is a Delaware corporation that operates as a self-administered and self-managed
real estate investment trust, or REIT, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or the Internal Revenue
Code. REITs will generally not be liable for U.S. federal corporate income taxes as long as they distribute not less
than 100% of their REIT taxable income. Simon Property Group, L.P. is our majority-owned Delaware partnership
subsidiary that owns all of our real estate properties and other assets. Unless stated otherwise or the context
otherwise requires, references to "Simon" mean Simon Property Group, Inc. and references to the "Operating
Partnership" mean Simon Property Group, L.P.  References to "we," "us" and "our" mean collectively Simon, the
Operating Partnership and those entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by Simon and/or the Operating Partnership.
Unless otherwise indicated, these notes to consolidated financial statements apply to both Simon and the Operating
Partnership. According to the Operating Partnership's partnership agreement, the Operating Partnership is required to
pay all expenses of Simon.
We own, develop and manage premier shopping, dining, entertainment and mixed-use destinations, which
consist primarily of malls, Premium Outlets®, and The Mills®.  As of December 31, 2021, we owned or held an
interest in 199 income-producing properties in the United States, which consisted of 95 malls, 69 Premium Outlets,
14 Mills, six lifestyle centers, and 15 other retail properties in 37 states and Puerto Rico. We also own an 80%
noncontrolling interest in the Taubman Realty Group, LLC, or TRG, which has an interest in 24 regional, super-
regional, and outlet malls in the U.S. and Asia. Internationally, as of December 31, 2021, we had ownership interests
in 33 Premium Outlets and Designer Outlet properties primarily located in Asia, Europe, and Canada. As of December
31, 2021, we also owned a 22.4% equity stake in Klépierre SA, or Klépierre, a publicly traded, Paris-based real estate
company which owns, or has an interest in, shopping centers located in 14 countries in Europe.
We generate the majority of our lease income from retail, dining, entertainment and other tenants including
consideration received from:
●Fixed minimum lease consideration and fixed common area maintenance (CAM) reimbursements and,
●Variable lease consideration primarily based on tenants’ sales, as well as reimbursements for real estate
taxes, utilities, marketing, and certain other items.
Revenues of our management company, after intercompany eliminations, consist primarily of management
fees that are typically based upon the revenues of the property being managed.
We also grow by generating supplemental revenues from the following activities:
●establishing our properties as leading market resource providers for retailers and other businesses and
consumer-focused corporate alliances, including payment systems (such as handling fees relating to the
sales of bank-issued prepaid cards), national marketing alliances, static and digital media initiatives,
business development, sponsorship, and events,
●offering property operating services to our tenants and others, including waste handling and facility
services, and the provision of energy services,
●selling or leasing land adjacent to our properties, commonly referred to as “outlots” or “outparcels,” and
●generating interest income on cash deposits and investments in loans, including those made to related
entities.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
982. Basis of Presentation and Consolidation
The accompanying consolidated financial statements include the accounts of all controlled subsidiaries, and all
significant intercompany amounts have been eliminated.
We consolidate properties that are wholly-owned or properties where we own less than 100% but we control.
Control of a property is demonstrated by, among other factors, our ability to refinance debt and sell the property
without the consent of any other partner or owner and the inability of any other partner or owner to replace us.
We also consolidate a variable interest entity, or VIE, when we are determined to be the primary beneficiary.
Determination of the primary beneficiary of a VIE is based on whether an entity has (1) the power to direct activities
that most significantly impact the economic performance of the VIE and (2) the obligation to absorb losses or the right
to receive benefits of the VIE that could potentially be significant to the VIE. Our determination of the primary
beneficiary of a VIE considers all relationships between us and the VIE, including management agreements and other
contractual arrangements. There have been no changes during 2021 in previous conclusions about whether an entity
qualifies as a VIE or whether we are the primary beneficiary of any previously identified VIE. During the periods
presented, we did not provide financial or other support to any identified VIE that we were not contractually obligated
to provide.
Investments in partnerships and joint ventures represent our noncontrolling ownership interests. We account
for these unconsolidated entities using the equity method of accounting. We initially record these investments at cost
and we subsequently adjust for net equity in income or loss, which we allocate in accordance with the provisions of
the applicable partnership or joint venture agreement, cash contributions and distributions, and foreign currency
fluctuations, if applicable. The allocation provisions in the partnership or joint venture agreements are not always
consistent with the legal ownership interests held by each general or limited partner or joint venture investee primarily
due to partner preferences. We separately report investments in partnerships and joint ventures for which
accumulated distributions have exceeded investments in and our share of net income of the partnerships and joint
ventures within cash distributions and losses in partnerships and joint ventures, at equity in the consolidated balance
sheets. The net equity of certain partnerships and joint ventures is less than zero because of financing or operating
distributions that are usually greater than net income, as net income includes non-cash charges for depreciation and
amortization.
As of December 31, 2021, we consolidated 131 wholly-owned properties and 17 additional properties that are
less than wholly-owned, but which we control or for which we are the primary beneficiary. We apply the equity method
of accounting to the other 84 properties (the joint venture properties) and our investments in Klépierre (a publicly
traded, Paris-based real estate company) and The Taubman Realty Group, LLC, or TRG, as well as our investments
in certain entities involved in retail operations, such as J.C. Penney and SPARC Group; intellectual property and
licensing ventures, such as Authentic Brands Group, LLC, or ABG, and Eddie Bauer Ipco; and an e-commerce
venture Rue Gilt Groupe, or RGG, (collectively, our other platform investments).  We manage the day-to-day
operations of 53 of the 84 joint venture properties, but have determined that our partner or partners have substantive
participating rights with respect to the assets and operations of these joint venture properties. Our investments in joint
ventures in Japan, South Korea, Mexico, Malaysia, Canada, Spain, Thailand, and the United Kingdom comprise 23 of
the remaining 31 properties. These international properties and TRG are managed by joint ventures in which we
share control.
Preferred distributions of the Operating Partnership are accrued at declaration and represent distributions on
outstanding preferred units of partnership interests, or preferred units, and are included in net income attributable to
noncontrolling interests.  We allocate net operating results of the Operating Partnership after preferred distributions to
limited partners and to us based on the partners’ respective weighted average ownership interests in the Operating
Partnership. Net operating results of the Operating Partnership attributable to limited partners are reflected in net
income attributable to noncontrolling interests.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
99Our weighted average ownership interest in the Operating Partnership was as follows:
For the Year Ended 
December 31,  
    2021    2020    2019
Weighted average ownership interest  87.4 %  86.9 %  86.8 %  
As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, our ownership interest in the Operating Partnership was 87.4%. We
adjust the noncontrolling limited partners’ interest at the end of each period to reflect their interest in the net assets of
the Operating Partnership.
Preferred unit requirements in the Operating Partnership’s accompanying consolidated statements of
operations and comprehensive income represent distributions on outstanding preferred units and are recorded when
declared.    
3. Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
Investment Properties
Investment properties consist of the following as of December 31:
    2021     2020  
Land $3,639,353 $3,700,023
Buildings and improvements  33,857,863  33,908,615
Total land, buildings and improvements  37,497,216  37,608,638
Furniture, fixtures and equipment  435,150  441,558
Investment properties at cost  37,932,366  38,050,196
Less — accumulated depreciation  15,621,127  14,891,937
Investment properties at cost, net $22,311,239 $23,158,259
Construction in progress included above $797,519 $773,061
We record investment properties at cost. Investment properties include costs of acquisitions; development,
predevelopment, and construction (including allocable salaries and related benefits); tenant allowances and
improvements; and interest and real estate taxes incurred during construction. We capitalize improvements and
replacements from repair and maintenance when the repair and maintenance extends the useful life, increases
capacity, or improves the efficiency of the asset. All other repair and maintenance items are expensed as incurred.
We capitalize interest on projects during periods of construction until the projects are ready for their intended purpose
based on interest rates in place during the construction period. The amount of interest capitalized during each year is
as follows:
For the Year Ended  
December 31,  
    2021    2020    2019
Capitalized interest $31,204 $22,917 $33,342
We record depreciation on buildings and improvements utilizing the straight-line method over an estimated
original useful life, which is generally 10 to 35 years. We review depreciable lives of investment properties periodically
and we make adjustments when necessary to reflect a shorter economic life. We amortize tenant allowances and
tenant improvements utilizing the straight-line method over the term of the related lease or occupancy term of the
tenant, if shorter. We record depreciation on equipment and fixtures utilizing the straight-line method over seven to
ten years.
We review investment properties for impairment on a property-by-property basis to identify and evaluate
events or changes in circumstances which indicate that the carrying value of investment properties may not be
recoverable. These
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
100circumstances include, but are not limited to, declines in a property’s operational performance, such as declining cash
flows, occupancy or total sales per square foot, the Company’s intent and ability to hold the related asset, and, if
applicable, the remaining time to maturity of underlying financing arrangements. We measure any impairment of
investment property when the estimated undiscounted operating income before depreciation and amortization during
the anticipated holding period plus its residual value, and, if applicable, on a probability weighted basis, is less than
the carrying value of the property. To the extent impairment has occurred, we charge to income the excess of carrying
value of the property over our estimate of fair value.
We also review our investments, including investments in unconsolidated entities, to identify and evaluate
whether events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of our investments may not be
recoverable. We will record an impairment charge if we determine the fair value of the investment is less than its
carrying value and such impairment is other-than-temporary. Our evaluation of changes in economic or operating
conditions and whether an impairment is other-than-temporary may include developing estimates of fair value,
forecasted cash flows or operating income before depreciation and amortization.
We estimate undiscounted cash flows and fair value using observable and unobservable data such as
operating income before depreciation and amortization, hold periods, estimated capitalization and discount rates, or
relevant market multiples, leasing prospects and local market information, expected probabilities of outcomes, if
applicable, and whether an impairment is other-than-temporary. Changes in economic and operating conditions
including, changes in the financial condition of our tenants and changes to our intent and ability to hold the related
asset, that occur subsequent to our review of recoverability of investment property and other investments could
impact the assumptions used in that assessment and could result in future charges to earnings if assumptions
regarding those investments differ from actual results.  
During the fourth quarter of 2020, we recorded an impairment charge of $34.4 million related to one
consolidated property, which is included in (loss) gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in
unconsolidated entities and impairment, net, in the accompanying consolidated statement of operations and
comprehensive income.  During the third quarter of 2020, we recorded an other-than-temporary impairment charge of
$55.2 million, representing our equity method investment balance in three joint venture properties, which is included
in (loss) gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment,
net, in the accompanying consolidated statement of operations and comprehensive income.  
Purchase Accounting
We allocate the purchase price of asset acquisitions and any excess investment in unconsolidated entities to
the various components of the acquisition based upon the relative fair value of each component which may be
derived from various observable or unobservable inputs and assumptions. Also, we may utilize third party valuation
specialists. These components typically include buildings, land and intangibles related to in-place leases and we
estimate:
●the relative fair value of land and related improvements and buildings on an as-if-vacant basis,
●the market value of in-place leases based upon our best estimate of current market rents and amortize the
resulting market rent adjustment into lease income,
●the value of costs to obtain tenants, including tenant allowances and improvements and leasing
commissions, and
●the value of lease income and recovery of costs foregone during a reasonable lease-up period, as if the
space was vacant.
The relative fair value of buildings is depreciated over the estimated remaining life of the acquired building or
related improvements. We amortize tenant improvements, in-place lease assets and other lease-related intangibles
over the remaining life of the underlying leases. We also estimate the value of other acquired intangible assets, if any,
which are amortized over the remaining life of the underlying related intangibles.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
101Cash and Cash Equivalents
We consider all highly liquid investments purchased with an original maturity of 90 days or less to be cash and
cash equivalents. Cash equivalents are carried at cost, which approximates fair value. Cash equivalents generally
consist of commercial paper, bankers’ acceptances, Eurodollars, repurchase agreements, and money market
deposits or securities. Financial instruments that potentially subject us to concentrations of credit risk include our cash
and cash equivalents and our trade accounts receivable. We place our cash and cash equivalents with institutions of
high credit quality. However, at certain times, such cash and cash equivalents are in excess of Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation and Securities Investor Protection Corporation insurance limits. See Notes 4 and 8 for
disclosures about non-cash investing and financing transactions.
Equity Instruments and Debt Securities
Equity instruments and debt securities consist primarily of equity instruments, our deferred compensation plan
investments, the debt securities of our captive insurance subsidiary, and certain investments held to fund the debt
service requirements of debt previously secured by investment properties. At December 31, 2021 and 2020, we had
equity instruments with readily determinable fair values of $142.2 million and $41.9 million, respectively. Changes in
the fair value of these equity instruments are recorded in unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments in our
consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income. At December 31, 2021 and 2020, we had equity
instruments without readily determinable fair values of $217.2 million and $309.3 million, respectively, for which we
have elected the measurement alternative. We regularly evaluate these investments for any impairment in their
estimated fair value, as well as any observable price changes for an identical or similar equity instrument of the same
issuer, and determined that no material adjustment in the carrying value was required for the years ended December
31, 2021 and 2020.
Our deferred compensation plan equity instruments are valued based upon quoted market prices.  The
investments have a matching liability as the amounts are fully payable to the employees that earned the
compensation.  Changes in value of these securities and changes to the matching liability to employees are both
recognized in earnings and, as a result, there is no impact to consolidated net income.
At December 31, 2021 and 2020, we held debt securities of $60.9 million and $40.5 million, respectively, in our
captive insurance subsidiary. The types of securities included in the investment portfolio of our captive insurance
subsidiary are typically U.S. Treasury or other U.S. government securities as well as corporate debt securities with
maturities ranging from less than one year to ten years. These securities are classified as available-for-sale and are
valued based upon quoted market prices or other observable inputs when quoted market prices are not available. The
amortized cost of debt securities, which approximates fair value, held by our captive insurance subsidiary is adjusted
for amortization of premiums and accretion of discounts to maturity. Changes in the values of these securities are
recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) until the gain or loss is realized or until any unrealized
loss is deemed to be other-than-temporary. We review any declines in value of these securities for other-than-
temporary impairment and consider the severity and duration of any decline in value. To the extent an other-than-
temporary impairment is deemed to have occurred, an impairment is recorded and a new cost basis is established.
Our captive insurance subsidiary is required to maintain statutory minimum capital and surplus as well as
maintain a minimum liquidity ratio. Therefore, our access to these securities may be limited.
Fair Value Measurements
Level 1 fair value inputs are quoted prices for identical items in active, liquid and visible markets such as stock
exchanges. Level 2 fair value inputs are observable information for similar items in active or inactive markets, and
appropriately consider counterparty creditworthiness in the valuations. Level 3 fair value inputs reflect our best
estimate of inputs and assumptions market participants would use in pricing an asset or liability at the measurement
date. The inputs are unobservable in the market and significant to the valuation estimate. We have no investments for
which fair value is measured on a recurring basis using Level 3 inputs.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
102The equity instruments with readily determinable fair values we held at December 31, 2021 and 2020 were
primarily classified as having Level 1 and Level 2 fair value inputs. In addition, we had derivative instruments which
were classified as having Level 2 inputs, which consist primarily of foreign currency forward contracts and interest
rate swap agreements with a gross asset balance of $6.2 million at December 31, 2021 and an insignificant gross
asset balance at December 31, 2020, and a gross liability balance of $1.5 million and $44.6 million at December 31,
2021 and 2020, respectively.
Note 7 includes a discussion of the fair value of debt measured using Level 2 inputs.  Notes 3, 4, and 6 include
discussions of the fair values recorded in purchase accounting using Level 2 and Level 3 inputs.  Level 3 inputs to our
purchase accounting and impairment analyses include our estimations of fair value, net operating results of the
property, capitalization rates and discount rates.
Gains or losses on Issuances of Stock by Equity Method Investees
When one of our equity method investees issues additional shares to third parties, our percentage ownership
interest in the investee may decrease. In the event the issuance price per share is higher or lower than our average
carrying amount per share, we recognize a noncash gain or loss on the issuance, when appropriate. This noncash
gain or loss is recognized in our net income in the period the change of ownership interest occurs.
Use of Estimates
We prepared the accompanying consolidated financial statements in accordance with accounting principles
generally accepted in the United States, or GAAP. GAAP requires us to make estimates and assumptions that affect
the reported amounts of assets and liabilities, disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial
statements, and revenues and expenses during the reported period. Our actual results could differ from these
estimates.
Segment and Geographic Locations
Our primary business is the ownership, development, and management of premier shopping, dining,
entertainment and mixed use real estate. We have aggregated our retail operations, including malls, Premium
Outlets, The Mills, and our international investments into one reportable segment because they have similar
economic characteristics and we provide similar products and services to similar types of, and in many cases, the
same, tenants.  As of December 31, 2021, approximately 7.1% of our consolidated long-lived assets and 3.0% of our
consolidated total revenues were derived from assets located outside the United States.  As of December 31, 2020,
approximately 6.9% of our consolidated long-lived assets and 2.4% of our consolidated total revenues were derived
from assets located outside the United States.
Deferred Costs and Other Assets
Deferred costs and other assets include the following as of December 31:
    2021     2020  
Deferred lease costs, net $109,155 $169,651
In-place lease intangibles, net  14,107  3,905
Acquired above market lease intangibles, net  19,171  31,053
Marketable securities of our captive insurance companies  60,855  40,496
Goodwill  20,098  20,098
Other marketable and non-marketable securities  359,459  351,176
Prepaids, notes receivable and other assets, net  538,166  465,789
$1,121,011 $1,082,168
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
103Deferred Lease Costs
Our deferred leasing costs consist primarily of initial direct costs and, prior to the adoption of ASC 842,
capitalized salaries and related benefits, in connection with lease originations. We record amortization of deferred
leasing costs on a straight-line basis over the terms of the related leases. Details of these deferred costs as of
December 31 are as follows:
    2021     2020  
Deferred lease costs $358,287 $407,288
Accumulated amortization  (249,132 ) (237,637 )
Deferred lease costs, net $109,155 $169,651
Amortization of deferred leasing costs is a component of depreciation and amortization expense. The
accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income include amortization of deferred
leasing costs as follows:
For the Year Ended December 31,  
    2021     2020     2019  
Amortization of deferred leasing costs $43,028 $51,349 $57,201
Intangibles
The average remaining life of in-place lease intangibles is approximately 2.8 years and is being amortized on a
straight-line basis and is included with depreciation and amortization in the consolidated statements of operations and
comprehensive income. The fair market value of above and below market leases is amortized into lease income over
the remaining lease life as a component of reported lease income. The weighted average remaining life of these
intangibles is approximately 2.6 years. The unamortized amount of below market leases is included in accounts
payable, accrued expenses, intangibles and deferred revenues in the consolidated balance sheets and was $21.6
million and $28.7 million as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively. The amount of amortization of above and
below market leases, net, which increased lease income for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019,
was $2.7 million, $1.3 million and $1.9 million, respectively. If a lease is terminated prior to the original lease
termination, any remaining unamortized intangible is written off to earnings.
Details of intangible assets as of December 31 are as follows:
2021     2020
In-place lease intangibles $115,550 $173,094
Accumulated amortization (101,443 )(169,189 )
In-place lease intangibles, net $14,107 $ 3,905
2021 2020
Acquired above market lease intangibles $133,224 $186,620
Accumulated amortization (114,053 )(155,567 )
Acquired above market lease intangibles, net $19,171 $31,053
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
104Estimated future amortization and the increasing (decreasing) effect on lease income for our above and below
market leases as of December 31, 2021 are as follows:
Below Above Impact to
Market Market Lease
Leases Leases Income, Net
2022 $5,957 $(7,877 )$ (1,920 ) 
2023  4,470  (5,511 ) (1,041 )
2024  3,510  (3,733 ) (223)
2025  2,374  (1,564 ) 810
2026  1,581  (459) 1,122
Thereafter  3,721  (27) 3,694
$21,613 $(19,171 )$ 2,442
Derivative Financial Instruments
We record all derivatives on our consolidated balance sheets at fair value. The accounting for changes in the
fair value of derivatives depends on the intended use of the derivative, whether we have designated a derivative as a
hedge and whether the hedging relationship has satisfied the criteria necessary to apply hedge accounting. We may
use a variety of derivative financial instruments in the normal course of business to selectively manage or hedge a
portion of the risks associated with our indebtedness and interest payments. Our objectives in using interest rate
derivatives are to add stability to interest expense and to manage our exposure to interest rate movements. To
accomplish this objective, we primarily use interest rate swaps and caps. We require that hedging derivative
instruments be highly effective in reducing the risk exposure that they are designated to hedge. We formally
designate any instrument that meets these hedging criteria as a hedge at the inception of the derivative contract.  We
have no credit-risk-related hedging or derivative activities.
As of December 31, 2021, we had the following outstanding interest rate derivatives related to managing our
interest rate risk:
Number of Notional
Interest Rate Derivative     Instruments    Amount  
Interest Rate Swaps  2 $375.0  million
The carrying value of our interest rate swap agreements, at fair value, as of December 31, 2021 was a net
asset balance of $0.6 million and is included in deferred costs and other assets. We had no outstanding interest rate
derivatives as of December 31, 2020. We generally do not apply hedge accounting to interest rate caps, which had an
insignificant value as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Our exposure to market risk due to changes in interest rates primarily relates to our long-term debt obligations.
We manage exposure to interest rate market risk through our risk management strategy by a combination of interest
rate protection agreements to effectively fix or cap a portion of variable rate debt.
We may enter into treasury lock agreements as part of an anticipated debt issuance. Upon completion of the
debt issuance, the fair value of these instruments is recorded as part of accumulated other comprehensive income
(loss) and is amortized to interest expense over the life of the debt agreement.
The unamortized gain on our treasury locks and terminated hedges recorded in accumulated other
comprehensive income was $6.9 million and $8.7 million as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively. Within the
next year, we expect to reclassify to earnings approximately $1.0 million of gains related to terminated interest rate
swaps from the current balance held in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss).
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
105We are also exposed to foreign currency risk on financings of certain foreign operations. Our intent is to offset
gains and losses that occur on the underlying exposers, with gains and losses on the derivative contracts hedging
these exposers. We do not enter into either interest rate protection or foreign currency rate protection agreements for
speculative purposes.
We are also exposed to fluctuations in foreign exchange rates on financial instruments which are denominated
in foreign currencies, primarily in Yen and Euro.   We use currency forward contracts, cross currency swap contracts,
and foreign currency denominated debt to manage our exposure to changes in foreign exchange rates on certain Yen
and Euro-denominated receivables and net investments.  Currency forward contracts involve fixing the Yen:USD or
Euro:USD exchange rate for delivery of a specified amount of foreign currency on a specified date. The currency
forward contracts are typically cash settled in U.S. dollars for their fair value at or close to their settlement date.
We had the following Euro:USD forward contracts designated as net investment hedges at December 31,
2021 and 2020 (in millions):
        Asset (Liability) Value as of
December 31,     December 31, 
Notional Value Maturity Date 2021 2020
€100.0 March 24, 2021 — (3.9)
€100.0 March 24, 2021 — (3.8)
€50.0 March 24, 2021 — (2.3)
€50.0 March 24, 2021 — (2.2)
€50.0 May 14, 2021 — (2.2)
€50.0 May 14, 2021 — (2.2)
€41.0 May 14, 2021 — (1.9)
€20.0 May 14, 2021 — (1.7)
€50.0 May 14, 2021 — (2.1)
€50.0 May 14, 2021 — (6.4)
€30.0 May 14, 2021 —  (2.6)
€60.0 December 20, 2021 —  (4.2)
€60.0 December 20, 2021 —  (4.1)
€30.0 December 20, 2021 —  (2.2)
€50.0 July 15, 2021 —  (0.1)
€50.0 July 15, 2021 —  (0.1)
€50.0 July 15, 2021 —  (0.1)
€61.0 September 17, 2021 —  (1.3)
€61.0 September 17, 2021 —  (1.2)
€60.0 March 15, 2022 2.8  —
€62.0 September 15, 2022 2.8  —
€44.5 September 15, 2022 (0.3)  —
€44.5 September 15, 2022 (0.4)  —
€89.0 December 16, 2022 (0.8)  —
Asset balances in the above table are included in deferred costs and other assets. Liability balances in the
above table are included in other liabilities.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
106We have designated the currency forward contracts and cross-currency swaps as net investment hedges.
Accordingly, we report the changes in fair value in other comprehensive income (loss). Changes in the value of these
forward contracts are offset by changes in the underlying hedged Euro or Yen-denominated joint venture investment.
The total accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) related to Simon’s derivative activities, including our
share of other comprehensive income (loss) from unconsolidated entities, was ($10.0) million and ($53.2) million as of
December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively. The total accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) related to the
Operating Partnership’s derivative activities, including our share of the other comprehensive income (loss) from
unconsolidated entities, was ($11.4) million and ($60.9) million as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Noncontrolling Interests
Simon
Details of the carrying amount of our noncontrolling interests are as follows as of December 31:
    2021    2020
Limited partners’  interests in the Operating Partnership $477,292 $431,784
Nonredeemable noncontrolling interests in properties, net  14,241  1,090
Total noncontrolling interests reflected in equity $491,533 $432,874
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests (which includes nonredeemable and redeemable
noncontrolling interests in consolidated properties, limited partners’ interests in the Operating Partnership, and
preferred distributions payable by the Operating Partnership on its outstanding preferred units) is a component of
consolidated net income. In addition, the individual components of other comprehensive income (loss) are presented
in the aggregate for both controlling and noncontrolling interests, with the portion attributable to noncontrolling
interests deducted from comprehensive income attributable to common stockholders.
The Operating Partnership
Our evaluation of the appropriateness of classifying the Operating Partnership’s common units of partnership
interest, or units, held by Simon and the Operating Partnership's limited partners within permanent equity considered
several significant factors. First, as a limited partnership, all decisions relating to the Operating Partnership’s
operations and distributions are made by Simon, acting as the Operating Partnership’s sole general partner. The
decisions of the general partner are made by Simon's Board of Directors or management. The Operating Partnership
has no other governance structure. Secondly, the sole asset of Simon is its interest in the Operating Partnership. As a
result, a share of common stock of Simon, or common stock, if owned by the Operating Partnership, is best
characterized as being similar to a treasury share and thus not an asset of the Operating Partnership.
Limited partners of the Operating Partnership have the right under the Operating Partnership’s partnership
agreement to exchange their units for shares of common stock or cash, as selected by Simon as the sole general
partner. Accordingly, we classify units held by limited partners in permanent equity because Simon may elect to issue
shares of common stock to limited partners exercising their exchange rights rather than using cash. Under the
Operating Partnership’s partnership agreement, the Operating Partnership is required to redeem units held by Simon
only when Simon has repurchased shares of common stock. We classify units held by Simon in permanent equity
because the decision to redeem those units would be made by Simon.
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests (which includes nonredeemable and redeemable
noncontrolling interests in consolidated properties) is a component of consolidated net income.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
107Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
Simon
The total accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) related to Simon’s currency translation adjustment
was ($175.1) million, ($136.2) million and ($160.4) million as of December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
The reclassifications out of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) consisted of the following as of
December 31:
2021 2020 2019Affected line item where
net income is presented
Currency translation adjustments
$ 5,660$ (1,739)$ —Gain (loss) on acquisition of
controlling interest, sale or
disposal of, or recovery on,
assets and interests in
unconsolidated entities
and impairment, net
(712) 219 —Net income attributable to
noncontrolling interests
$ 4,948$ (1,520) —
Accumulated derivative gains (losses),
net $ 1,625 $ 1,845 $(2,782) Interest expense
— — (10,852)Loss on extinguishment of
debt
 (204)  (232)  1,802 Net income attributable to
noncontrolling interests
$ 1,421$ 1,613$(11,832)
The Operating Partnership
The total accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) related to the Operating Partnership’s currency
translation adjustment was ($200.2) million, ($155.8) million and ($184.8) million as of December 31, 2021, 2020 and
2019, respectively.
The reclassifications out of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) consisted of the following as of
December 31:
2021 2020 2019Affected line item where
net income is presented
Currency translation adjustments
$ 5,660 $ (1,739) $ —Gain (loss) on acquisition of
controlling interest, sale or
disposal of, or recovery on,
assets and interests in
unconsolidated entities
and impairment, net
Accumulated derivative gains (losses),
net $ 1,625 $ 1,845 $(2,782)Interest expense
— — (10,852)Loss on extinguishment of
debt
$ 1,625$ 1,845$(13,634)
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
108Revenue Recognition
We, as a lessor, retain substantially all of the risks and benefits of ownership of the investment properties and
account for our leases as operating leases. We accrue fixed lease income on a straight-line basis over the terms of
the leases when we believe substantially all lease income, including the related straight-line rent receivable, is
probable of collection. Substantially all of our retail tenants are also required to pay overage rents based on sales
over a stated base amount during the lease year. We recognize this variable lease consideration only when each
tenant’s sales exceed the applicable sales threshold. We amortize any tenant inducements as a reduction of lease
income utilizing the straight-line method over the term of the related lease or occupancy term of the tenant, if shorter.
We structure our leases to allow us to recover a significant portion of our property operating, real estate taxes,
repairs and maintenance, and advertising and promotion expenses from our tenants. A substantial portion of our
leases, other than those for anchor stores, require the tenant to reimburse us for a substantial portion of our operating
expenses, including common area maintenance, or CAM, real estate taxes and insurance.  Such property operating
expenses typically include utility, insurance, security, janitorial, landscaping, food court and other administrative
expenses. This significantly reduces our exposure to increases in costs and operating expenses resulting from
inflation or otherwise. For substantially all of our leases in the U.S. mall portfolio, we receive a fixed payment from the
tenant for the CAM component which is recognized as lease income on a straight-line basis over the term of the lease
beginning with the adoption of ASC 842. When not reimbursed by the fixed CAM component, CAM expense
reimbursements are based on the tenant’s proportionate share of the allocable operating expenses and CAM capital
expenditures for the property. We accrue all variable reimbursements from tenants for recoverable portions of all of
these expenses as variable lease consideration in the period the applicable expenditures are incurred. We recognize
differences between estimated recoveries and the final billed amounts in the subsequent year. These differences
were not material in any period presented. Our advertising and promotional costs are expensed as incurred.
 Provisions for credit losses that are not probable of collection are recognized as a reduction of lease income.  
In April 2020, the FASB staff released guidance focused on treatment of concessions related to the effects of
COVID-19 on the application of lease modification guidance in Accounting Standards Codification (ASC) 842,
“Leases.” The guidance provides a practical expedient to forgo the associated reassessments required by ASC 842
when changes to a lease result in similar or lower future consideration.  We have elected to generally account for rent
abatements as negative variable lease consideration in the period granted, or in the period we determine we expect
to grant an abatement. Further abatements granted in the future will reduce lease income in the period we grant, or
determine we expect to grant, an abatement.
We have agreed to deferral or abatement arrangements with a number of our tenants as a result of the
COVID-19 pandemic. Discussions with our tenants are ongoing and may result in further rent deferrals, lease
amendments, abatements and/or lease terminations, as we deem appropriate on a case-by-case basis based on
each tenant's unique financial and operating situation. In addition, uncollected rent due from certain of our tenants is
subject to ongoing litigation, the outcome of which may affect our ability to collect in full the associated outstanding
receivable balances.
In connection with rent deferrals or other accruals of unpaid rent payments, if we determine that rent payments
are probable of collection, we will continue to recognize lease income on a straight-line basis over the lease term
along with associated tenant receivables. However, if we determine that such deferred rent payments or other
accrued but unpaid rent payments are not probable of collection, lease income will be recorded on the cash basis,
with the corresponding tenant receivable and deferred rent receivable balances charged as a direct write-off against
lease income in the period of the change in our collectability determination.  Additionally, our assessment of
collectability incorporates information regarding a tenant’s financial condition that is obtained from available financial
data, the expected outcome of contractual disputes and other matters, and our communications and negotiations with
the tenant.
When a tenant seeks to reorganize its operations through bankruptcy proceedings, we assess the collectability
of receivable balances. Our ongoing assessment incorporates, among other things, the timing of a tenant’s
bankruptcy filing and our expectations of the assumptions by the tenant in bankruptcy proceedings of leases at the
Company’s properties on substantially similar terms.  Refer to note 9 for further disclosure of lease income.  
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
109Management Fees and Other Revenues
Management fees and other revenues are generally received from our unconsolidated joint venture properties
as well as third parties. Management fee revenue is earned based on a contractual percentage of joint venture
property revenue. Development fee revenue is earned on a contractual percentage of hard costs to develop a
property. Leasing fee revenue is earned on a contractual per square foot charge based on the square footage of
current year leasing activity. We recognize revenue for these services provided when earned based on the
performance criteria.
Revenues from insurance premiums charged to unconsolidated properties are recognized on a pro-rata basis
over the terms of the policies. Insurance losses on these policies and our self-insurance for our consolidated
properties are reflected in property operating expenses in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations
and comprehensive income and include estimates for losses incurred but not reported as well as losses pending
settlement. Estimates for losses are based on evaluations by third-party actuaries and management’s estimates. Total
insurance reserves for our insurance subsidiaries and other self-insurance programs as of December 31, 2021 and
2020 approximated $77.2 million and $71.6 million, respectively, and are included in other liabilities in the
consolidated balance sheets. Information related to the securities included in the investment portfolio of our captive
insurance subsidiary is included within the “Equity Instruments and Debt Securities” section above.
Income Taxes
Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership have elected to be taxed as REITs under
Sections 856 through 860 of the Internal Revenue Code and applicable Treasury regulations relating to REIT
qualification. In order to maintain this REIT status, the regulations require the entity to distribute at least 90% of REIT
taxable income to its owners and meet certain other asset and income tests as well as other requirements. We intend
to continue to adhere to these requirements and maintain Simon’s REIT status and that of the REIT subsidiaries. As
REITs, these entities will generally not be liable for U.S. federal corporate income taxes as long as they distribute not
less than 100% of their REIT taxable income. Thus, we made no provision for U.S. federal income taxes for these
entities in the accompanying consolidated financial statements. If Simon or any of the REIT subsidiaries fail to qualify
as a REIT, and if available relief provisions do not apply, Simon or that entity will be subject to tax at regular corporate
rates for the years in which it failed to qualify. If Simon or any of the REIT subsidiaries loses its REIT status it could
not elect to be taxed as a REIT for four taxable years following the year during which qualification was lost unless the
failure to qualify was due to reasonable cause and certain other conditions were satisfied.
We have also elected taxable REIT subsidiary, or TRS, status for some of our subsidiaries. This enables us to
provide services that would otherwise be considered impermissible for REITs and participate in activities that do not
qualify as “rents from real property”. For these entities, deferred tax assets and liabilities are established for
temporary differences between the financial reporting basis and the tax basis of assets and liabilities at the enacted
tax rates expected to be in effect when the temporary differences reverse. A valuation allowance for deferred tax
assets is provided if we believe all or some portion of the deferred tax asset may not be realized. An increase or
decrease in the valuation allowance that results from the change in circumstances that causes a change in our
judgment about the realizability of the related deferred tax asset is included in income.
As a partnership, the allocated share of the Operating Partnership’s income or loss for each year is included in
the income tax returns of the partners; accordingly, no accounting for income taxes is required in the accompanying
consolidated financial statements other than as discussed above for our TRSs.
As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, we had net deferred tax liabilities of $259.3 million and $251.1 million,
respectively, which primarily relate to the temporary differences between the carrying value of balance sheet assets
and liabilities and their tax bases. These differences were primarily created through the consolidation of various
European assets in 2016. Additionally, we have deferred tax related to our TRSs, consisting of operating losses and
other carryforwards for U.S. federal income tax purposes as well as the timing of the deductibility of losses or
reserves from insurance subsidiaries, though these amounts are not material to the financial statements. The
deferred tax asset in
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
110included in deferred costs and other assets and the deferred tax liability is included in other liabilities in the
accompanying consolidated balance sheets.  
We are also subject to certain other taxes, including state and local taxes, franchise taxes, as well as income-
based and withholding taxes on dividends from certain of our international investments, which are included in income
and other taxes in the consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.  
Our cash paid for taxes in each period was as follows:
For the Year Ended December 31, 
    2021     2020     2019
Cash paid for taxes $ 102,454 $ 20,046 $ 21,626
Corporate Expenses
Home and regional office costs primarily include compensation and personnel related costs, travel, building
and office costs, and other expenses for our corporate home office and regional offices.  General and administrative
expense primarily includes executive compensation, benefits and travel expenses as well as costs of being a public
company, including certain legal costs, audit fees, regulatory fees, and certain other professional fees.
Simon Property Group Acquisition Holdings, Inc.
The Company sponsored, through a wholly-owned subsidiary, a special purpose acquisition corporation, or
SPAC, named Simon Property Group Acquisition Holdings, Inc.  On February 18, 2021, the SPAC announced the
pricing of its initial public offering, which was consummated on February 23, 2021, generating gross proceeds of
$345.0 million, which have been placed in a trust account and is included in the accompanying consolidated balance
sheet in Investments held in trust – special purpose acquisition company.  The SPAC is a consolidated VIE which was
formed for the purpose of effecting a business combination.  The Company accounts for the noncontrolling interest in
the SPAC as noncontrolling redeemable interests as these instruments are redeemable at the option of the holder
and are classified as temporary equity at their redemption value in Simon’s accompanying consolidated balance
sheet in Limited partners preferred interest in the Operating Partnership and noncontrolling redeemable interests and
in the Operating Partnership’s accompanying consolidated balance sheet in Preferred units, various series, at
liquidation value, and noncontrolling redeemable interests.
New Accounting Pronouncements
In March 2020, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) issued Accounting Standards Update (ASU)
2020-04, “Reference Rate Reform,” which provides temporary optional expedients and exceptions to the US GAAP
guidance on contract modifications and hedge accounting to ease the financial reporting burdens of the expected
market transition from LIBOR and other interbank offered rates to alternative reference rates. Additional optional
expedients, exceptions, and clarifications were created in ASU 2021-01. The guidance is effective upon issuance and
generally can be applied to any contract modifications or existing and new hedging relationships through December
31, 2022. We elected the expedients in conjunction with transitioning certain debt instruments, as discussed in note 7,
to alternative benchmark indexes.  There was no impact on our consolidated financial statements at adoption.
4. Real Estate Acquisitions and Dispositions
We acquire interests in properties to generate both current income and long-term appreciation in value. We
acquire interests in individual properties or portfolios of real estate companies that meet our investment criteria and
sell properties which no longer meet our strategic criteria. Unless otherwise noted below, gains and losses on these
transactions are included in gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities
and impairment, net in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income. We
capitalize asset acquisition costs and expense costs related to business combinations, as well as disposition related
costs as they are incurred. We
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
111incurred a minimal amount of transaction expenses during 2021, 2020, and 2019. Refer to Note 6 for disclosure of
unconsolidated joint venture acquisitions and dispositions.
Our acquisition and disposition activity for the periods presented are as follows:
2019 Acquisitions
On September 19, 2019, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in a hotel adjacent to one of our properties
for cash consideration of $12.8 million. As of closing, the property was subject to a $21.5 million, 4.02% variable rate
mortgage. We accounted for this transaction as an asset acquisition and substantially all our investment relates to
investment property.
2021 Dispositions
During 2021, we recorded net gains of $176.8 million primarily related to disposition activity which included the
foreclosure of three consolidated retail properties in satisfaction of their respective $180.0 million, $120.9 million and
$100.0 million non-recourse mortgage loans.
2020 Dispositions
On October 1, 2020, we disposed of our interest in one consolidated retail property. A portion of the gross
proceeds on this transaction of $33.4 million was used to partially repay a cross-collateralized mortgage. Our share of
the $12.3 million gain is included in (loss) gain on sale or disposed of, or recovery on, assets and interests in
unconsolidated entities and impairment, net in the accompanying consolidated statement of operation and
comprehensive income.
2019 Dispositions
During 2019, we disposed of our interests in one multi-family residential investment. Our share of the gross
proceeds on this transaction was $17.9 million. Our share of the gain of $16.2 million is included in other income in
the accompanying consolidated statement of operation and comprehensive income.  
5. Per Share and Per Unit Data
We determine basic earnings per share and basic earnings per unit based on the weighted average number of
shares of common stock or units, as applicable, outstanding during the period and we consider any participating
securities for purposes of applying the two-class method. We determine diluted earnings per share and diluted
earnings per unit based on the weighted average number of shares of common stock or units, as applicable,
outstanding combined with the incremental weighted average number of shares or units, as applicable, that would
have been outstanding assuming all potentially dilutive securities were converted into shares of common stock or
units, as applicable, at the earliest date possible. The following tables set forth the components of basic and diluted
earnings per share and basic and diluted earnings per unit.
Simon
For the Year Ended December 31,  
    2021 2020 2019  
Net Income attributable to Common
Stockholders — Basic and Diluted  $2,246,294     $1,109,227     $2,098,247
Weighted Average Shares Outstanding —
Basic and Diluted  328,587,137  308,737,625  307,950,112
For the year ended December 31, 2021, potentially dilutive securities include units that are exchangeable for
common stock and long-term incentive performance units, or LTIP units, granted under our long-term incentive
performance programs that are convertible into units and exchangeable for common stock. No securities had a
material dilutive effect for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019. We have not adjusted net income
attributable to
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
112common stockholders and weighted average shares outstanding for income allocable to limited partners or units,
respectively, as doing so would have no dilutive impact. We accrue dividends when they are declared. On February 7,
2022, Simon’s Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend for the first quarter of 2022 of $1.65 per share,
payable on March 31, 2022 to shareholders of record on March 10, 2022.  
The Operating Partnership
For the Year Ended December 31, 
    2021 2020 2019
Net Income attributable to Unitholders —
Basic and Diluted  $2,569,508    $1,276,450     $2,416,945
Weighted Average Units Outstanding —
Basic and Diluted  375,866,759  355,281,882  354,724,019
For the year ended December 31, 2021, potentially dilutive securities include LTIP units. No securities had a
material dilutive effect for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019. We accrue distributions when they
are declared. On February 7, 2022, Simon’s Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash distribution for the first
quarter of 2022 of $1.65 per unit, payable on March 31, 2022 to unitholders of record on March 10, 2022.
The taxable nature of the dividends declared and Operating Partnership distributions declared for each of the
years ended as indicated is summarized as follows:
For the Year Ended December 31,  
    2021    2020    2019 
Total dividends/distributions paid per common share/unit     $5.85     $6.00     $8.30
Percent taxable as ordinary income  93.10 %   97.40 %   100.00 %
Percent taxable as long-term capital gains  6.90 %   2.60 %   0.00 %
 100.00 %   100.00 %   100.00 %
6. Investments in Unconsolidated Entities and International Investments
Real Estate Joint Ventures and Investments
Joint ventures are common in the real estate industry. We use joint ventures to finance properties, develop
new properties and diversify our risk in a particular property or portfolio of properties.  As discussed in Note 2, we held
joint venture interests in 84 properties as of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020.
Certain of our joint venture properties are subject to various rights of first refusal, buy-sell provisions, put and
call rights, or other sale or marketing rights for partners which are customary in real estate joint venture agreements
and the industry. We and our partners in these joint ventures may initiate these provisions (subject to any applicable
lock up or similar restrictions), which may result in either the sale of our interest or the use of available cash or
borrowings, or the use of limited partnership interests in the Operating Partnership, to acquire the joint venture
interest from our partner.
We may provide financing to joint ventures primarily in the form of interest bearing construction loans. As of
December 31, 2021 and 2020, we had construction loans and other advances to these related parties totaling
$88.4 million, which are included in deferred costs and other assets in the accompanying consolidated balance
sheets.
Unconsolidated Entity Transactions
On July 1, 2021, we contributed to ABG all of our interests in both the Forever 21 and Brooks Brothers
licensing ventures in exchange for additional interests in ABG. As a result, in the third quarter of 2021, we recognized
a non-cash
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
113pre-tax gain of $159.8 million, which is included in gain on sale or exchange of equity interests in the consolidated
statement of operations, representing the difference between the fair value of the interests received determined using
Level 3 inputs and the carrying value of the licensing ventures less costs to sell. In connection with this transaction,
we recorded deferred tax expense of $47.9 million which is included in income and other tax (expense) benefit in the
consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income. On December 20, 2021, we sold a portion of our
interest in ABG, resulting in a pre-tax gain of $18.8 million, which is included in gain on sale or exchange of equity
interests in the consolidated statement of operations. In connection with this transaction, we recorded tax expense of
$8.0 million which is included in income and other tax (expense) benefit in the consolidated statements of operations
and comprehensive income. Subsequently, we acquired additional interests in ABG for cash consideration of $100.0
million. At December 31, 2021, our interest in ABG was approximately 10.4%.
During the fourth quarter of 2021, we disposed of our interest in an unconsolidated property resulting in a gain
of $3.4 million which is included in (gain) loss on acquisition of controlling interest, sale or disposal of, or recovery on,
assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net in the consolidated statements of operations and
comprehensive income. Our share of the proceeds from this transaction was $3.0 million.
On June 1, 2021, we and our partner, ABG, acquired the intellectual property of Eddie Bauer. Our non-
controlling interest in the licensing venture is 49% and was acquired for cash consideration of $100.8 million.
During the second quarter of 2021, we sold our interest in one multi-family residential investment. Our share of
the gross proceeds from this transaction was $27.1 million. The gain of $14.9 million on the sale is included in other
income in the accompanying consolidated statement of operations and comprehensive income.
On December 29, 2020, we completed the acquisition of an 80% noncontrolling ownership interest in TRG,
which has an interest in 24 regional, super-regional, and outlet malls in the U.S. and Asia. Under the terms of the
transaction, we, through the Operating Partnership, acquired all of Taubman Centers, Inc., or Taubman, common
stock for $43.00 per share in cash. Total consideration for the acquisition, including the redemption of Taubman’s
$192.5 million 6.5% Series J Cumulative Preferred Shares and its $170.0 million 6.25% Series K Cumulative
Preferred Shares, and the issuance of 955,705 Operating Partnership units, was approximately $3.5 billion.  Our
investment includes the 6.38% Series A Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units for $362.5 million issued to us. Our
share of net (loss) income was ($118.1 million) for the year ended December 31, 2021, which includes amortization of
our excess investment of $196.1 million. In connection with the finalization of the purchase price allocation, we
recorded additional amortization of our excess investment of $52.4 million in the fourth quarter of 2021 as a revision
to the preliminary amortization previously recorded.  Substantially all of our investment has been allocated to
investment property based upon fair values determined at the acquisition date using Level 2 and 3 inputs.  TRG’s
total assets, total liabilities, and noncontrolling interests were $4.0 billion, $4.8 billion, and $155.9 million, respectively,
as of December 31, 2021 and $4.1 billion, $5.0 billion and $154.0 million, respectively, as of December 31, 2020.
 TRG’s total revenue, operating income before other items and consolidated net income were approximately $586.7
million, $196.5 million, and $96.8 million, respectively, for the year ended December 31, 2021, before consideration of
the amortization of our excess investment.
On December 7, 2020, we and a group of co-investors acquired certain assets and liabilities of J.C. Penney, a
department store retailer, out of bankruptcy. Our non-controlling interest in the venture is 41.67% and was acquired
for cash consideration of $125.0 million.
In the third quarter of 2020, we recorded an other-than-temporary impairment charge of $55.2 million,
representing our equity method investment balance in three joint venture properties, which is included in (loss) gain
on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net, in the
accompanying consolidated statement of operations and comprehensive income. Additionally, in the third quarter of
2020 and in the fourth quarter of 2019, we recorded an other-than-temporary impairment charge of $36.1 million and
$47.2 million, respectively, related to an investment, which is included in gain (loss) on acquisition of controlling
interest, sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net, in the
accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
114On February 19, 2020, we and a group of co-investors acquired certain assets and liabilities of Forever 21, a
retailer of apparel and accessories, out of bankruptcy. The interests were acquired through two separate joint
ventures, a licensing venture and an operating venture. Our aggregate investment in the ventures was $67.6 million.
In connection with the acquisition of our interest, the Forever 21 joint venture recorded a non-cash bargain purchase
gain in the second quarter of 2020, of which our share of $35.0 million pre-tax is included in income from
unconsolidated entities in the consolidated statement of operations and comprehensive income. In the first quarter of
2021, we and our partner, ABG, each acquired additional 12.5% interests in the licensing and operations of Forever
21, our share of which was $56.3 million, bringing our respective interests to 50%. Subsequently, the Forever 21
operations were merged into SPARC Group.
On October 16, 2019, we contributed approximately $276.8 million consisting of cash and the Shop Premium
Outlets, or SPO, assets for a 45% noncontrolling interest in RGG to create a new multi-platform venture dedicated to
digital value shopping.  We attributed substantially all of our investment to goodwill and certain amortizing and non-
amortizing intangibles.
On September 19, 2019, as discussed in note 4, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in a hotel adjacent to
one of our properties from our joint venture partner. As a result of this acquisition, we now own 100% of this property.
During the first quarter of 2019, we disposed of our interests in a multi-family residential investment. Our share
of the gross proceeds was $17.9 million. The gain of $16.2 million is included in other income in the accompanying
consolidated statement of operations and comprehensive income.
In 2016, we and a group of co-investors acquired certain assets and liabilities of Aéropostale, a retailer of
apparel and accessories, out of bankruptcy and subsequently renamed SPARC Group.  The interests were acquired
through two separate joint ventures, a licensing venture and an operating venture.  In April 2018, we contributed our
entire interest in the licensing venture in exchange for additional interests in ABG, a brand development, marketing,
and entertainment company.  In January 2020, we acquired additional interests of 5.05% and 1.37% in SPARC Group
and ABG, respectively, for $6.7 million and $33.5 million, respectively. During the third quarter of 2020, SPARC
acquired certain assets and operations of Brooks Brothers and Lucky Brands out of bankruptcy. During the second
quarter of 2021, SPARC Group acquired certain assets and operations of Eddie Bauer. At December 31, 2021, our
noncontrolling equity method interests in the operations venture of SPARC Group was 50.0%.
International Investments
We conduct our international operations primarily through joint venture arrangements and account for the
majority of these international joint venture investments using the equity method of accounting.
European Investments  
At December 31, 2021, we owned 63,924,148 shares, or approximately 22.4%, of Klépierre, which had a
quoted market price of $23.65 per share. Our share of net income, net of amortization of our excess investment, was
$145.1 million, $26.5 million and $145.2 million for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Based on applicable Euro:USD exchange rates and after our conversion of Klépierre’s results to GAAP, Klépierre’s
total assets, total liabilities, and noncontrolling interests were $18.1 billion, $11.9 billion, and $1.3 billion, respectively,
as of December 31, 2021 and $20.9 billion, $14.4 billion, and $1.4 billion, respectively, as of December 31, 2020.
Klépierre’s total revenues, operating income before other items and consolidated net income were approximately
$1.2 billion, $380.5 million and $848.1 million, respectively, for the year ended December 31, 2021, $1.3 billion,
$327.3 million and $211.2 million, respectively, for the year ended December 31, 2020, and $1.5 billion, $626.3 million
and $655.5 million, respectively, for the year ended December 31, 2019, before consolidation of the amortization of
our excess investment.
During the year ended December 31, 2021, Klépierre elected to step-up the tax basis of certain assets in Italy,
which triggered a one-time payment at a significantly reduced tax rate. As a result of the step-up in tax basis, a
previously established deferred tax liability was reversed resulting in a non-cash gain, of which our share was $118.4
million.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
115During the year ended December 31, 2021, we recorded a net gain of $1.2 million related to the disposition of
certain assets of Klépierre. During the year ended December 31, 2020, we recorded a $4.3 million net loss related to
the impairment and disposition of certain assets of Klépierre. During the year ended December 31, 2019, we recorded
a gain of $58.6 million related to the disposition of certain assets of Klépierre. These transactions are included in gain
(loss) on acquisition of controlling interest, sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated
entities and impairment, net in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.
We have an interest in a European investee that had interests in 11 Designer Outlet properties as of
December 31, 2021, ten Designer Outlet properties as of December 31, 2020, and nine Designer Outlet properties as
of December 31, 2019. Seven of which are consolidated by us as of December 31, 2021. As of December 31, 2021,
our legal percentage ownership interests in these properties ranged from 23% to 94%. Due to certain redemption
rights held by our venture partner, which will require us to purchase their interests under certain circumstances, the
noncontrolling interest is presented (i) in the accompanying Simon consolidated balance sheets outside of equity in
limited partners’ preferred interest in the Operating Partnership and noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties
and (ii) in the accompanying Operating Partnership consolidated balance sheets within preferred units, various series,
at liquidation value, and noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties.
On January 1, 2021 our European investee gained control of Ochtrup Designer Outlets as a result of the
expiration of certain participating rights held by a venture partner. This resulted in the consolidation of the property,
requiring a remeasurement of our previously held equity interest to fair value and the recognition of a non-cash gain
of $3.7 million in earnings during the first quarter of 2021, which includes amounts reclassified from accumulated
other comprehensive income (loss) related to the currency translation adjustment previously recorded on our
investment. The gain is included in gain (loss) on acquisition of controlling interest, sale or disposal of, or recovery on,
assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net in the accompanying consolidated statements of
operations and comprehensive income. The determination of the fair value consisted of Level 2 and 3 inputs and was
predominately allocated to investment property.
In addition, we have a 50.0% noncontrolling interest in a European property management and development
company that provides services to the Designer Outlet properties.
We also have minority interests in Value Retail PLC and affiliated entities, which own or have interests in and
operate nine luxury outlets located throughout Europe and we also have a direct minority ownership in three of those
outlets. At December 31, 2021 and 2020, the carrying value of these equity instruments without readily determinable
fair values was $140.8 million and is included in deferred costs and other assets.
Asian Joint Ventures  
We conduct our international Premium Outlet operations in Japan through a joint venture with Mitsubishi
Estate Co., Ltd. We have a 40%noncontrolling ownership interest in this joint venture. The carrying amount of our
investment in this joint venture was $206.1 million and $216.8 million as of December 31, 2021 and 2020,
respectively, including all related components of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss). We conduct our
international Premium Outlet operations in South Korea through a joint venture with Shinsegae International Co. We
have a 50% noncontrolling ownership interest in this joint venture. The carrying amount of our investment in this joint
venture was $194.9 million and $184.7 million as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively, including all related
components of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss).
Summary Financial Information
A summary of the combined balance sheets and statements of operations of our equity method investments
and share of income from such investments, excluding our investments in Klépierre and TRG, as well as our other
platform investments.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
116COMBINED BALANCE SHEETS
    December 31,     December 31,  
2021 2020  
Assets:
Investment properties, at cost $19,724,242 $20,079,476
Less - accumulated depreciation  8,330,891  8,003,863
 11,393,351  12,075,613
Cash and cash equivalents  1,481,287  1,169,422
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net  591,369  749,231
Right-of-use assets, net 154,561 185,598
Deferred costs and other assets  394,691  380,087
Total assets $14,015,259 $14,559,951
Liabilities and Partners’  Deficit:
Mortgages $15,223,710 $15,569,485
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, and deferred revenue  995,392  969,242
Lease liabilities 158,372 188,863
Other liabilities  383,018  426,321
Total liabilities  16,760,492  17,153,911
Preferred units  67,450  67,450
Partners’  deficit  (2,812,683 ) (2,661,410 )
Total liabilities and partners’  deficit $14,015,259 $14,559,951
Our Share of:
Partners’  deficit $(1,207,396 )$(1,130,713 )
Add: Excess Investment  1,283,645  1,399,757
Our net Investment in unconsolidated entities, at equity $ 76,249 $269,044
“Excess Investment” represents the unamortized difference of our investment over our share of the equity in
the underlying net assets of the joint ventures or other investments acquired and has been determined to relate to the
fair value of the investment properties, intangible assets, including goodwill, and debt premiums and discounts. We
amortize excess investment over the life of the related depreciable components of assets acquired, typically no
greater than 40 years, the terms of the applicable leases, the estimated useful lives of the finite lived intangibles, and
the applicable debt maturity, respectively. The amortization is included in the reported amount of income from
unconsolidated entities.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
117As of December 31, 2021, scheduled principal repayments on these joint venture properties’ mortgage
indebtedness, assuming the obligations remain outstanding through the initial maturities, are as follows:
2022 $2,111,105
2023  1,515,170
2024  2,851,788
2025  1,755,169
2026  3,032,175
Thereafter  3,995,886
Total principal maturities  15,261,293
Debt issuance costs (37,583 )
Total mortgages $15,223,710
This debt becomes due in installments over various terms extending through 2035 with interest rates ranging
from 0.16% to 9.98% and a weighted average interest rate of 3.60% at December 31, 2021.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
118COMBINED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
 
December 31, 
    2021     2020     2019  
REVENUE:                 
Lease income $2,797,221 $2,544,134 $3,088,594
Other income  319,956  300,634  322,398
Total revenue  3,117,177  2,844,768  3,410,992
OPERA TING EXPENSES:
Property operating  575,584  519,979  587,062
Depreciation and amortization  686,790  692,424  681,764
Real estate taxes  263,325  262,351  266,013
Repairs and maintenance  79,300  68,722  85,430
Advertising and promotion  72,441  67,434  89,660
Other  200,899  163,710  196,178
Total operating expenses  1,878,339  1,774,620  1,906,107
Operating Income Before Other Items  1,238,838  1,070,148  1,504,885
Interest expense  (605,591 ) (616,332 ) (636,988 )
Gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests
in unconsolidated entities, net 34,814 — 24,609
Net Income $668,061 $453,816 $892,506
Third-Party Investors’  Share of Net Income $333,304 $226,364 $460,696
Our Share of Net Income $334,757 $227,452 $431,810
Amortization of Excess Investment  (64,974 ) (82,097 ) (83,556 )
Our Share of Gain on Sale or Disposal of Assets and
Interests in Other Income in the Consolidated Financial
Statements (14,941 ) — (9,156 )
Our Share of Gain on Sale or Disposal of, or Recovery on,
Assets and Interests in Unconsolidated Entities, net  (541) —  (1,133 )
Income from Unconsolidated Entities $254,301 $145,355 $337,965
Our share of income from unconsolidated entities in the above table, aggregated with our share of results from
our investments in Klépierre and TRG, as well as our other platform investments, is presented in income from
unconsolidated entities in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.
 Unless otherwise noted, our share of the gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in
unconsolidated entities, net is reflected within gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in
unconsolidated entities and impairment, net in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and
comprehensive income.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
1197. Indebtedness
Our mortgages and unsecured indebtedness, excluding the impact of derivative instruments, consist of the
following as of December 31:
2021 2020  
Fixed-Rate Debt:
Mortgage notes, including $ 2,892  and $ 3,348  of net premiums and $ 14,619
and $ 15,237  of debt issuance costs, respectively . Weighted average interest
and maturity of 3.61% and 4.3 years at December 31, 2021. $4,546,614 $5,803,718
Unsecured notes, including $ 30,964  and $ 22,470  of net discounts and $ 83,147
and $ 74,622  of debt issuance costs, respectively . Weighted average interest
and maturity of 2.93% and 9.6 years at December 31, 2021.  18,254,507  16,985,990
Commercial Paper (see below) 500,000 623,020
Total Fixed-Rate Debt  23,301,121  23,412,728
Variable-Rate Debt:
Mortgage notes, including $ 4,354  and $ 7,102  of debt issuance costs,
respectively . Weighted average interest and maturity of 1.70% and 1.6 years
at December 31, 2021.  803,495  1,137,034
Credit Facilities (see below), including $22,039  and $16,171  of debt issuance
costs, respectively .  1,152,961  2,108,829
Total V ariable-Rate Debt  1,956,456  3,245,863
Other Debt Obligations  63,445  64,770
Total Mortgages and Unsecured Indebtedness $25,321,022 $26,723,361
General.  Our unsecured debt agreements contain financial covenants and other non-financial covenants. If
we were to fail to comply with these covenants, after the expiration of the applicable cure periods, the debt maturity
could be accelerated or other remedies could be sought by the lender, including adjustments to the applicable interest
rate. As of December 31, 2021, we were in compliance with all covenants of our unsecured debt.
At December 31, 2021, our consolidated subsidiaries were the borrowers under 36 non-recourse mortgage
notes secured by mortgages on 39 properties and other assets, including two separate pools of cross-defaulted and
cross-collateralized mortgages encumbering a total of five properties. Under these cross-default provisions, a default
under any mortgage included in the cross-defaulted pool may constitute a default under all mortgages within that pool
and may lead to acceleration of the indebtedness due on each property within the pool. Certain of our secured debt
instruments contain financial and other non-financial covenants which are specific to the properties that serve as
collateral for that debt. If the applicable borrower under these non-recourse mortgage notes were to fail to comply with
these covenants, the lender could accelerate the debt and enforce its rights against their collateral. At December 31,
2021, the applicable borrowers under these non-recourse mortgage notes were in compliance with all covenants
where non-compliance could individually or in the aggregate, giving effect to applicable cross-default provisions, have
a material adverse effect on our financial condition, liquidity or results of operations.
Unsecured Debt
At December 31, 2021, our unsecured debt consisted of $18.4 billion of senior unsecured notes of the
Operating Partnership, $125.0 million outstanding under the Operating Partnership’s $4.0 billion unsecured revolving
credit facility, or Credit Facility, $1.05 billion outstanding under the Operating Partnership’s $3.5 billion unsecured
revolving credit facility, or Supplemental Facility, and $500.0 million outstanding under the Operating Partnership’s
global unsecured commercial paper program, or Commercial Paper program.  
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
120The Credit Facility also included an additional single, delayed-draw $2.0 billion term loan facility, or Term
Facility, or together with the Credit Facility and the Supplemental Facility, the Credit Facilities, which the Operating
Partnership drew on December 15, 2020, and repaid in 2021.
In November 2021, we amended our Credit Facility to transition the borrowing rates from LIBOR to successor
benchmark indexes. The Credit Facility can be increased in the form of additional commitments in an aggregate not to
exceed $1.0 billion, for a total aggregate size of $5.0 billion, subject to obtaining additional lender commitments and
satisfying certain customary conditions precedent.  Borrowings may be denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro, Yen,
Pounds, Sterling, Canadian dollars and Australian dollars. Borrowings in currencies other than the U.S. dollar are
limited to 95% of the maximum revolving credit amount, as defined. The initial maturity date of the Credit Facility is
June 30, 2024. The Credit Facility can be extended for two additional six-month periods to June 30, 2025, at our sole
option, subject to satisfying certain customary conditions precedent.
Borrowings under the Credit Facility bear interest, at our election, at either (i) (x) for Term Benchmark Loans,
the Adjusted Term SOFR Rate, the applicable Local Rate, the Adjusted EURIBOR Rate, or the Adjusted TIBOR Rate,
(y) for RFR Loans, if denominated in Sterling, SONIA plus a benchmark adjustment and if denominated in Dollars,
Daily Simple SOFR plus a benchmark adjustment, or (z) for Daily SOFR Loans, the Adjusted Floating Overnight Daily
SOFR Rate, in each case of clauses (x) through (z) above, plus a margin determined by our corporate credit rating of
between 0.650% and 1.400% or (ii) for loans denominated in U.S. Dollars only, the base rate (which rate is equal to
the greatest of the prime rate, the federal funds effective rate plus 0.500% or Adjusted Term SOFR Rate for one
month plus 1.000%) (the “Base Rate”), plus a margin determined by our corporate credit rating of between 0.000%
and 0.400%. The Credit Facility includes a facility fee determined by our corporate credit rating of between 0.100%
and 0.300% on the aggregate revolving commitments under the Credit Facility.  Based upon our current credit ratings,
the interest rate on the Credit Facility is SOFR plus 72.5 basis points, plus a spread adjustment to account for the
transition from LIBOR to SOFR.
In October 2021, we amended, restated, and extended the Supplemental Facility. The Supplemental Facility’s
initial borrowing capacity of $3.5 billion may be increased to $4.5 billion during its term and provides for borrowings
denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro, Yen, Pounds, Sterling, Canadian dollars and Australian dollars. Borrowings in
currencies other than the U.S. dollar are limited to 100% of the maximum revolving credit amount, as defined. The
initial maturity date of the Supplemental Facility is January 31, 2026 and can be extended for an additional year to
January 31, 2027 at our sole option, subject to satisfying certain customary conditions precedent.
Borrowings under the Supplemental Facility bear interest, at our election, at either (i) (x) for Term Benchmark
Loans, the Adjusted Term SOFR Rate, the applicable Local Rate, the Adjusted EURIBOR Rate, or the Adjusted
TIBOR Rate, (y) for RFR Loans, if denominated in Sterling, SONIA plus a benchmark adjustment and if denominated
in Dollars, Daily Simple SOFR plus a benchmark adjustment, or (z) for Daily SOFR Loans, the Adjusted Floating
Overnight Daily SOFR Rate, in each case of clauses (x) through (z) above, plus a margin determined by our
corporate credit rating of between 0.650% and 1.400% or (ii) for loans denominated in U.S. Dollars only, the base rate
(which rate is equal to the greatest of the prime rate, the federal funds effective rate plus 0.500% or Adjusted Term
SOFR Rate for one month plus 1.000%) (the “Base Rate”), plus a margin determined by our corporate credit rating of
between 0.000% and 0.400%. The Supplemental Facility includes a facility fee determined by our corporate credit
rating of between 0.100% and 0.300% on the aggregate revolving commitments under the Supplemental Facility.
 Based upon our current credit ratings, the interest rate on the Supplemental Facility is SOFR plus 72.5 basis points,
plus a spread adjustment to account for the transition from LIBOR to SOFR.
On December 31, 2021, we had an aggregate available borrowing capacity of $5.8 billion under the Facilities.
The maximum aggregate outstanding balance under the Facilities during the year ended December 31, 2021 was
$2.1 billion and the weighted average outstanding balance was $519.9 million. Letters of credit of $11.8 million were
outstanding under the Facilities as of December 31, 2021.
The Operating Partnership also has available a Commercial Paper program of $2.0 billion, or the non-U.S.
dollar equivalent thereof. The Operating Partnership may issue unsecured commercial paper notes, denominated in
U.S. dollars, Euro and other currencies. Notes issued in non-U.S. currencies may be issued by one or more
subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership and are guaranteed by the Operating Partnership. Notes will be sold under
customary terms in the U.S. and
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
121Euro commercial paper note markets and rank (either by themselves or as a result of the guarantee described above)
pari passu with the Operating Partnership's other unsecured senior indebtedness.  The Commercial Paper program is
supported by the Credit Facilities, and if necessary or appropriate, we may make one or more draws under either of
the Credit Facilities to pay amounts outstanding from time to time on the Commercial Paper program. On December
31, 2021, we had $500.0 million outstanding under the Commercial Paper program, fully comprised of U.S. dollar
denominated notes with a weighted average interest rate of 0.22%.  These borrowings have a weighted average
maturity date of January 23, 2022 and reduce amounts otherwise available under the Credit Facilities.
On July 9, 2020, the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of the following senior unsecured notes:
$500.0 million with a fixed interest rate of 3.50%, $750 million with a fixed interest rate of 2.650%, and $750 million
with a fixed interest rate of 3.80%, with maturity dates of September 2025 (the “2025” Notes”), June 2030, and June
2050, respectively. The 2025 Notes were issued as additional notes under an indenture pursuant to which the
Operating Partnership previously issued $600 million principal amount of 3.50% senior notes due September 2025 on
August 17, 2015. Proceeds from the unsecured notes offering funded the optional redemption at par of senior
unsecured notes in July and August 2020, as discussed below, and repaid a portion of the indebtedness under the
Facilities.
On July 10, 2020 the Operating Partnership repaid $1.75 billion under the Credit Facility and $750.0 million
under the Supplemental Facility.
On July 22, 2020, the Operating Partnership completed the optional redemption at par of its $500 million
2.50% notes due September 1, 2020.
On August 6, 2020 the Operating Partnership completed the optional redemption at par of its €375 million
2.375% notes due October 2, 2020.
On January 21, 2021 the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of the following senior unsecured
notes: $800 million with a fixed interest rate of 1.750%, and $700 million with a fixed interest rate of 2.20%, with
maturity dates of February 2028 and 2031, respectively.
On January 27, 2021 the Operating Partnership completed the planned optional redemption of its $550 million
2.50% notes due on July 15, 2021, including the make-whole amount. Further, on February 2, 2021 the Operating
Partnership repaid $750 million under the Term Facility.
On March 19, 2021, the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of €750 million ($893.0 million U.S.
dollar equivalent as of the issuance date) of senior unsecured notes at a fixed rate of 1.125% with a maturity date of
March 19, 2033, the proceeds of which were used on March 23, 2021 to repay the remaining $1.25 billion under the
Term Facility reducing it to zero.
On August 18, 2021, the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of the following senior unsecured
notes: $550 million with a fixed interest rate of 1.375%, and $700 million with a fixed interest rate of 2.250%, with
maturity dates of January 15, 2027, and 2032, respectively.
In the third quarter of 2021, the Operating Partnership completed the optional redemption of all of its
outstanding $550 million 2.350% notes due on January 30, 2022, $600 million 2.625% notes due on June 15, 2022,
and $500 million 2.750% notes due on February 1, 2023. We recorded a $28.6 million loss on extinguishment of debt
as a result on the optional redemptions.
On December 14, 2021, the Operating Partnership drew $1.05 billion under the Supplemental Facility, the
proceeds of which funded the early extinguishment of 9 mortgages with a principal balance of $1.16 billion. We
recorded a $20.3 million loss on extinguishment of debt as a result of this transaction.
On January 11, 2022, the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of the following senior unsecured
notes: $500 million with a floating interest rate of SOFR plus 43 basis points, and $700 million with a fixed interest
rate of 2.650%, with maturity dates of January 11, 2024 and February 1, 2032, respectively. The proceeds were used
to repay $1.05 billion outstanding under the Supplemental Facility on January 12, 2022.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
122Mortgage Debt
Total mortgage indebtedness was $5.4 billion and $7.0 billion at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Debt Maturity and Other
Our scheduled principal repayments on indebtedness as of December 31, 2021, assuming the obligations
remain outstanding through the initial maturities, are as follows:
2022 $1,898,889 (1)
2023  1,230,712
2024  2,828,818
2025  2,669,547
2026  3,920,142
Thereafter  12,861,700
Total principal maturities  25,409,808
Net unamortized debt premium  28,055
Net unamortized debt discount (56,127 )
Debt issuance costs, net  (124,159 )
Other Debt Obligations 63,445
Total mortgages and unsecured indebtedness $25,321,022
(1) Includes $500.0 million in Global Commercial Paper.
Our cash paid for interest in each period, net of any amounts capitalized, was as follows:
For the Year Ended December 31,  
    2021    2020     2019  
Cash paid for interest $822,182 $754,306 $803,728
Debt Issuance Costs
Our debt issuance costs consist primarily of financing fees we incurred in order to obtain long-term financing.
We record amortization of debt issuance costs on a straight-line basis over the terms of the respective loans or
agreements. Details of those debt issuance costs as of December 31 are as follows:
   2021 2020
Debt issuance costs $227,774 $202,859
Accumulated amortization (103,615 ) (89,727 )
Debt issuance costs, net $124,159 $113,132
We report amortization of debt issuance costs, amortization of premiums, and accretion of discounts as part of
interest expense. We amortize debt premiums and discounts, which are included in mortgages and unsecured
indebtedness, over the remaining terms of the related debt instruments. These debt premiums or discounts arise
either at
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
123the time of the debt issuance or as part of purchase accounting for the fair value of debt assumed in acquisitions. The
accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income include amortization as follows:
For the Year Ended December 31,
    2021    2020    2019
Amortization of debt issuance costs $24,794 $23,076 $21,499
Amortization of debt discounts/(premiums) 168 174 1,571
Fair Value of Debt
The carrying value of our variable-rate mortgages and other loans approximates their fair values. We estimate
the fair values of consolidated fixed-rate mortgages using cash flows discounted at current borrowing rates and other
indebtedness using cash flows discounted at current market rates. We estimate the fair values of consolidated fixed-
rate unsecured notes using quoted market prices, or, if no quoted market prices are available, we use quoted market
prices for securities with similar terms and maturities. The book value of our consolidated fixed-rate mortgages and
unsecured indebtedness including commercial paper was $23.3 billion and $23.4 billion as of December 31, 2021 and
2020, respectively. The fair values of these financial instruments and the related discount rate assumptions as of
December 31 are summarized as follows:
December 31, December 31, 
    2021     2020  
Fair value of consolidated fixed rate mortgages and
unsecured indebtedness (in millions)     $ 24,597 $ 25,327     
Weighted average discount rates assumed in
calculation of fair value for fixed rate mortgages  3.17 % 2.41 %
Weighted average discount rates assumed in
calculation of fair value for unsecured
indebtedness 3.33 % 2.63 %
8. Equity
Simon’s Board of Directors is authorized to reclassify excess common stock into one or more additional
classes and series of capital stock, to establish the number of shares in each class or series and to fix the
preferences, conversion and other rights, voting powers, restrictions, limitations as to dividends, and qualifications
and terms and conditions of redemption of such class or series, without any further vote or action by the stockholders.
The issuance of additional classes or series of capital stock may have the effect of delaying, deferring or preventing a
change in control of us without further action of the stockholders. The ability to issue additional classes or series of
capital stock, while providing flexibility in connection with possible acquisitions and other corporate purposes, could
have the effect of making it more difficult for a third party to acquire, or of discouraging a third party from acquiring, a
majority of Simon’s outstanding voting stock.
Holders of common stock are entitled to one vote for each share held of record on all matters submitted to a
vote of stockholders, other than for the election of directors. The holders of Simon’s Class B common stock have the
right to elect up to four members of Simon’s Board of Directors. All 8,000 outstanding shares of the Class B common
stock are subject to two voting trusts as to which Herbert Simon and David Simon are the trustees. Shares of Class B
common stock convert automatically into an equal number of shares of common stock upon the occurrence of certain
events and can be converted into shares of common stock at the option of the holders.
Common Stock and Unit Issuances and Repurchases
In 2021, Simon issued 58,571 shares of common stock to seven limited partners of the Operating Partnership
in exchange for an equal number of units pursuant to the partnership agreement of the Operating Partnership. During
the year ended December 31, 2021, the Operating Partnership redeemed 15,705 units from seven limited partners for
$2.2
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
124million.  In 2020, Simon issued 293,204 shares of common stock to 20 limited partners of the Operating Partnership in
exchange for an equal number of units pursuant to the partnership agreement of the Operating Partnership. During
the year ended December 31, 2020, the Operating Partnership redeemed 116,658 units from four limited partners for
$16.1 million.  These transactions increased Simon’s ownership interest in the Operating Partnership.
On December 29, 2020, the Operating Partnership issued 955,705 units in connection with the acquisition of
an 80% ownership interest in TRG, as discussed in Note 6.
On November 18, 2020, we issued 22,137,500 shares of common stock in a public offering at a price of
$72.50 per share, before underwriting discounts and commissions.  The Operating Partnership issued an equal
number of units to Simon.  A portion of the $1.6 billion proceeds from the offering, net of issue costs, were used to
fund the Operating Partnership’s acquisition of an 80% ownership interest in TRG.
On February 13, 2017, Simon’s Board of Directors authorized a two-year extension of the previously
authorized $2.0 billion common stock repurchase plan through March 31, 2019.  On February 11, 2019, Simon's
Board of Directors authorized a new common stock repurchase plan.  Under the plan, Simon was authorized to
repurchase up to $2.0 billion of its common stock during the two-year period ending February 11, 2021.  The
Repurchase Program was not extended.  Simon repurchased the shares in the open market or in privately negotiated
transactions as market conditions warranted.  During the year ended December 31, 2020, Simon purchased
1,245,654 shares at an average price of $122.50 per share.  During the year ended December 31, 2019, Simon
purchased 2,247,074 shares at an average price of $160.11 per share, of which 46,377 shares at an average price of
$164.49 were purchased as part of the previous program.  As Simon repurchased shares under this program, the
Operating Partnership repurchased an equal number of units from Simon.
Temporary Equity
Simon
Simon classifies as temporary equity those securities for which there is the possibility that Simon could be
required to redeem the security for cash irrespective of the probability of such a possibility. As a result, Simon
classifies one series of preferred units in the Operating Partnership and noncontrolling redeemable interests in
properties in temporary equity. Each of these securities is discussed further below.
Limited Partners’ Preferred Interest in the Operating Partnership and Noncontrolling Redeemable
Interests in Properties.  The redemption features of the preferred units in the Operating Partnership contain
provisions which could require the Operating Partnership to settle the redemption in cash. As a result, this series of
preferred units in the Operating Partnership remains classified outside permanent equity.
The remaining noncontrolling interests in a property or portfolio of properties which are redeemable at the
option of the holder or in circumstances that may be outside Simon’s control, are accounted for as temporary equity.
The carrying amount of the noncontrolling interest is adjusted to the redemption amount assuming the instrument is
redeemable at the balance sheet date. Changes in the redemption value of the underlying noncontrolling interest are
recorded and presented within accumulated deficit in the consolidated statements of equity in the line issuance of unit
equivalents and other. There were no noncontrolling interests redeemable at amounts in excess of fair value as of
December 31, 2021 and 2020. The
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
125following table summarizes the preferred units in the Operating Partnership and the amount of the noncontrolling
redeemable interests in properties as of December 31.
    2021     2020  
7.50% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units, 260,000  units authorized,
255,373  issued and outstanding $25,537 $25,537
Other noncontrolling redeemable interests  522,203  160,355
Limited partners’  preferred interest in the Operating Partnership and noncontrolling
redeemable interests in properties $547,740 $185,892
Refer to Note 3 for discussion of the noncontrolling redeemable interest related to the SPAC.
7.50% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units.  This series of preferred units accrues cumulative quarterly
distributions at a rate of $7.50 annually. The preferred units are redeemable by the Operating Partnership upon the
death of the survivor of the original holders, or the transfer of any preferred units to any person or entity other than the
persons or entities entitled to the benefits of the original holder. The redemption price is the liquidation value ($100.00
per preferred unit) plus accrued and unpaid distributions, payable either in cash or fully registered shares of common
stock at our election. In the event of the death of a holder of the preferred units, the occurrence of certain tax
triggering events applicable to the holder, or on or after November 10, 2006, the holder may require the Operating
Partnership to redeem the preferred units at the same redemption price payable at the option of the Operating
Partnership in either cash or shares of common stock.  These preferred units have a carrying value of $25.5 million
and are included in limited partners’ preferred interest in the Operating Partnership in the consolidated balance sheets
at December 31, 2021 and 2020.
The Operating Partnership
The Operating Partnership classifies as temporary equity those securities for which there is the possibility that
the Operating Partnership could be required to redeem the security for cash, irrespective of the probability of such a
possibility.  As a result, the Operating Partnership classifies one series of preferred units and noncontrolling
redeemable interests in properties in temporary equity.  Each of these securities is discussed further below.
Noncontrolling Redeemable Interests in Properties   Redeemable instruments, which typically represent
the remaining noncontrolling interests in a property or portfolio of properties, and which are redeemable at the option
of the holder or in circumstances that may be outside our control, are accounted for as temporary equity.  The
carrying amount of the noncontrolling interest is adjusted to the redemption amount assuming the instrument is
redeemable at the balance sheet date.  Changes in the redemption value of the underlying noncontrolling interest are
recorded within equity and are presented in the consolidated statements of equity in the line issuance of unit
equivalents and other.  There are no noncontrolling interests redeemable at amounts in excess of fair value as of
December 31, 2021 and 2020.  The following table summarizes the preferred units and the amount of the
noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties as of December 31.    
    2021     2020  
7.50% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units, 260,000  units authorized, 255,373
issued and outstanding $25,537 $25,537
Other noncontrolling redeemable interests  522,203  160,355
Total preferred units, at liquidation value, and noncontrolling redeemable interests in
properties $547,740 $185,892
Refer to Note 3 for discussion of the noncontrolling redeemable interest related to the SPAC.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
1267.50% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units   The 7.50% preferred units accrue cumulative quarterly
distributions at a rate of $7.50 annually.  We may redeem the preferred units upon the death of the survivor of the
original holders, or the transfer of any preferred units to any person or entity other than the persons or entities entitled
to the benefits of the original holder.  The redemption price is the liquidation value ($100.00 per preferred unit) plus
accrued and unpaid distributions, payable either in cash or fully registered shares of common stock of Simon at our
election.  In the event of the death of a holder of the 7.5% preferred units, the occurrence of certain tax triggering
events applicable to the holder, or on or after November 10, 2006, the holder may require the Operating Partnership
to redeem the preferred units at the same redemption price payable at the Operating Partnership’s option in either
cash or fully registered shares of common stock of Simon.  These preferred units have a carrying value of $25.5
million and are included in preferred units, at liquidation value in the consolidated balance sheets at December 31,
2021 and 2020.
Permanent Equity
Simon
Preferred Stock.  Dividends on all series of preferred stock are calculated based upon the preferred stock’s
preferred return multiplied by the preferred stock’s corresponding liquidation value. The Operating Partnership pays
preferred distributions to Simon equal to the dividends Simon pays on the preferred stock issued.
Series J 83/8% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock.  Dividends accrue quarterly at an annual rate of
83/8% per share. Simon can redeem this series, in whole or in part, on or after October 15, 2027 at a redemption price
of $50.00 per share, plus accumulated and unpaid dividends. This preferred stock was issued at a premium of
$7.5 million. The unamortized premium included in the carrying value of the preferred stock at December 31, 2021
and 2020 was $1.9 million and $2.2 million, respectively.
The Operating Partnership
Series J 83/8% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units.     Distributions accrue quarterly at an annual rate
of 83/8% per unit on the Series J 83/8% preferred units, or Series J preferred units.  Simon owns all of the Series J
preferred units which have the same economic rights and preferences of an outstanding series of Simon preferred
stock.  The Operating Partnership can redeem this series, in whole or in part, when Simon can redeem the related
preferred stock, on and after October 15, 2027 at a redemption price of $50.00 per unit, plus accumulated and unpaid
distributions. The Series J preferred units were issued at a premium of $7.5 million.  The unamortized premium
included in the carrying value of the preferred units at December 31, 2021 and 2020 was $1.9 million and $2.2 million,
respectively.  There are 1,000,000 Series J preferred units authorized and 796,948 Series J preferred units issued
and outstanding.
Other Equity Activity
The Simon Property Group, L.P. 2019 Stock Incentive Plan.  This plan, or the 2019 Plan, provides for the
grant of equity-based awards with respect to the equity of Simon in the form of incentive and nonqualified stock
options to purchase shares, stock appreciation rights, restricted stock grants and performance-based awards.
 Options may be granted which are qualified as “incentive stock options” within the meaning of Section 422 of the
Internal Revenue Code and options which are not so qualified.  An aggregate of 8,000,000 shares of common stock
have been reserved under the 2019 plan.
The 2019 Plan is administered by the Compensation and Human Capital Committees.  The Compensation and
Human Capital Committees determines which eligible individuals may participate and the type, extent and terms of
the awards to be granted to them.  In addition, the Compensation and Human Capital Committees interprets the 2019
Plan and makes all other determinations deemed advisable for its administration.  Options granted to employees
become exercisable over the period determined by the Compensation and Human Capital Committees.  The exercise
price of an employee option may not be less than the fair market value of the shares on the date of grant.  Employee
options generally vest over a three-year period and expire ten years from the date of grant.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
127Directors who are not also our employees or employees of our affiliates are eligible to receive awards under
the 2019 plan. Each independent director receives an annual cash retainer of $110,000, and an annual restricted
stock award with a grant date value of $175,000. Committee chairs receive annual retainers for the Company’s Audit,
Compensation, and Governance and Nominating Committees of $35,000, $35,000 and $25,000, respectively.
 Directors receive fixed annual retainers for service on the Audit, Compensation and Governance and Nominating
Committees, of $15,000, $15,000, and $10,000, respectively. The Lead Director receives an annual retainer of
$50,000.  These retainers are paid 50% in cash and 50% in restricted stock.
Restricted stock awards vest in full after one year.  Once vested, the delivery of the shares of restricted stock
(including reinvested dividends) is deferred under our Director Deferred Compensation Plan until the director retires,
dies or becomes disabled or otherwise no longer serves as a director. The directors may vote and are entitled to
receive dividends on the underlying shares; however, any dividends on the shares of restricted stock must be
reinvested in shares of common stock and held in the Director Deferred Compensation Plan until the shares of
restricted stock are delivered to the former director.
Stock Based Compensation
Our long-term incentive compensation awards under our stock based compensation plans primarily take the
form of LTIP units, restricted stock grants and restricted stock units.  These awards are either market or performance-
based and are based on various individual, corporate and business unit performance measures as further described
below. The expense related to these programs, net of amounts capitalized, is included within home and regional office
costs and general and administrative costs in the accompanying statements of operations and comprehensive
income.  In the first quarter of 2021, the Compensation and Human Capital Committees established and made
awards under a 2021 Long-Term Incentive Program, or 2021 LTI Program.  Awards under the 2021 LTI Program took
the form of LTIP units and restricted stock units, or RSUs, as further discussed below.
LTIP Programs.  The Compensation and Human Capital Committees has approved long-term, performance
based incentive compensation programs, or the LTIP programs, for certain senior employees. Awards under the LTIP
programs take the form of LTIP units, a form of limited partnership interest issued by the Operating Partnership, which
are subject to the participant maintaining employment with us through certain dates and other conditions as described
in the applicable award agreements. Awarded LTIP units not earned in accordance with the conditions set forth in the
applicable award agreements are forfeited. Earned and fully vested LTIP units are equivalent to units of the Operating
Partnership. During the performance period, participants are entitled to receive distributions on the LTIP units
awarded to them equal to 10% of the regular quarterly distributions paid on a unit of the Operating Partnership. As a
result, we account for these LTIP units as participating securities under the two-class method of computing earnings
per share.
In 2018, the Compensation and Human Capital Committees established and granted awards under a
redesigned LTIP program, or the 2018 LTIP program.  Awards under the 2018 LTIP program were granted in two
tranches, Tranche A LTIP units and Tranche B LTIP units. Each of the Tranche A LTIP units and the Tranche B LTIP
units will be considered earned if, and only to the extent to which, the respective goals based on Funds From
Operations, or FFO, per share or Relative TSR Goal performance criteria, as defined in the applicable award
agreements, are achieved during the applicable two-year and three-year performance periods of the Tranche A LTIP
units and Tranche B LTIP units, respectively.  One half of the earned Tranche A LTIP units will vest on January 1,
2021 with the other one-half vesting on January 1, 2022.
The grant date fair value of the portion of the LTIP units based on achieving the target FFO performance
criteria is $6.1 million for the Tranche A LTIP units and the Tranche B LTIP units, for a total of $12.1 million.  The 2018
LTIP program provides that the value of the FFO-based award may be adjusted up or down based on the Company’s
performance compared to the target FFO performance criteria and has a maximum potential fair value of $18.2
million.  
In 2021 and 2019, the Compensation and Human Capital Committees established and granted awards under
a redesigned LTIP program, or the 2021 LTIP program and the 2019 LTIP program, respectively.  Awards under these
programs will be considered earned if, and only to the extent to which, the respective performance conditions (based
on Funds From Operations, or FFO, per share, and Objective Criteria Goals) and market conditions (based on
Relative or
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
128absolute TSR performance), as defined in the applicable award agreements, are achieved during the applicable
three-year measurement period, subject to the recipient’s continued employment through the applicable vesting
dates.  Any units determined to be earned LTIP units under the 2021 LTIP program will vest on January 1, 2025 and
any units determined to be earned LTIP units under the 2019 LTIP program will vest on January 1, 2023.  The 2021
LTIP program provides that the amount earned related to the performance-based portion of the awards is dependent
on Simon’s FFO performance and achievement of certain objective criteria goals and has a maximum potential fair
value at grant date of $18.4 million.  The 2019 LTIP program provides that the amount earned related to the
performance-based portion of the awards is dependent on Simon’s FFO performance and achievement of certain
objective criteria goals and has a maximum potential fair value at issuance of $22.1 million.  
The grant date fair values of any LTIP units for market-based awards are estimated using a Monte Carlo
model, and the resulting fixed expense is recorded regardless of whether the market condition criteria are achieved if
the required service is delivered. The grant date fair values of the market-based awards are being amortized into
expense over the period from the grant date to the date at which the awards, if earned, would become vested.  The
expense of the performance-based award is recorded over the period from the grant date to the date at which the
awards, if earned, would become vested, based on our assessment as to whether it is probable that the performance
criteria will be achieved during the applicable performance periods.
The Compensation and Human Capital Committees approved LTIP unit grants as shown in the table below.
The extent to which LTIP units were earned, and the aggregate grant date fair value, are as follows:
LTIP Program     LTIP Units Earned     Grant Date Fair Value
of TSR Award     Grant Date Target
Value of Performance-
Based Awards
2018 L TIP program - Tranche A  38,148  $6.1 million  $6.1 million
2018 L TIP program - Tranche B  -  $6.1 million  $6.1 million
2019 L TIP program To be determined in 2022  $9.5 million  $14.7 million
2021 L TIP program To be determined in 2024  $5.7 million  $12.2 million
We recorded compensation expense, net of capitalization and forfeitures, related to LTIP programs of
approximately $13.4 million, $1.9 million, and $15.8 million for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019,
respectively.
Restricted Stock and Restricted Stock Units.  The 2019 plan also provides for shares of restricted stock to
be granted to certain employees at no cost to those employees, subject to achievement of individual performance and
certain financial and return-based performance measures established by the Compensation and Human Capital
Committees related to the most recent year’s performance. Once granted, the shares of restricted stock then vest
annually over a three-year or a four-year period (as defined in the award). The cost of restricted stock grants, which is
based upon the stock’s fair market value on the grant date, is recognized as expense ratably over the vesting period.
Through December 31, 2021 a total of 5,858,453 shares of restricted stock, net of forfeitures, have been awarded
under the 1998 plan, and 561,849 shares of restricted stock and RSUs have been awarded under the 2019 plan.
During the first quarter of 2021, as part of the 2021 LTI Program the Compensation and Human Capital
Committees established a grant of 37,976 time-based RSUs under the 2019 Plan at a weighted average fair market
value of $112.92 per share.  These awards will vest, subject to the grantee's continued service, on March 1, 2024.
 The $4.3 million grant date fair value of the awards is being recognized as expense over the three-year vesting
service period.  
During 2020, the Compensation and Human Capital Committees established a one-time grant of 312,263
time-based RSUs under the 2019 Plan at a weighted average fair market value of $84.37 per share.  These awards
will vest, subject to the grantee's continued service on each applicable vesting date, in one-third increments on
January 1, 2022,
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
129January 1, 2023, and January 1, 2024.  The grant date fair value of the awards of $26.3 million is being recognized as
expense over the three-year vesting service period.  
Information regarding restricted stock awards is summarized in the following table for each of the years
presented:
For the Year Ended  
December 31,  
   2021    2020    2019 
Shares of restricted stock awarded during the year ,
net of forfeitures  80,012  462,966  90,902
Weighted average fair value of shares granted during
the year $115.34 $73.28 $181.94
Annual amortization $19,673 $11,660 $12,604
We recorded compensation expense, net of capitalization, related to restricted stock for employees and non-
employee directors of approximately $20.2 million, $10.3 million, and $11.0 million for the years ended December 31,
2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
We also maintain a tax-qualified retirement 401(k) savings plan and offer no other post-retirement or post-
employment benefits to our employees.
Exchange Rights
Simon
Limited partners in the Operating Partnership have the right to exchange all or any portion of their units for
shares of common stock on a one-for-one basis or cash, as determined by Simon’s Board of Directors. The amount of
cash to be paid if the exchange right is exercised and the cash option is selected will be based on the trading price of
Simon’s common stock at that time. At December 31, 2021, Simon had reserved 54,492,801 shares of common stock
for possible issuance upon the exchange of units, stock options and Class B common stock.
The Operating Partnership
Limited partners have the right under the partnership agreement to exchange all or any portion of their units for
shares of Simon common stock on a one-for-one basis or cash, as determined by Simon in its sole discretion. If
Simon selects cash, Simon cannot cause the Operating Partnership to redeem the exchanged units for cash without
contributing cash to the Operating Partnership as partners’ equity sufficient to effect the redemption.  If sufficient cash
is not contributed, Simon will be deemed to have elected to exchange the units for shares of Simon common stock.
 The amount of cash to be paid if the exchange right is exercised and the cash option is selected will be based on the
trading price of Simon’s common stock at that time. The number of shares of Simon’s common stock issued pursuant
to the exercise of the exchange right will be the same as the number of units exchanged.
9. Lease Income
Fixed lease income under our operating leases includes fixed minimum lease consideration and fixed CAM
reimbursements recorded on a straight-line basis.  Variable lease income includes consideration based on sales, as
well
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
130as reimbursements for real estate taxes, utilities, marketing, and certain other items including negative variable lease
income as discussed in Note 3.
For the Year Ended
December 31, 
    2021     2020 2019
Fixed lease income $3,701,991 $3,871,395 $4,293,401
Variable lease income 1,034,728 430,972 950,370
Total lease income $4,736,719 $4,302,367 $5,243,771
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets includes straight-
line receivables of $568.7 million and $597.6 million at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Minimum fixed lease consideration under non-cancelable tenant operating leases for each of the next five
years and thereafter, excluding variable lease consideration and amounts deferred in relation to the COVID-19
pandemic, which with respect to deferrals are expected to be collected primarily in 2022 and 2023, as of December
31, 2021, is as follows:
2022     $3,098,505
2023  2,611,384
2024  2,082,985
2024  1,650,164
2025  1,252,534
Thereafter  3,291,874
$13,987,446
10. Commitments and Contingencies
Litigation
We are involved from time-to-time in various legal and regulatory proceedings that arise in the ordinary course
of our business, including, but not limited to, commercial disputes, environmental matters, and litigation in connection
with transactions such as acquisitions and divestitures. We believe that current proceedings will not have a material
adverse effect on our financial condition, liquidity or results of operations. We record a liability when a loss is
considered probable and the amount can be reasonably estimated.
During the first quarter of 2019, we settled a lawsuit with our former insurance broker, Aon Risk Services
Central Inc., related to the significant flood damage sustained at Opry Mills in May 2010. In accordance with a
previous agreement with the prior co-investor in Opry Mills, a portion of the settlement was remitted to the co-investor.
 Our share of the settlement was approximately $68.0 million, which was recorded as other income in the
accompanying consolidated statement of operations and comprehensive income.
Lease Commitments
As of December 31, 2021, a total of 23 of the consolidated properties are subject to ground leases. The
termination dates of these ground leases range from 2022 to 2090, including periods for which exercising an
extension option is reasonably assured. These ground leases generally require us to make fixed annual rental
payments, or a fixed annual rental payment plus a percentage rent component based upon the revenues or total
sales of the property. In addition, we have several regional office locations that are subject to leases with termination
dates ranging from 2023 to 2028. These office leases generally require us to make fixed annual rental payments plus
pay our share of common area, real estate, and utility expenses. Some of our ground and office leases include
escalation clauses. All of our lease arrangements are
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
131classified as operating leases.  We incurred ground lease expense and office lease expense, which are included in
other expense and home office and regional expense, respectively, as follows:
For the Year Ended
December 31, 
    2021 2020 2019
Operating Lease Cost
Fixed lease cost $32,492 $31,404 $31,000
Variable lease cost 15,454 13,270 16,833
Sublease income  (705) (746) (694)
Total operating lease cost $47,241 $43,928 $47,139
For the Year Ended
December 31, 
   2021    2020    2019
Other Information
Cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of lease liabilities
Operating cash flows from operating leases $ 47,824 $ 44,570 $ 48,519
Weighted-average remaining lease term - operating leases 33.6 years 34.4 years 35.6 years
Weighted-average discount rate - operating leases 4.87% 4.86% 4.87%
Future minimum lease payments due under these leases for years ending December 31, excluding applicable
extension options and renewal options unless reasonably certain of exercise and any sublease income, are as
follows:
2022     $32,838
2023  32,979
2024  33,114
2025  33,124
2026  33,138
Thereafter  855,079
$1,020,272
Impact of discounting (513,341 )
Operating lease liabilities $506,931
Insurance
We maintain insurance coverage with third-party carriers who provide a portion of the coverage for specific
layers of potential losses, including commercial general liability, fire, flood, extended coverage and rental loss
insurance on all of our properties in the United States as well as cyber coverage. The initial portion of coverage not
provided by third-party carriers may be insured through our wholly-owned captive insurance company, or other
financial arrangements controlled by us. If required, a third-party carrier has, in turn, agreed to provide evidence of
coverage for this layer of losses under the terms and conditions of the carrier’s insurance policy with us. A similar
insurance policy written either through our captive insurance company or other financial arrangements controlled by
us also provides initial coverage for property insurance and certain windstorm risks.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
132We currently maintain insurance coverage against acts of terrorism on all of our properties in the United States
on an “all risk” basis in the amount of up to $1 billion. Despite the existence of this insurance coverage, any
threatened or actual terrorist attacks where we operate could adversely affect our property values, revenues,
consumer traffic and tenant sales.
Hurricane Impacts
During the third quarter of 2017, two of our wholly-owned properties located in Puerto Rico sustained
significant property damage and business interruption as a result of Hurricane Maria.  Since the date of the loss, we
have received $84.0 million of insurance proceeds from third-party carriers related to the two properties located in
Puerto Rico, of which $48.3 million was used for property restoration and remediation and to reduce the insurance
recovery receivable.  During the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, we recorded $2.1 million and $5.2
million, respectively, as business interruption income, which was recorded in other income in the accompanying
consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.
During the third quarter of 2020, one of our properties located in Texas experienced property damage and
business interruption as a result of Hurricane Hanna.  We wrote-off assets of approximately $9.6 million, and
recorded an insurance recovery receivable, and have received $14.0 million of insurance proceeds from third-party
carriers.  The proceeds were used for property restoration and remediation and reduced the insurance recovery
receivable.  During the year ended December 31, 2021, we recorded a $3.5 million gain related to property insurance
recovery of previously depreciated assets.  This amount was recorded in gain (loss) on acquisition of controlling
interest, sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net.
During the third quarter of 2020, one of our properties located in Louisiana experienced property damage and
business interruption as a result of Hurricane Laura.   We wrote-off assets of approximately $11.1 million and
recorded an insurance recovery receivable, and have received $27.5 million of insurance proceeds from third-party
carriers.  The proceeds were used for property restoration and remediation and reduced the insurance recovery
receivable.  During the year ended December 31, 2021, we recorded a $17.5 million gain related to property
insurance recovery of previously depreciated assets.  This amount was recorded in gain (loss) on acquisition of
controlling interest, sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment,
net.
Guarantees of Indebtedness
Joint venture debt is the liability of the joint venture and is typically secured by the joint venture property, which
is non-recourse to us. As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, the Operating Partnership guaranteed joint venture related
mortgage indebtedness of $209.9 million and $219.2 million, respectively. Mortgages guaranteed by the Operating
Partnership are secured by the property of the joint venture which could be sold in order to satisfy the outstanding
obligation and which have estimated fair values in excess of the guaranteed amount.
Concentration of Credit Risk
Our U.S. Malls, Premium Outlets, and The Mills rely upon anchor tenants to attract customers; however,
anchors do not contribute materially to our financial results as many anchors own their spaces. All material operations
are within the United States and no customer or tenant accounts for 5% or more of our consolidated revenues.
COVID-19
On March 11, 2020, the World Health Organization declared the novel strain of coronavirus, or COVID-19, a
global pandemic and recommended containment and mitigation measures worldwide. The COVID-19 pandemic has
had a material negative impact on economic and market conditions around the world, and, notwithstanding the fact
that vaccines are being administered in the United States and elsewhere, the pandemic continues to adversely impact
economic activity in retail real estate. The impact of the COVID-19 pandemic continues to evolve and governments
and other authorities, including where we own or hold interests in properties, have at times imposed measures
intended to control its spread,
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
133including restrictions on freedom of movement, group gatherings and business operations such as travel bans, border
closings, business closures, quarantines, stay-at-home, shelter-in-place orders, density limitations and social
distancing measures.  As a result of the COVID-19 pandemic and these measures, the Company has experienced
and may continue to experience material impacts including changes in the ability to recognize revenue due to
changes in our assessment of the probability of collection of lease income and asset impairment charges as a result
of changing cash flows generated by our properties and investments.  
11. Related Party Transactions
Transactions with Affiliates
Our management company provides office space and legal, human resource administration, property specific
financing and other support services to Melvin Simon & Associates, Inc., or MSA, a related party, for which we
received a fee of $0.6 million in each of 2021, 2020 and 2019. In addition, pursuant to management agreements that
provide for our receipt of a management fee and reimbursement of our direct and indirect costs, we have managed
since 1993 two shopping centers owned by entities in which David Simon and Herbert Simon have ownership
interests, for which we received a fee of $3.5 million, $3.3 million, and $3.9 million in 2021, 2020, and 2019,
respectively.  
Transactions with Unconsolidated Joint Ventures
As described in Note 2, our management company provides management, insurance, and other services to
certain unconsolidated joint ventures.  Amounts received for such services were $102.1 million, $92.7 million, and
$108.2 million in 2021, 2020, and 2019, respectively.  During 2021, 2020, and 2019, we recorded development,
royalty, and other fee income, net of elimination, related to our unconsolidated international joint ventures of $12.4
million, $13.1 million, and $14.8 million, respectively.  The fees related to our international investments are included in
other income in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.  Neither MSA,
David Simon, or Herb Simon have an ownership interest in any of our unconsolidated joint ventures, except through
their ownership interests in the Company or the Operating Partnership.
We have investments in retailers including J.C. Penney and SPARC Group, and these retailers are lessees at
certain of our operating properties.  Lease income from the date of our investments in our consolidated statements of
operations and comprehensive income related to these retailers was $82.5 million, $54.1 million, and $20.9 million for
the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019, respectively, net of elimination.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
13412. Quarterly Financial Data (Unaudited)
Quarterly 2021 and 2020 data is summarized in the table below. Quarterly amounts may not sum to annual
amounts due to rounding.
    First     Second     Third     Fourth  
Quarter Quarter Quarter Quarter  
2021
Total revenue $ 1,239,951 $ 1,254,146 $ 1,296,554 $ 1,326,138
Operating income before other items  604,612  604,723  612,324  591,533
Consolidated net income  510,460  705,869  778,648  573,730
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Net income attributable to common stockholders $ 445,860 $ 617,257 $ 679,936 $ 503,241
Net income per share — Basic and Diluted $ 1.36 $ 1.88 $ 2.07 $ 1.53
Weighted average shares outstanding — Basic and
Diluted  328,514,497  328,594,136  328,619,163  328,619,248
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Net income attributable to unitholders $ 510,085 $ 706,087 $ 777,740 $ 575,596
Net income per unit — Basic and Diluted $ 1.36 $ 1.88 $ 2.07 $ 1.53
Weighted average units outstanding — Basic and
Diluted 375,836,653 375,875,290 375,882,318 375,872,212
2020
Total revenue (1) $ 1,353,360 $ 1,062,041 $ 1,060,674 $ 1,131,429
Operating income before other items  654,869  450,868  404,024  462,047
Consolidated net income  505,404  290,548  168,646  312,726
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Net income attributable to common stockholders $ 437,605 $ 254,213 $ 145,926 $ 271,483
Net income per share — Basic and Diluted $ 1.43 $ 0.83 $ 0.48 $ 0.86
Weighted average shares outstanding — Basic and
Diluted  306,504,084  305,882,326  305,913,431  316,595,345
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Net income attributable to unitholders $ 504,263 $ 292,863 $ 168,086 $ 311,238
Net income per unit — Basic and Diluted $ 1.43 $ 0.83 $ 0.48 $ 0.86
Weighted average units outstanding — Basic and
Diluted 353,191,960 352,410,392 352,420,845 363,050,401
Table of Contents
135Item 9.  Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure
None.
Item 9A.    Controls and Procedures
Simon
Management's Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
Simon maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act")) that are designed to provide reasonable assurance that
information required to be disclosed in the reports that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded,
processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the SEC's rules and forms, and that such
information is accumulated and communicated to Simon’s management, including its Chief Executive Officer and
Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosures. Because of inherent
limitations, disclosure controls and procedures, no matter how well designed and operated, can provide only
reasonable, and not absolute, assurance that the objectives of disclosure controls and procedures are met.
Our management, with the participation of Simon’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer,
evaluated the effectiveness of the design and operation of Simon’s disclosure controls and procedures as of
December 31, 2021. Based on that evaluation, Simon’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded
that, as of December 31, 2021, Simon’s disclosure controls and procedures were effective at a reasonable assurance
level.
Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Simon is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting.
Internal control over financial reporting is defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act as a process designed by,
or under the supervision of, Simon’s principal executive and principal financial officers and effected by Simon’s Board
of Directors, management and other personnel, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial
reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with U.S. generally
accepted accounting principles and includes those policies and procedures that:
● Pertain to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect our
transactions and disposition of assets;
● Provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of
financial statements in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, and that our
receipts and expenditures are being made only in accordance with authorizations of our management
and directors; and
● Provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use
or disposition of our assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect
misstatements. Projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls
may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or
procedures may deteriorate.
We assessed the effectiveness of Simon’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021. In
making this assessment, we used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission (COSO) in Internal Control-Integrated Framework (2013). Based on that assessment and
criteria, we believe that, as of December 31, 2021, Simon’s internal control over financial reporting was effective.
Attestation Report of the Registered Public Accounting Firm
The audit report of Ernst & Young LLP on their assessment of Simon's internal control over financial reporting
as of December 31, 2021 is set forth within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
There have not been any changes in Simon's internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Rule 13a-
15(f) under the Exchange Act) that occurred during the year ended December 31, 2021 that have materially affected,
or are reasonably likely to materially affect, Simon's internal control over financial reporting.
Table of Contents
136The Operating Partnership
Management's Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
The Operating Partnership maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under
the Exchange Act) that are designed to provide reasonable assurance that information required to be disclosed in the
reports that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the
time periods specified in the SEC's rules and forms, and that such information is accumulated and communicated to
our management, including Simon’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate to allow timely
decisions regarding required disclosures. Because of inherent limitations, disclosure controls and procedures, no
matter how well designed and operated, can provide only reasonable, and not absolute, assurance that the objectives
of disclosure controls and procedures are met.
Our management, with the participation of Simon’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer,
evaluated the effectiveness of the design and operation of the Operating Partnership’s disclosure controls and
procedures as of December 31, 2021. Based on that evaluation, Simon’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial
Officer concluded that, as of December 31, 2021, the Operating Partnership’s disclosure controls and procedures
were effective at a reasonable assurance level.
Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
The Operating Partnership is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over
financial reporting. Internal control over financial reporting is defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act as a
process designed by, or under the supervision of, Simon’s principal executive and principal financial officers and
effected by Simon’s Board of Directors, management and other personnel, to provide reasonable assurance
regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in
accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles and includes those policies and procedures that:
● Pertain to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect our
transactions and disposition of assets;
● Provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of
financial statements in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, and that our
receipts and expenditures are being made only in accordance with authorizations of our management
and directors; and
● Provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use
or disposition of our assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect
misstatements. Projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls
may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or
procedures may deteriorate.
We assessed the effectiveness of the Operating Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2021. In making this assessment, we used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring
Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO) in Internal Control-Integrated Framework (2013). Based on that
assessment and criteria, we believe that, as of December 31, 2021, the Operating Partnership’s internal control over
financial reporting was effective.
Attestation Report of the Registered Public Accounting Firm
The audit report of Ernst & Young LLP on their assessment of the Operating Partnership’s internal control over
financial reporting as of December 31, 2021 is set forth within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
There have not been any changes in the Operating Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting (as
defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act) that occurred during the year ended December 31, 2021 that have
materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, the Operating Partnership’s internal control over
financial reporting.
Table of Contents
137Item 9B.    Other Information
During the fourth quarter of the year covered by this Annual Report on Form 10-K, the Audit Committee of
Simon’s Board of Directors approved certain audit, audit-related and non-audit tax compliance and tax consulting
services to be provided by Ernst & Young LLP, our independent registered public accounting firm. This disclosure is
made pursuant to Section 10A(i)(2) of the Exchange Act as added by Section 202 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
Item 9C.    Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections
Not Applicable.
Part III
Item 10.    Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy statement for
Simon’s 2022 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A and the information
included under the caption "Information about our Executive Officers" in Part I hereof.
Item 11.    Executive Compensation
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy statement for
Simon’s 2022 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A.
Item 12.    Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder 
Matters
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy statement for
Simon’s 2022 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A.
Item 13.    Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy statement for
Simon’s 2022 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A.
Item 14.  Principal Accountant Fees and Services
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy statement for
Simon’s 2021 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A.
The Audit Committee of Simon's Board of Directors pre-approves all audit and permissible non-audit services
to be provided by Ernst & Young LLP (PCAOB ID: 42), or Ernst & Young, Simon’s and the Operating Partnership’s
independent registered public accounting firm, prior to commencement of services. The Audit Committee has
delegated to the Chairman of the Audit Committee the authority to pre-approve specific services up to specified
individual and aggregate fee amounts. These pre-approval decisions are presented to the full Audit Committee at the
next scheduled meeting after such approvals are made.  We have incurred fees as shown below for services from
Ernst & Young as Simon’s and the Operating Partnership’s independent registered public accounting firm and for
services provided to our managed consolidated and joint venture properties and our consolidated non-managed
properties. Ernst & Young has advised us that it has billed or will bill these indicated amounts for the following
categories of services for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively:
2021     2020
Audit Fees (1) $ 
5,444,000$ 
4,707,000
Audit Related Fees (2)   
4,890,000  
5,068,000
Tax Fees (3)   276,000  359,000
All Other Fees   —   —
(1)Audit Fees include fees for the audits of the financial statements and the effectiveness of internal control over
financial reporting and quarterly reviews for Simon and the Operating Partnership and services associated with
the related SEC registration statements, periodic reports, and other documents issued in connection with
securities offerings, and varies based on our capital markets and transaction activity.
Table of Contents
138(2)Audit-Related Fees include audits of individual or portfolios of properties and schedules to comply with lender,
joint venture partner or contract requirements and due diligence services for our managed consolidated and joint
venture entities and our consolidated non-managed entities.  Our share of these Audit-Related Fees was
approximately 57% and 60% for the years ended 2021 and 2020, respectively.
(3)Tax Fees include fees for international and other tax consulting services, tax due diligence and tax return
compliance services associated with the tax returns for certain managed joint ventures as well as other
miscellaneous tax compliance services.  Our share of these Tax Fees was approximately 71% and 81% for 2021
and 2020, respectively.
Table of Contents
139Part IV
Item 15.  Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
Page No.
(a) (1) Financial Statements
The following consolidated financial statements of Simon Property Group, Inc. and
Simon Property Group, L.P . are set forth in Part II, item 8.
Reports of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 78
Consolidated Financial Statements of Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2021 and 2020 87
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the years
ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 88
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2021,
2020 and 2019 89
Consolidated Statements of Equity for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020
and 2019 90
Consolidated Financial Statements of Simon Property Group, L.P .
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2021 and 2020 92
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the years
ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 93
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2021,
2020 and 2019 94
Consolidated Statements of Equity for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020
and 2019 95
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 97
(2) Financial Statement Schedule
Simon Property Group, Inc. and Simon Property Group, L.P . Schedule III — Schedule
of Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation 147
Notes to Schedule III 153
Other financial statement schedules are omitted because they are not applicable or
the required information is shown in the financial statements or notes thereto.
(3) Exhibits
The Exhibit Index attached hereto is hereby incorporated by reference to this Item. 140
Item 16.  Form 10-K Summary
None.
Table of Contents
140EXHIBIT INDEX
Exhibits
2.1Separation and Distribution Agreement by and among Simon Property Group, Inc., Simon Property Group, L.P.,
Washington Prime Group Inc. and Washington Prime Group, L.P., dated as of May 27, 2014 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 2.1 of the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 29, 2014).
2.2Amended and Restated Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of November 14, 2020, by and among the
Taubman Parties and the Simon Parties (incorporated by reference to exhibit 2.1 of Simon Property Group Inc.’s
and Simon Property Group L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on November 16, 2020).
3.1Restated Certificate of Incorporation of Simon Property Group, Inc. (incorporated by reference to Appendix A of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Proxy Statement on Schedule 14A filed March 27, 2009).
3.2Amended and Restated By-Laws of Simon Property Group, Inc. as adopted on March 20, 2017 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 3.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed March 24, 2017).
3.3Certificate of Powers, Designations, Preferences and Rights of the 83/8% Series J Cumulative Redeemable
Preferred Stock, $0.0001 Par Value (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s
Current Report on Form 8-K filed October 20, 2004).
3.4Certificate of Designation of Series A Junior Participating Redeemable Preferred Stock (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 3.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 15, 2014).
3.5Second Amended and Restated Certificate of Limited Partnership of the Limited Partnership (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 3.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed March 31, 2003).
3.6Eighth Amended and Restated Limited Partnership Agreement of Simon Property Group, L.P. dated as of
May 8, 2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed May 9, 2008).
3.7Certificate of Designation of Series B Junior Participating Redeemable Preferred Units of Simon Property
Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q filed August 8, 2014).
3.8Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and Simon Property Group, L.P. dated March 7, 2007, but
effective as of August 27, 1999, regarding a prior agreement filed under an exhibit 99.1 to Form S-3/A of Simon
Property Group, L.P. on November 20, 1996 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.4 of Simon Property
Group, L.P.'s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed March 16, 2007).
3.9Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and Simon Property Group, L.P. dated April 29, 2009, but
effective as of October 14, 2004, regarding redemption of the Registrant's Series I Preferred Units (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 3.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 8, 2009).
4.1(a)Indenture, dated as of November 26, 1996, by and among Simon Property Group, L.P. and The Chase
Manhattan Bank, as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s
Registration Statement on Form S-3 filed October 21, 1996 (Reg. No. 333-11491)).
4.2Description of Each Registrant’s Securities Registered Pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934.
9.1Second Amended and Restated Voting Trust Agreement, Voting Agreement and Proxy dated as of March 1,
2004 between Melvin Simon & Associates, Inc., on the one hand and Melvin Simon, Herbert Simon and David
Simon on the other hand (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 9.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q filed May 10, 2004).
9.2Voting Trust Agreement, Voting Agreement and Proxy dated as of March 1, 2004 between David Simon, Melvin
Simon and Herbert Simon (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 9.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q filed May 10, 2004).
Table of Contents
141Exhibits
10.1Form of the Indemnity Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and its directors and officers
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.7 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Form S-4 filed August 13, 1998 (Reg.
No. 333-61399)).
10.2Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of September 24, 1998, by and among Simon Property Group, Inc.
and the persons named therein (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s
Current Report on Form 8-K filed October 9, 1998).
10.3Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of August 27, 1999, by and among Simon Property Group, Inc. and the
persons named therein (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 of the Registration Statement on Form S-3 filed
March 24, 2004 (Reg. No. 333-113884)).
10.4Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of November 14, 1997, by and between O’Connor Retail Partners, L.P.
and Simon DeBartolo Group, Inc. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8 of the Registration Statement on
Form S-3 filed December 7, 2001 (Reg. No. 333-74722)).
10.5*Simon Property Group, L.P. Amended and Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 10, 2014).
10.6*Form of Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P. 1998 Stock
Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.8 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Annual Report on
Form 10-K filed March 16, 2005).
10.7*Form of Performance-Based Restricted Stock Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P. 1998
Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.9 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Annual Report
on Form 10-K filed February 28, 2007).
10.8*Form of Non-Employee Director Restricted Stock Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P. 1998
Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.10 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Annual Report
on Form 10-K filed March 16, 2005).
10.9*Employment Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and David Simon effective as of July 6, 2011
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
July 7, 2011).
10.10*First Amendment to Employment Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and David Simon, dated as of
March 29, 2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed April 4, 2013).
10.11*Non-Qualified Deferred Compensation Plan dated as of December 31, 2008 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed November 5, 2009).
10.12*Amendment — 2008 Performance Based-Restricted Stock Agreement dated as of March 6, 2009 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed November 5,
2009).
10.13*Certificate of Designation of Series 2010 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.4 of Simon Property Group, Inc.'s Current Report on Form 8-K filed March 19, 2010).
10.14*Form of Series 2010 LTIP Unit (Three Year Program) Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P.
1998 Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed March 19, 2010).
10.15*Form of Series 2010 LTIP Unit (Two Year Program) Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P.
1998 Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed March 19, 2010).
10.16*Form of Series 2010 LTIP Unit (One Year Program) Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P.
1998 Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed March 19, 2010).
Table of Contents
142Exhibits
10.17*Certificate of Designation of Series CEO LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.'s Current Report on Form 8-K filed July 7, 2011).
10.18*Simon Property Group Series CEO LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed July 7, 2011).
10.19*First Amendment to Simon Property Group Series CEO LTIP Unit Award Agreement dated as of December 22,
2011 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.24 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
filed February 28, 2012).
10.20*Second Amendment to Simon Property Group Series CEO LTIP Unit Award Agreement, dated as of March 29,
2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K
filed April 4, 2013).
10.21*Simon Property Group Amended and Restated Series CEO LTIP Unit Award Agreement, dated as of
December 31, 2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed January 2, 2014).
10.22*Certificate of Designation of Series 2011 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.5 of Simon Property Group, Inc.'s Current Report on Form 8-K filed July 7, 2011).
10.23*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2011 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.6 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed July 7, 2011).
10.24*Certificate of Designation of Series 2012 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 11, 2012).
10.25*Amended and Restated Certificate of Designation of Series 2012 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P.
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed
May 7, 2014).
10.26*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2012 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 8, 2012).
10.27*Simon Property Group Amended and Restated Series 2012 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 28, 2014).
10.28*Certificate of Designation of Series 2013 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 10, 2013).
10.29*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2013 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 4, 2013).
10.30*Form of Simon Property Group Executive Officer LTIP Waiver, dated April 18, 2014 (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 28, 2014).
10.31*Simon Property Group CEO LTIP Unit Adjustment Waiver, dated April 18, 2014 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 28, 2014).
10.32*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2014 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 7, 2014).
10.33*Certificate of Designation of Series 2014 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 7, 2014).
10.34Amended and Restated $2,750,000,000 Credit Agreement dated as of March 2, 2015 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed March 3, 2015).
Table of Contents
143Exhibits
10.35*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2015 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q/A for the quarter ended March 31,
2015 filed on January 13, 2016).
10.36*Certificate of Designation of Series 2015 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.4 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q/A for the quarter ended March 31,
2015 filed on January 13, 2016).
10.37*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2016 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
for the quarter ended March 31, 2016 filed on May 5, 2016).
10.38*Form of Certificate of Designation of Series 2016 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s  Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016 filed on May 5, 2016).
10.39Amendment No. 1 to Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of April 6, 2016 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 7, 2016).
10.40Amended and Restated $4,000,000,000 Credit Agreement, dated as of March 17, 2017 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 99.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed March 20, 2017).
10.41Amended and Restated $3,500,000,000 Credit Agreement, dated as of February 15, 2018 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 99.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed February 15, 2018).
10.42*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2018 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
for the quarter ended March 31, 2018 filed on May 3, 2018).
10.43*Form of Certificate of Designation of Series 2018 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s  Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018 filed on May 3, 2018).
10.44*Simon Property Group, L.P. 2019 Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon
Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 8, 2019).
10.45*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2019 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
for the quarter ended June 30, 2019 filed on August 7, 2019).
10.46*Form of Certificate of Designation of Series 2019 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s  Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2019 filed on August 7, 2019).
10.47Second Amended and Restated $6,000,000,000 Credit Agreement, dated as of March 16, 2020 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 99.2 of Simon Property Group Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed March 16, 2020).
10.48*Form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement under Simon Property Group, L.P. 2019 Stock Incentive Plan
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.48 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed
February 25, 2021).
10.49*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2021 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
for the quarter ended March 31, 2021 filed on May 10, 2021).
10.50*Form of Certificate of Designation of Series 2021 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s  Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2021 filed on May 10, 2021).
Table of Contents
144Exhibits
10.51Second Amended and Restated $3,500,000,000 Credit Agreement dated as of October 26, 2021 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 99.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed October 28,
2021).
10.52Amendment No. 1 to Second Amended and Restated $6,000,000,000 Credit Agreement, dated as of November
4, 2021.
21.1List of Subsidiaries of Simon Property Group Inc. and Simon Property Group, L.P.
23.1Simon Property Group, Inc. — Consent of Ernst & Young LLP.
23.2Simon Property Group, L.P. — Consent of Ernst & Young LLP.
31.1Simon Property Group, Inc. — Certification by the Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
31.2Simon Property Group, Inc. — Certification by the Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
31.3Simon Property Group, L.P. — Certification by the Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
31.4Simon Property Group, L.P. — Certification by the Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.1Simon Property Group, Inc. — Certification by the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer pursuant
to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.2Simon Property Group, L.P. — Certification by the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer pursuant
to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
101.INSXBRL Instance Document – the instance document does not appear in the Interactive Data File because its
XBRL tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL document.
101.SCHInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document
101.CALInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document
101.LABInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase Document
101.PREInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase Document
101.DEFInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document
104Cover Page Interactive File (formatted as Inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101)
(a)    Does not include supplemental indentures that authorize the issuance of debt securities series, none of which
exceeds 10% of the total assets of Simon Property Group, L.P. on a consolidated basis. Simon Property
Group, L.P. agrees to file copies of any such supplemental indentures upon the request of the Commission.
*        Represents a management contract, or compensatory plan, contract or arrangement required to be filed
pursuant to Regulation S-K.
Table of Contents
145SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, each Registrant
has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
SIMON PROPERTY GROUP, INC.
By/s/ DAVID SIMON
David Simon
Chairman of the Board of Directors, Chief
Executive Officer and President
Date: February 24, 2022
SIMON PROPERTY GROUP, L.P.
/s/ DAVID SIMON
David Simon
Chairman of the Board of Directors, Chief Executive
Officer and President of Simon Property Group, Inc.,
General Partner
Date: February 24, 2022
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the
following persons on behalf of Simon Property Group, Inc., for itself and in its capacity as General Partner of Simon
Property Group, L.P., and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
Signature Capacity Date
/s/ DAVID SIMONChairman of the Board of Directors, Chief
Executive Of ficer (Principal Executive
Officer) and PresidentFebruary 24, 2022
David Simon
/s/ HERBER T SIMONChairman Emeritus and Director February 24, 2022Herbert Simon
/s/ RICHARD S. SOKOLOVVice Chairman and Director February 24, 2022Richard S. Sokolov
/s/ LARR Y C. GLASSCOCKDirector February 24, 2022Larry C. Glasscock
/s/ REUBEN S. LEIBOWITZDirector February 24, 2022Reuben S. Leibowitz
/s/ J. ALBER T SMITH, JR.Director February 24, 2022J. Albert Smith, Jr .
/s/ KAREN N. HORNDirector February 24, 2022Karen N. Horn
/s/ ALLAN HUBBARDDirector February 24, 2022Allan Hubbard
/s/ DANIEL  C. SMITHDirector February 24, 2022Daniel C. Smith
Table of Contents
146Signature Capacity Date
/s/ GAR Y M. RODKINDirector February 24, 2022Gary M. Rodkin
/s/ GLYN F . AEPPELDirector February 24, 2022Glyn F . Aeppel
/s/ STEF AN M. SELIGDirector February 24, 2022Stefan M. Selig
/s/ MAR TA R. STEW ARTDirector February 24, 2022Marta R. Stewart
/s/ PEGGY  F. ROEDirector February 24, 2022Peggy F . Roe
/s/ BRIAN J. MCDADEExecutive V ice President, Chief
Financial Of ficer (Principal Financial
Officer) and TreasurerFebruary 24, 2022
Brian J. McDade
/s/ ADAM J. REUILLESenior V ice President and Chief
Accounting Of ficer (Principal Accounting
Officer)February 24, 2022
Adam J. Reuille
Table of Contents
147SCHEDULE III
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2021
(Dollars in thousands)
Cost Capitalized  
Subsequent to Gross Amounts At Which Date of  
Initial Cost (3) Acquisition (3) Carried At Close of Period Construction  
Buildings and Buildings and Buildings and Accumulated or  
Name     Location    Encumbrances (6)    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Total (1)    Depreciation (2)    Acquisition  
Malls
Barton
Creek
SquareAustin, TX
$ — $2,903 $ 20,929 $7,983 $ 93,731 $10,886 $ 114,660 $125,546 $ 67,339  1981
Battlefield
MallSpringfield,
MO  —  3,919  27,231  3,000  73,269  6,919  100,500  107,419  74,823  1970
Bay Park
SquareGreen Bay ,
WI  —  6,278  25,623  4,106  30,901  10,384  56,524  66,907  34,368  1980
Brea Mall Brea (Los
Angeles), CA  —  39,500  209,202  2,993  81,393  42,493  290,595  333,088  166,527  1998 (4)
Broadway
SquareTyler, TX
 —  11,306  32,431  —  52,984  11,306  85,415  96,721  43,517  1994 (4)
Burlington
MallBurlington
(Boston), MA  —  46,600  303,618  27,458  260,644  74,058  564,262  638,320  263,024  1998 (4)
Castleton
SquareIndianapolis,
IN  —  26,250  98,287  7,434  78,851  33,684  177,138  210,822  125,790  1972
Cielo V ista
MallEl Paso, TX
 —  1,005  15,262  608  54,450  1,613  69,712  71,325  50,865  1974
College
MallBloomington,
IN  —  1,003  16,245  720  70,036  1,723  86,281  88,004  49,845  1965
Columbia
CenterKennewick,
WA  —  17,441  66,580  —  43,135  17,441  109,715  127,156  67,064  1987
Copley
PlaceBoston, MA
 —  —  378,045  —  200,624  —  578,669  578,669  271,506  2002 (4)
Coral
SquareCoral Springs
(Miami), FL  —  13,556  93,630  —  20,187  13,556  113,817  127,373  91,266  1984
Cordova
MallPensacola, FL
 —  18,626  73,091  7,321  70,907  25,947  143,998  169,945  84,955  1998 (4)
Domain,
TheAustin, TX
 210,000  40,436  197,010  —  155,117  40,436  352,127  392,563  186,040  2005
Empire
MallSioux Falls,
SD  180,452  35,998  192,186  —  32,637 35,998  224,823  260,821  76,189  1998 (5)
Fashion
Mall at
Keystone,
TheIndianapolis,
IN
 —  —  120,579  29,145  111,089   29,145  231,668  260,813  139,363  1997 (4)
Firewheel
Town
CenterGarland
(Dallas), TX
 —  8,438  82,716  —  29,889  8,438  112,605  121,043  67,382  2004
Forum
Shops at
Caesars,
TheLas V egas,
NV
 —  —  276,567  —  285,180  —  561,747  561,747  316,592  1992
Greenwood
Park MallGreenwood
(Indianapolis),
IN  —  2,423  23,445  5,253  124,482  7,676  147,927  155,603  95,160  1979
Haywood
MallGreenville,
SC  —  11,585  133,893  6 42,034  11,591  175,927  187,518  117,494  1998 (4)
King of
PrussiaKing of
Prussia
(Philadelphia),
PA  —  175,063  1,128,200  —  383,148  175,063  1,511,348  1,686,411  513,981  2003 (5)
La Plaza
Mall (13)McAllen, TX
 —  87,912  9,828  6,569  188,482  94,481  198,310  292,791  58,002  1976
Lakeline
MallCedar Park
(Austin), TX  —  10,088  81,568  14  24,446  10,102  106,014  116,116  67,646  1995
Lenox
SquareAtlanta, GA
 —  37,447  492,411  —  142,110  37,447  634,521  671,968  390,709  1998 (4)
Livingston
MallLivingston
(New York),
NJ — 22,214 105,250 — 47,600 22,214 152,850 175,064 100,502 1998 (4)
Mall of
GeorgiaBuford
(Atlanta), GA — 47,492 326,633 — 13,980 47,492 340,613 388,105 207,009 1999 (5)
McCain
MallN. Little Rock,
AR —    —    9,515     10,142     28,634     10,142     38,149     48,290     18,749   1973
Menlo Park
MallEdison (New
York), NJ  — 65,684  223,252  — 88,717  65,684  311,969  377,653  199,039  1997 (4)
Midland
Park MallMidland, TX
 —  687 9,213  1,196  42,037  1,883  51,250  53,133  23,361 1980
Miller Hill
MallDuluth, MN
 —  2,965  18,092   1,811   43,110   4,776   61,202   65,978   46,574  1973
North East
MallHurst (Dallas),
TX  —  128 12,966   19,010   143,969   19,138   156,935   176,073   120,393  1971
Ocean
County
MallToms River
(New York),
NJ  —  20,404  124,945   3,277   87,686   23,681   212,631   236,312   108,360  1998 (4)
Orland
SquareOrland Park
(Chicago), IL  —  35,439  129,906   —  78,380   35,439   208,286   243,725   123,882  1997 (4)
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2021
(Dollars in thousands)
148Cost Capitalized  
Subsequent to Gross Amounts At Which Date of  
Initial Cost (3) Acquisition (3) Carried At Close of Period Construction  
Buildings and Buildings and Buildings and Accumulated or  
Name     Location    Encumbrances (6)    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Total (1)    Depreciation (2)    Acquisition  
Oxford
Valley MallLanghorne
(Philadelphia),
PA  32,783   20,872  100,287   —  20,040   20,872   120,327   141,199   87,416  2003 (4)
Penn
Square MallOklahoma
City, OK  310,000   2,043  155,958   —  60,572   2,043   216,530   218,573   143,182  2002 (4)
Pheasant
Lane MallNashua, NH
 —  3,902  155,068   550  49,963   4,452   205,031   209,483   122,652  2004 (5)
Phipps
PlazaAtlanta, GA
 —  15,005  210,610   —  276,793   15,005   487,403   502,408   180,970  1998 (4)
Plaza
CarolinaCarolina (San
Juan), PR  225,000   15,493  279,560   —  79,328   15,493   358,888   374,381   182,915  2004 (4)
Prien Lake
MallLake Charles,
LA  —  1,842  2,813   3,053   71,722   4,895   74,535   79,430   29,705  1972
Rockaway
TownsquareRockaway
(New York),
NJ  —  41,918  212,257   —  71,558   41,918   283,815   325,733   168,749  1998 (4)
Roosevelt
FieldGarden City
(New York),
NY  —  163,160  702,008   1,246   372,918   164,406   1,074,926   1,239,332   567,080  1998 (4)
Ross Park
MallPittsburgh, P A
$ — $23,541  $ 90,203  $5,815  $ 123,154  $29,356  $ 213,357  $242,713  $ 137,717  1986
Santa Rosa
PlazaSanta Rosa,
CA  —  10,400  87,864   —  27,226   10,400   115,090   125,490   70,604  1998 (4)
Shops at
Chestnut
Hill, TheChestnut Hill
(Boston), MA
 120,000   449 25,102   38,864   106,768   39,313   131,871   171,184   48,064  2002 (5)
Shops at
Nanuet,
TheNanuet, NY
 —  28,125  142,860   —  8,778   28,125   151,638   179,763   47,385  2013
Shops at
Riverside,
TheHackensack
(New York),
NJ  —  13,521  238,746   —  265,172   13,521   503,918   517,439   117,769  2007 (4) (5)
South Hills
VillagePittsburgh, P A
 —  23,445  125,840   1,472   84,426   24,917   210,266   235,183   114,736  1997 (4)
South
Shore
PlazaBraintree
(Boston), MA
 —  101,200  301,495   —  164,885   101,200   466,380   567,580   281,716  1998 (4)
Southdale
MallEdina
(Minneapolis),
MN —  41,430 184,967  —  81,994  41,430  266,961  308,391  73,542 2007 (4) (5)
SouthPark Charlotte, NC  —  42,092  188,055   100  208,086   42,192   396,141   438,333   236,456  2002 (4)
St. Charles
Towne
CenterWaldorf
(Washington,
DC), MD  —  7,710  52,934   1,180   27,286   8,890   80,220   89,110   62,210  1990
Stanford
Shopping
CenterPalo Alto (San
Jose), CA
— — 339,537 — 194,716 — 534,253 534,253 229,236 2003 (4)
Summit
MallAkron, OH
85,000 15,374  51,137  — 55,450  15,374  106,587  121,961  68,650  1965
Tacoma
MallTacoma
(Seattle), W A — 37,113  125,826  — 173,286  37,113  299,112  336,225  154,263  1987
Tippecanoe
MallLafayette, IN
 —  2,897   8,439   5,517   46,663   8,414   55,102   63,516   45,141  1973
Town
Center at
Boca RatonBoca Raton
(Miami), FL
 —  64,200   307,317   —  245,850   64,200   553,167   617,367   325,402  1998 (4)
Towne East
SquareWichita, KS
 —  8,024   18,479   4,108   56,584   12,132   75,063   87,195   47,791  1975
Treasure
Coast
SquareJensen
Beach, FL
 —  11,124   72,990   3,067   39,325   14,191   112,315   126,506   79,344  1987
Tyrone
SquareSt. Petersburg
(Tampa), FL  —  15,638   120,962   1,459   50,233   17,097   171,195   188,292   117,286  1972
University
Park MallMishawaka,
IN  —  10,762   118,164   7,000   58,155   17,762   176,319   194,081   148,669  1996 (4)
Walt
Whitman
ShopsHuntington
Station (New
York), NY  —  51,700   111,258   3,789   130,566   55,489   241,824   297,313   138,124  1998 (4)
White Oaks
MallSpringfield, IL
 42,594   2,907   35,692   2,468   65,150   5,375   100,842   106,217   61,714  1977
Wolfchase
GalleriaMemphis, TN
 155,152   16,407   128,276   —  17,244   16,407   145,520   161,927   102,290  2002 (4)
Woodland
Hills MallTulsa, OK
 —  34,211   187,123   —  36,573   34,211   223,696   257,907   152,940  2004 (5)
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2021
(Dollars in thousands)
149Cost Capitalized  
Subsequent to Gross Amounts At Which Date of  
Initial Cost (3) Acquisition (3) Carried At Close of Period Construction  
Buildings and Buildings and Buildings and Accumulated or  
Name     Location    Encumbrances (6)    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Total (1)    Depreciation (2)    Acquisition  
Premium
Outlets   
Albertville
Premium
OutletsAlbertville
(Minneapolis), MN
 —  3,900   97,059   —  10,069   3,900   107,128   111,028   56,242  2004 (4)
Allen
Premium
OutletsAllen (Dallas), TX
 —  20,932  69,788  —  44,770  20,932  114,558  135,490  39,846 2004 (4)
Aurora
Farms
Premium
OutletsAurora (Cleveland),
OH
 —  2,370  24,326  —  9,045  2,370  33,371  35,741  25,244 2004 (4)
Birch Run
Premium
OutletsBirch Run (Detroit), MI
 123,000   11,477   77,856   —  8,978   11,477   86,834   98,311   40,083  2010 (4)
Camarillo
Premium
OutletsCamarillo (Los
Angeles), CA
 —  16,599   224,721   395  73,858   16,994   298,579   315,572   155,743  2004 (4)
Carlsbad
Premium
OutletsCarlsbad (San Diego),
CA
 —  12,890   184,990   96  10,584   12,986   195,574   208,560   93,869  2004 (4)
Carolina
Premium
OutletsSmithfield (Raleigh),
NC
 —  3,175   59,863   5,311   7,682   8,486   67,545   76,031   39,192  2004 (4)
Chicago
Premium
OutletsAurora (Chicago), IL
 —  659  118,005   13,050   96,798   13,709   214,803   228,512   89,810  2004 (4)
Cincinnati
Premium
OutletsMonroe (Cincinnati),
OH
 —  14,117   71,520   —  3,367   14,117   74,887   89,004   38,032  2008
Clinton
Crossing
Premium
OutletsClinton, CT
 —  2,060   107,556   1,532   6,730   3,592   114,286   117,878   64,861  2004 (4)
Denver
Premium
OutletsThornton (Denver), CO
— 11,001  45,335  10 73,657  11,011  118,992  130,003  18,076  2018
Desert Hills
Premium
OutletsCabazon (Palm
Springs), CA
— 3,440 338,679 — 116,191 3,440 454,870 458,310 200,331 2004 (4)
Ellenton
Premium
OutletsEllenton (T ampa), FL
 178,000  15,807  182,412  — 8,034  15,807  190,446  206,253 116,060 2010 (4)
Folsom
Premium
OutletsFolsom (Sacramento),
CA
 — 9,060   50,281   —  5,956   9,060   56,237   65,297  34,092 2004 (4)
Gilroy
Premium
OutletsGilroy (San Jose), CA
 — 9,630  194,122  — 16,955  9,630  211,077  220,707 109,942 2004 (4)
Grand
Prairie
Premium
OutletsGrand Prairie (Dallas),
TX
 —  9,497   194,245   —  1,330   9,497   195,575   205,072  61,119 2012
Grove City
Premium
OutletsGrove City
(Pittsburgh), P A
 140,000   6,421   121,880   —  8,365   6,421   130,245   136,666  78,970 2010 (4)
Gulfport
Premium
OutletsGulfport, MS
$ 50,000  $ — $ 27,949  $ — $ 7,694  $ — $ 35,643  $35,643 $ 19,001 2010 (4)
Hagerstown
Premium
OutletsHagerstown
(Baltimore/W ashington,
DC), MD 71,901  3,576  85,883  — 1,973  3,576  87,856  91,432 42,753 2010 (4)
Houston
Premium
OutletsCypress (Houston), TX
— 8,695 69,350 — 44,528 8,695 113,878 122,573 58,104 2007
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2021
(Dollars in thousands)
150Cost Capitalized  
Subsequent to Gross Amounts At Which Date of  
Initial Cost (3) Acquisition (3) Carried At Close of Period Construction  
Buildings and Buildings and Buildings and Accumulated or  
Name     Location    Encumbrances (6)    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Total (1)    Depreciation (2)    Acquisition  
Indiana
Premium
OutletsEdinburgh
(Indianapolis), IN
— 2,857  47,309  — 20,544  2,857  67,853  70,710 38,049 2004 (4)
Jackson
Premium
OutletsJackson (New
York), NJ
— 6,413  104,013  3 8,245  6,416  112,258  118,674 55,053 2004 (4)
Jersey Shore
Premium
OutletsTinton Falls (New
York), NJ
 —  15,390   50,979   —  78,779   15,390   129,758   145,148  70,019 2007
Johnson
Creek
Premium
OutletsJohnson Creek,
WI
 —  2,800   39,546   —  7,221   2,800   46,767   49,567  24,617 2004 (4)
Kittery
Premium
OutletsKittery , ME
 —  11,832   94,994   —  11,059   11,832   106,053   117,885  49,905 2004 (4)
Las Americas
Premium
OutletsSan Diego, CA
 —  45,168   251,878   —  11,203   45,168   263,081   308,249  110,122 2007 (4)
Las V egas
North
Premium
OutletsLas V egas, NV
 —  25,435   134,973   16,536   151,229   41,971   286,202   328,173  141,918 2004 (4)
Las V egas
South
Premium
OutletsLas V egas, NV
 —  13,085   160,777   —  32,579   13,085   193,356   206,441  92,359 2004 (4)
Lee Premium
OutletsLee, MA
 48,604   9,167   52,212   —  4,213   9,167   56,425   65,592  32,727 2010 (4)
Leesburg
Corner
Premium
OutletsLeesburg
(Washington,
DC), V A
 —  7,190   162,023   —  21,692   7,190   183,715   190,905  92,572 2004 (4)
Lighthouse
Place
Premium
OutletsMichigan City
(Chicago, IL), IN
 —  6,630   94,138   —  13,130   6,630   107,268   113,898  61,728 2004 (4)
Merrimack
Premium
OutletsMerrimack, NH
 —  14,975   118,428   —  2,501   14,975   120,929   135,904  47,885 2012
Napa Premium
OutletsNapa, CA
 —  11,400  45,023  —  7,418  11,400  52,441  63,841  29,189 2004 (4)
North Bend
Premium
OutletsNorth Bend
(Seattle), W A
 —  2,143   36,197   —  5,281   2,143   41,478   43,621  20,845 2004 (4)
North Georgia
Premium
OutletsDawsonville
(Atlanta), GA
 —  4,300   137,020   —  1,877   4,300   138,897   143,197  69,520 2004 (4)
Orlando
International
Premium
OutletsOrlando, FL
 —  31,998   472,815   —  17,633   31,998   490,448   522,446  198,096 2010 (4)
Orlando
Vineland
Premium
OutletsOrlando, FL
 —  14,040   382,949   36,023   25,087   50,063   408,036   458,099  190,674 2004 (4)
Petaluma
Village
Premium
OutletsPetaluma (San
Francisco), CA
 —  13,322   13,710   —  3,632   13,322   17,342   30,664  11,293 2004 (4)
Philadelphia
Premium
OutletsLimerick
(Philadelphia),
PA  —  16,676   105,249   —  25,050   16,676   130,299   146,975  77,436 2006
Phoenix
Premium
OutletsChandler
(Phoenix), AZ
 — — 63,082  — 485 — 63,567  63,567 26,526 2013
Pismo Beach
Premium
OutletsPismo Beach, CA
 32,975  4,317  19,044  — 2,833  4,317  21,877  26,194 14,177 2010 (4)
Pleasant
Prairie
Premium
OutletsPleasant Prairie
(Chicago,
IL/Milwaukee),
WI  145,000  16,823  126,686  — 8,524  16,823  135,210  152,033  60,263  2010 (4)
Puerto Rico
Premium
OutletsBarceloneta, PR
 160,000   20,586   114,021   —  8,467   20,586   122,488   143,074   55,420  2010 (4)
Queenstown
Premium
OutletsQueenstown
(Baltimore), MD
 57,928   8,129   61,950   —  5,000   8,129   66,950   75,079   31,396  2010 (4)
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2021
(Dollars in thousands)
151Cost Capitalized  
Subsequent to Gross Amounts At Which Date of  
Initial Cost (3) Acquisition (3) Carried At Close of Period Construction  
Buildings and Buildings and Buildings and Accumulated or  
Name     Location    Encumbrances (6)    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Total (1)    Depreciation (2)    Acquisition  
Rio Grande
Valley
Premium
OutletsMercedes
(McAllen), TX
 —  12,229   41,547   —  28,036   12,229   69,583   81,812   43,037  2005
Round Rock
Premium
OutletsRound Rock
(Austin), TX
 —  13,485   82,252   —  5,259   13,485   87,511   100,995   55,956  2005
San
Francisco
Premium
OutletsLivermore
(San
Francisco),
CA  —  21,925   308,694   46,176   75,532   68,102   384,226   452,328   110,323  2012
San Marcos
Premium
OutletsSan Marcos
(Austin/San
Antonio), TX —  13,180   287,179   —  14,047   13,180   301,226   314,406   125,685  2010 (4)
Seattle
Premium
OutletsTulalip
(Seattle), W A
—  —  103,722  —  55,323  —  159,045  159,045  81,104 2004 (4)
St.
Augustine
Premium
OutletsSt. Augustine
(Jacksonville),
FL
— 6,090 57,670 2 13,850 6,092 71,520 77,612 39,632 2004 (4)
Tampa
Premium
OutletsLutz (T ampa),
FL
 — 14,298  97,188  121 5,911  14,419  103,099  117,518  27,571  2015
The
Crossings
Premium
OutletsTannersville,
PA
 $ — $7,720  $ 172,931  $ — $ 19,407  $7,720  $ 192,338  $200,058  $ 93,873  2004 (4)
Tucson
Premium
OutletsMarana
(Tucson), AZ
—  12,508  69,677  —  5,649  12,508  75,326  87,834  19,786 2015
Vacaville
Premium
OutletsVacaville, CA
 —  9,420   84,850   —  18,490   9,420   103,340   112,760   58,544  2004 (4)
Waikele
Premium
OutletsWaipahu
(Honolulu), HI
 —  22,630   77,316   —  19,863   22,630   97,179   119,809   50,647  2004 (4)
Waterloo
Premium
OutletsWaterloo, NY
 —  3,230   75,277   —  14,620   3,230   89,897   93,127   49,967  2004 (4)
Williamsburg
Premium
OutletsWilliamsburg,
VA
185,000  10,323  223,789  —  8,947  10,323  232,736  243,059  95,160 2010 (4)
Woodburn
Premium
OutletsWoodburn
(Portland),
OR  — 9,414  150,414  — 2,987  9,414  153,401  162,815  50,987  2013 (4)
Woodbury
Common
Premium
OutletsCentral V alley
(New York),
NY
—  11,010  862,559  1,771  270,451  12,781  1,133,010  1,145,790  480,423 2004 (4)
Wrentham
Village
Premium
OutletsWrentham
(Boston), MA
— 4,900 282,031 — 49,664 4,900 331,695 336,595 155,589 2004 (4)
The Mills
Arizona Mills Tempe
(Phoenix), AZ 99,682  41,285  297,289  —  15,079  41,285  312,368  353,653  85,269 2007 (4) (5)
Great Mall Milpitas (San
Jose), CA —  69,853  463,101  —  60,466  69,853  523,567  593,420  175,704 2007 (4) (5)
Gurnee Mills Gurnee
(Chicago), IL 257,710  41,133  297,911  —  31,134  41,133  329,045  370,178  113,342 2007 (4) (5)
Mills at
Jersey
Gardens,
TheElizabeth, NJ
—  120,417  865,605  —  14,991  120,417  880,596  1,001,013  229,102 2015 (4)
Opry Mills Nashville, TN 375,000  51,000  327,503  —  16,927  51,000  344,430  395,430  112,976 2007 (4) (5)
Outlets at
Orange, TheOrange (Los
Angeles), CA 215,000 64,973 211,322 — 3,544 64,973 214,866 279,840 25,872 2007 (4) (5)
Potomac
MillsWoodbridge
(Washington,
DC), V A 416,000 61,608 425,370 — 40,194 61,608 465,564 527,172 165,137 2007 (4) (5)
Sawgrass
MillsSunrise
(Miami), FL — 192,981 1,641,153 5,395 227,774 198,376 1,868,927 2,067,302 592,984 2007 (4) (5)
Designer
Outlets
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2021
(Dollars in thousands)
152Cost Capitalized  
Subsequent to Gross Amounts At Which Date of  
Initial Cost (3) Acquisition (3) Carried At Close of Period Construction  
Buildings and Buildings and Buildings and Accumulated or  
Name     Location    Encumbrances (6)    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Total (1)    Depreciation (2)    Acquisition  
La Reggia
Designer
OutletMarcianise (Naples),
Italy
148,397  37,220  233,179  — 34,674  37,220  267,853  305,073  60,272  2013 (4) (5) (7
Noventa Di
Piave
Designer
OutletVenice, Italy
314,876 38,793 309,283 — 73,479 38,793 382,762 421,555 77,400  2013 (4) (5) (7
Ochtrup
Designer
OutletOchtrup, Germany
56,715 11,770 99,221 — — 11,770 99,221 110,991 7,188 2016 (4) (5) (7
Parndorf
Designer
OutletVienna, Austria
208,273 14,903 223,156 — 4,924 14,903 228,080 242,983 59,149 2013 (4) (5) (7
Provence
Designer
OutletProvence, France
92,899 41,321 78,279 6,169 — 47,490 78,279 125,769 30,462 2017 (4) (5) (7
Roermond
Designer
OutletRoermond,
Netherlands
260,891 15,035 400,094 — 16,700 15,035 416,794 431,829 110,259 2013 (4) (5) (7
Roosendaal
Designer
OutletRoosendaal,
Netherlands
65,105 22,191 108,069 — 6,917 22,191 114,986 137,178 28,406 2017 (4) (5) (7
Lifestyle
Centers
ABQ
UptownAlbuquerque, NM
— 6,374 75,333 4,054 7,572 10,428 82,905 93,333 32,112 2011 (4)
Northgate
StationSeattle, W A
 —  23,610  115,992   11,947   81,738   35,557   197,730   233,286   55,568  1987
University
Park V illageFort W orth, TX
53,408   18,031  100,523  — 8,245  18,031  108,768  126,799  26,205  2015 (4)
 
Other
Properties
Calhoun
MarketplaceCalhoun, GA
$ 17,552  $ 1,745  $ 12,529  $ — $ 2,188  $ 1,745  $ 14,717  $ 16,462  $ 10,845 2010 (4)
Florida Keys
Outlet
CenterFlorida City , FL
17,000 1,112 1,748 — 4,735 1,112 6,483 7,595 3,976 2010 (4)
Gaffney
MarketplaceGaffney
(Greenville/Charlotte),
SC 28,352   4,056  32,371  — 5,785  4,056  38,156  42,212  22,623 2010 (4)
Orlando
Outlet
MarketplaceOrlando, FL
— 3,367 1,557 — 3,726 3,367 5,283 8,650 3,164 2010 (4)
Osage
Beach
MarketplaceOsage Beach, MO
— 1,397 8,874 — — 1,397 8,874 10,272 1,364 2004 (4)
Southridge
MallGreendale
(Milwaukee), WI 112,087 12,359 130,111 1,939 12,244 14,298 142,355 156,653 58,663 2007 (4) (5)
Other pre-
development
costs 73,854 102,451 259,687 959 — 103,410 259,687 363,097 78
Other — 3,537 133,632 31 — 3,568 133,632 137,201 17,798
Currency
Translation
Adjustment — 5,940 11,216 — 36,025 5,940 47,242 53,182 (33,934 )
$ 5,366,190 $3,270,099 $25,016,217 $369,254 $8,841,645 $3,639,353 $33,857,863 $37,497,216 $ 15,304,461
Table of Contents
153Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Schedule III as of December 31, 2021
(Dollars in thousands)
(1) Reconciliation of Real Estate Properties:
The changes in real estate assets for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019 are as follows:
    2021     2020     2019  
Balance, beginning of year $37,608,638 $37,356,739 $36,667,960
Acquisitions and consolidations (7)  121,250  —  40,990
Improvements  569,483  401,202  899,728
Disposals and deconsolidations  (655,482 ) (320,328 ) (219,268 )
Currency Translation Adjustment (146,673 ) 171,025 (32,671 )
Balance, close of year $37,497,216 $37,608,638 $37,356,739
The unaudited aggregate cost of domestic consolidated real estate assets for U.S. federal income tax
purposes as of December 31, 2021 was $20,725,472.
(2) Reconciliation of Accumulated Depreciation:
The changes in accumulated depreciation for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019 are as
follows:
    2021     2020     2019  
Balance, beginning of year $14,592,867 $13,622,433 $12,632,690
Depreciation expense (7)  1,083,705  1,226,611  1,176,815
Disposals and deconsolidations  (403,582 ) (236,123 ) (194,664 )
Currency Translation Adjustment 31,471 (20,054 ) 7,592
Balance, close of year $15,304,461 $14,592,867 $13,622,433
Depreciation of our investment in buildings and improvements reflected in the consolidated statements of
operations and comprehensive income is calculated over the estimated original lives of the assets as noted below.
●Buildings and Improvements — typically 10-35 years for the structure, 15 years for landscaping and parking
lot, and 10 years for HVAC equipment.
●Tenant Allowances and Improvements — shorter of lease term or useful life.
(3) Initial cost generally represents net book value at December 20, 1993, except for acquired properties and new
developments after December 20, 1993. Initial cost also includes any new developments that are opened
during the current year. Costs of disposals and impairments of property are first reflected as a reduction to
cost capitalized subsequent to acquisition.
(4) Not developed/constructed by us or our predecessors. The date of construction represents the initial
acquisition date for assets in which we have acquired multiple interests.
(5) Initial cost for these properties is the cost at the date of consolidation for properties previously accounted for
under the equity method of accounting.
(6) Encumbrances represent face amount of mortgage debt and exclude any premiums or discounts and deferred
financing costs.
(7) Represents the original cost and does not include subsequent currency translation adjustments.
